Vol. I.A
GUY RIVERS.
VOL. I.
CHAPTER I.
Who's he that o'er this desert country speeds
The sun fast sinking? He would seem a wight
All out of luck, and sadly venturous,
Standing some peril from the ruffian knife,
Or, at the best, a cold and roofless tent,
'Neath the bare sky.
In
the upper part of the State of Georgia,
extending
into the country of the Cherokee Indians
a region, at this period, fruitful of disputelying
at nearly equal distances between the parallel
waters of the Chatahoochie river, and that branch
of it which bears the name of the Chestatee, from a
now almost forgotten but once formidable tribe
will be found a long reach of comparatively barren
lands, interspersed with hills, which occasionally
aspire to a more elevated title, and garnished only
here and there with a dull, half-withered shrubbery,
relieved at intervals, though even then but
imperfectly
,
by small clumps of slender pines that fling
out their few and skeleton branches ruggedly and
abruptly against the sky. The entire face of the
scene, if not absolutely desolate, has, at least, a
dreary and melancholy expression, which can
not fail to elicit, in the bosom of the most
indifferent
spectator, a feeling of gravity and even gloom.
The sparse clusters of ragged woods, and thin
undergrowth of shrivelled herbage, gave token of
the generally steril character of that destiny,
which seemed to have taken up its abode
immediately
within, while presiding over, the place.
All around, as far as the eye could reach, a
continual
recurrence of the same objects and outline
arrested and fatigued the gaze; which finally
sickened
of long levels of sand, broken with rude hills
of a dull species of rock, and a low shrubbery from
which all living things had taken their departure.
Though thus barren to the eye, this region was not,
however, utterly deficient in resources; and its
possessions
were those of a description not a little
attractive to the great majority of mankind. It
was the immediate outpostthe very threshold of
the gold country, now so famous for the prolific
promise of the precious metal; far exceeding, in
the contemplation of the knowing, the lavish
abundance
of Mexico and of Peru, in the days of their
palmiest and most prosperous condition. Nor,
though only the frontier and threshold as it were
to these swollen treasures, was the portion of
country
now under our survey, though bleak, steril
and to the eye uninviting, wanting in attractions
of its own; it contained the signs and indications
which denoted the fertile regions, nor was it entirely
deficient in the precious mineral itself. Much gold
had been gathered already, with little labour, and
almost upon its surface; and it was perhaps only
because of the little knowledge then had of its
wealth, and of its close proximity to a more
productive
territory, that it had been suffered to
remain
unexamined and unexplored. Nature, thus,
we may remark, in a section of the world
seemingly
unblessed with her bounty, and all
ungarnished
with her fruits and flowers, appeared
desirous
,
however, of redeeming it from the curse
of barrenness, by storing its bosom with a
product
,
which, only of use to the world in its
conventional
necessities, has become, in accordance
with the self-creating wants of society, a necessity
itself; and however the bloom and beauty of her
summer decorations may refresh the eye of the
enthusiast, it would here seem, that, with an
extended
policy, she had created another, and
perhaps
a larger class, which, in the attainment of those
spoils which are of less obvious and easy
acquisition
,
would even set at nought those which have
at all times been the peculiar delight and felicity
of the former. Nothing is entirely barren in her
dominions; and, to some spirits, her very solitude
and sterility seem as inviting and grateful, as to
others may appear her rich landscapes and
voluptuous
flowers.
It is towards the sunset of a fine afternoon in
the month of May, that we would make our reader
more particularly acquainted with the scene we
have endeavoured to place before him. A rich
summer sunsuch as is the peculiar property of a
southern regionof sufficient power, even in the
moment of his decline, to convert into tributary
glories the clouds which gathered around him, threw
over all the scene his incomparable splendours,
burnishing
the earth with hues more richly golden, if
not so valuable in the estimation of mankind, as the
wealth which lay concealed within its bosom. The
picturesque guise of the solitude, thus gloriously
invested, was beautiful beyond description. Its
charms became duly exaggerated to the mind,
when coupled with the consciousness that the hand
of the mighty artist had been employed in the
adornment of a prospect of itself totally
uninviting
and utterly unlovely. The solitary pine
that, here and there, touched by the sunbeams,
shone up like some burning spirethe undulating
hills, catching in different gradations of shade and
fulness, in a like manner, from the same inimitable
gilder of creation, a similar garmentthe dim
outlines
of the low and stunted shrubbery, sparingly
distributing its green foliage over the picture,
mingled
here and there with a stray beam, dashed
hurriedly, as it were, from the palette of the same
artistpresented to the eye an outline perfectly
unique in itself, and singularly characteristic of
that
warm sadness
of sentiment (not to adopt too
much of an oriental phraseology) with which, alone,
it could have been properly contemplated.
At this point in our narration, a single traveller
might have been seen emerging from the confines
of the evening horizon, where the forest, such as it
was, terminated the prospect. He travelled on
horsebackthe prevailing and preferable mode, in
that region, where bad roads and crazy vehicles
make every other not merely precarious but
hazardous
.
The animal he rode might have been
considered, even in the south, one of a choice
parentage. He was large, broad-chested, and high
trod the earth with the firm pace of an elephant;
and, though exhibiting the utmost docility and
obedience
to the rein, proceeding on his way with as
much ease and freedom as if he bore not the
slightest burden on his unconscious back. Indeed,
he carried but little weight, for a single and small
portmanteau contained the wardrobe of the rider.
Beyond this he had few incumbrances; and, to
those accustomed only to the modes of travel in a
more settled and civilized countrywith bag and
A 2
baggagethe traveller might have appearedbut
for a pair of moderately-sized twisted barrels, which
we see pocketed on the saddle,rather as a
gentleman
of leisure taking his morning ride, than one
already far from home and increasing at every
step the distance between it and himself. From
our privilege we make bold to mention, that, strictly
proportioned to their capacities, the last named
appurtenances carried each a charge, which might
have rendered awkward any interruption; and, it
may not be saying too much if we add, that it is
not improbable, to this portion of his equipage our
traveller was indebted for that security which had
heretofore obviated all necessity for their use.
They were essentials which might or might not, in
that wild region, have been put in requisition; and
the prudence of all experience, in that quarter, is
seldom found to neglect such companionship.
To proceed in our detailthe personage to whom
the reader has just been introduced, was, in
appearance
,
a mere youth. He had, perhaps, seen some
twenty summers or thereaboutscertainly, but few
more; his person was tall, manly, and
symmetrical
;
his face, not so round as full, presented a
perfect oval to the eye; his forehead was broad,
high, and intellectualpurely and perfectly white;
and shadowed partially by clustering, but not
thick ringlets of the deepest brown; his eyes
were dark and piercing, but small, and were
overhung
by large, projecting, and bushy brows, which
gave a commanding, and at times, a fierce
expression
to his countenance; his lips were small but
fullmost exquisitely rounded, and of a ripe, rich
colour. He might have been considered a fine
specimen of masculine beauty, but for the smallness
of his eyes, which, though quick and speaking,
failed to sustain, with due proportion, the otherwise
highly attractive outline of a countenance strongly
marked with mind and character. We have
dwelt thus long upon the person of our new
acquaintance
,
as it is more than probable he will have
much to perform, in the presence of the reader,
during
the progress of our narrative. It may be well
to add, in order to the omission of nothing
hereafter
important, that he rode with the ease and
grace common to the people of the southern
states, though with a seeming indolencenot so
much a peculiarity with the same class on
horseback
as on footwhich indicated perhaps
something
of his usual habit and temper. His
habiliments
were strictly suited to the condition and
custom of the countrya variable climaterough
roadsand, not unfrequently, villanous weather.
They consisted of a blue stuff, not so fine as strong,
well made, happily adjusted to the figure, yet
with sufficient freedom for all the purposes and
requisitions
of travel. He was booted and spurred;
and his legs, from above the knee down to the ancle,
were closely wrapped in a thick and somewhat
fantastically-wrought pair of buckskin leggings, a
feature of dress which the early settlers have
borrowed from the Indian habit. A huge cloak,
strapped compactly over his saddle, completes the
outline; and thus caparisoned, with possibly a
fox-skin cap in place of the fashionable beaver, and a
pair of monstrous saddle-bags in lieu of the
portmanteau
,
the reader has, in most respects, a fair
sample of the traveller generally in the southern
and south-western forests, to whom all the
contingencies
of wilderness and weather have been made
familiar by a rugged experience.
Our new acquaintance had, by this time,
emerged from the spot in which we first encountered
him, into one of those circuits of brown, barren,
ridgy heath, which, interspersed as they are with
waste and forest, in not unequal divisions, may not
improperly be considered a prevailing outline of
feature
in the poorer sections of our southern country.
Though broken here and there by an abrupt line
of crags, it was a monotonous and weary waste,
thinly scattered with foliage, and rather saddened
than relieved by the occasional skeleton of some
decayed tree, peeled by the storms of its bark and
verdure, hanging out its ragged and sapless branches
in the air, and giving an added melancholy to a
scene, in the absence of all other associations,
sufficiently
so in itself. Here our traveller fell into a
narrow footpath, and being naturally of a musing
and dreamy spirit, pursued unconsciously, and
without seeming observation, the way which it
pointed out. His thoughts were seemingly in full
unison with the almost grave-like stillness and
solemn
hush of every thing around him. His spirit
appeared to luxuriate in the mournful barrenness
and uninviting associations from which all but
himself
,
birds and beasts, and the very insects, seemed
utterly to have departed. The faint hum of a
single
woodchuck, which from its confused motions,
appeared to have wandered into an unknown
territory
,
and by its uneasy action and frequent
chirping
,
seemed to indicate a perfect knowledge of the
fact, was the only object which at intervals broke
through the spell of silence which hung so heavily
upon the sense. The air of the traveller was that
of one who appeared unable, however desirous he
might be, to avoid the train of sad thought which
such a scene was so eminently calculated to
inspire
;
and, of consequence, who seemed disposed
for this object to call up some of those
internal
resources of one's own mind and memory,
which so mysteriously bear us away from the
present, whatever its powers, its pains, or its
pleasures
,
and carry us into a territory of the heart's
own selection. But whether the past, in his case,
was more to be dreaded than the present; or
whether, to the contemplative mind, there was
something in the immediate prospect around him
calculated to afford it a not ungrateful
employment
,
we may not determine; but the wayfarer,
after a while, appeared disposed to resign himself
wholly to the mood of mind so imperatively
demanded
by the nature of the objects which
encompassed
him. The bridle fell at length from his
hand upon the neck of his steed; and it was only
when the noble animal, aroused to consciousness
by the seeming stupor of his rider, suddenly and
absolutely came to a stand, that the youth grew
aware of the precise nature of his situation. The
space now began greatly to narrow around him,
and the trees to thicken. The horizon, as well from
the decline of the sun-light as from the increased
vigour of the forest, became more circumscribed.
The trees waved over him more frequently and
freely; and, at length converging to a centre,
brought him within the shadow and shelter of a
thickly umbrageous wood. Here the path, which
he had taken unwittingly at first, and still continued
to pursue, failed him entirely, and was now no
longer
discernible; and for the first time, after
fruitlessly
seeking for an outlet, our traveller grew
apprehensive
that his meditations of the last half hour
had tended in no very great degree, to enlighten
him on the subject of the route he was pursuing.
In sober earnest, he found out that he had mistaken
his route, whatever that might have been; and was
now compelled to hold a council of war with the
good steed he rode, and which appeared just as
well as his master to comprehend their mutual
predicament
.
Silently dismounting, therefore, and
leading his horse after him, he put himself at some
trouble to trace, if possible, some human pathway
other than that by which he had been deceived.
In spite of the somewhat reckless air which his
looks wore on this occasion, a close observer might
have beheld in his eye a still, but anxious,
expression
.
His unconscious wanderings and vacant
glances indicated correctly the doubting and
dissatisfied
spirit, lurking under, and poorly concealed
by the careless gesture and rather philosophic
swing of his graceful and manly person, as plying
his way through this or that clump of trees and
bushes, he sought to discover the track which
he had lost, and which now nowhere met his eye.
Though bold of heart, and well aware of the mode
of procedure in such cases, our traveller was in
no mood for a lodge through the night in that vast
contiguity of shade. He could have borne the
necessity as well as any other man; but he had no
love for a grassy couch, and a leafy bower,
and all those rural felicities about which the poets,
who know least, prate most; and persevering in
the search, while a prospect of success remained,
he went on, till utterly fatigued and hopeless, he
remounted his steed, and throwing the bridle upon
his neck, with something of the indifference of
despair
,
he plied his spurs, suffering the animal to
adopt his own course, which we shall see was
nevertheless interrupted by the appearance of
another
party upon the scene, whose introduction
we reserve for another chapter.
CHAPTER II.
Your purse is something heavyquite too much
For a fair youth to carrywe'll relieve you!
Are you ungrateful? Would you then deny us?
Thus
left to himself, the good steed of our
traveller
set off, without hesitation, and with a free
step, that promised, at least, to overcome space
hurriedly, if it attained not the desired destination.
The rider did not suffer any of his own doubts to
mar a progress so confidently begun, and a few
minutes carried the twain, horse and man, deeply,
as it were, into the very bowels of the forest. The
path taken by the steed grew every moment more
and more intricate and difficult of access, and, but
for the interruption already referred to, it is not
impossible that a continued course in the same
direction
would, in a little time, have brought them
to a full stop, from the sheer impregnability of the
wood. The close overhanging branches called
for continual watchfulness on the part of the rider,
and the broken road, the fallen trees, and frequent
brush interposed so many impediments to the free
passage of the steed, that his course, at the outset,
rather more rapid than comported with the fatigue
of the long day's journey, now sank into a
measured
walk, from which, on a sudden, and without
any cause apparent to his rider, he started with
evident alarm; his ears were quickened and erect,
his eye was fixed with almost human intelligence
upon the close copse that stretched itself in front,
and his pace grew more than ever staid and
deliberate
.
Our traveller was not unmindful of this
behaviour on the part of his good steed. He well
knew the capacity for observation, and the power
of scenting objects at a distance, possessed by the
brute creation over man, and his own senses were
accordingly and acutely enlisted in the scrutiny
thus begun. The section of the world in which
he journeyed was too sparingly supplied with good
citizens to render unquestionable all those who
might be met in the wild woods; and preparing
himself, as he well might, for any encounter and
every chance, the youth took the reins once more
in hand, and boldly, but slowly, spurred his steed
on the path. Still nothing was apparenthe heard
no stir in the brushwood, and had there been a
movement, the withered bush and broken branch
would have furnished some attestation. Half
doubting the correctness of his alarm, he spoke to
the animalwho still exhibited signs of
uneasiness
while
patting his neck familiarly,
Quietly, old Blucher, quietly.
But Blucher, though with a tread of marked
delay
and caution, exhibited no disposition to be quiet
in the genuine sense of the word. His manner
still showed alarm and restiveness; and just at the
moment when his rider began to feel some
impatience
at the dogged watchfulness which he
exhibtied
,
a shrill whistle which rung through the
forest from the copse in front of him, attested
fully the correctness of that sense in the
animal
which had so far outstripped and excelled
his own. He was not left much longer in doubt
as to the cause of the interruption. As the
horse in his advance went onward into the
narrow
pathway, now more than ever girdled with
thicket, and having a broken ascent upon a hill, the
cone of which was of some considerable elevation,
he veered partly round, and, so abruptly, as for an
instant to discompose the seat of our traveller,
which in ordinary circumstances would scarcely
have been the case. The occasion for this alarm was
soon understood, as, suddenly emerging from the
wood, a man who seemed to have been in waiting
abruptly stood before him, and directly on the path
he was pursuing. Our traveller, as we have
already
seen, was not altogether unprepared for
hostility
.
In addition to his pistols, which were well
charged and conveniently at hand, we may now
add that a weapon, in some cases far more certain,
lay concealed in his bosom. The appearance of
the stranger was not, however, so decided a
manifestation
of hostility as to permit of his acting with
any haste by the premature use of his defences;
and with a degree of coolness somewhat singular
perhaps in one so young, he simply observed
You alarm my horse, my good sir. Please you
to stand from the way.
Would you pass free of toll, young stranger,
that you tell me stand from the way? was the
reply, and with a manner of marked insolence,
which in a moment called the blood hurriedly into
the cheek of the youth, while his teeth were
suddenly
clenched together, as he gazed sternly upon
the intruder who thus addressed him in a style so
unfamiliar to his ears. The man appeared nothing
daunted, however, and met the glance of the
traveller with a corresponding haughtiness. He
wore an air of the most composed indifference,
not to say contempt, and resolutely maintained the
position in which he had first placed himself. Still
it did not seem, from appearances, that his designs
were altogether hostile. He wore no armsnone
at least which met the sight. His person was
small, and his limbs slight, yet affording no promise
Vol. I.B
of much activity; his face was not ill-favoured,
though a quick, piercing black eye shot forth glances
of a malignant description, which spoke the spirit
within more distinctly than even his outward
manner. His nose was long but not sharp, and
totally fleshless; the skin being drawn with much
tenacity so closely to the bones of the member, as
to occasion some apprehension of their finding their
way at length through the much tried restraints
upon them; his beard had been untrimmed
apparently
for many days, and a huge pair of
whiskers
,
that did not well accord with the diminutive
size of the cheeks on which they had taken up their
resting-place, completed an outline, not calculated
in anywise to inspire in the spectator any large
share of either good feeling or respect, and yet not
exactly provoking a very strong sensation of doubt
or dislike. Our traveller felt at once the difficulty
of deciding upon his pretensions. The untrimmed
beard and ill-adjusted whiskers were not so
unfrequent
in the wild woods as to occasion much
suspicion of those who might so wear them; and
although the manners of the intruder were rude
enough, he was not assured that such manners
were not in numberless cases characteristic of
persons
who evidently meant well. Thus doubting
and deliberating, the youth determined, while
maintaining a due degree of circumspection, to see
farther into the designs of his new acquaintance,
before taking any decisive step himself. He now
proceeded to reply to the speech, the manner
rather than the matter of which, had been so
offensive
to him.
You ask toll of memay I know for what I
must pay this toll, and who are you that require
it?
I can better ask than answer questions, young
sirmy education, in the latter respect, having
been most wofully neglected in my boyhood.
Ay, and in some other respects not less
important
,
retorted the youth, if I am to judge from
certain points in your bearing. But you mistake
your man, my very good sir. You shall play no
pranks with me, and unless you speak
respectfully
,
our parley must have as short a life, as, I take
it, our acquaintance will have.
It would scarcely be polite to contradict so
promising a gentleman as yourself, was the
response
;
but I am disposed to believe our intimacy
likely to lengthen, rather than diminish. I hate
to part over-soon with company that talks so well,
particularly in these woods, where, unless such a
chance come about as the present, the lungs of the
heartiest youth in the land would not be often apt
to find the echo they seek, though they cried for it
at the uttermost pitch of the pipe.
The look and the language of the speaker were
alike significant, and the sinister meaning of the
last sentence did not escape the notice of our hero.
His reply was calm, however, and his mind
perfectly
at ease and collected.
You are pleased to be eloquent, worthy sir
and, on any other occasion, I might not be
unwilling
to bestow my ear upon you; but as I have
yet to find my way out of this labyrinth, for the
use of which your facetiousness would have me pay
a tax, I must forego that satisfaction, and leave the
enjoyment for some better day.
You are well bred, I see, young sir, was the
reply, and this forms an additional reason why I
should not desire so soon to break our acquaintance.
If you have mistaken your road, what do you on
thiswhy are you in this part of the country,
which is many miles removed from any public
thoroughfare?
By what right do you ask this question? was
the hurried and unhesitating response of the person
so addressed. You are impertinent!
Softly, softly, young sir. Be not rash, and let
me recommend that you be more choice in the
adoption of your epithets. Impertinent is an ugly
word between gentlemen of our habit. Touching
my right to ask this or that question of young men
who lose the way, that's neither here nor there, and
is important in no way. But, I take it, I shall have
some right in this matter, seeing, young sir, that
you are upon the turnpike, and I am the
gatekeeper
who must take the toll.
A sarcastic smile passed over the lips of the man
as he uttered the sentence, which was as suddenly
succeeded, however, by an expression of gravity,
partaking of an air of the profoundest business.
The traveller surveyed him for a moment before
he replied, as if to ascertain in what point of view
properly to understand his conduct.
Turnpike! this is something new. I never
heard of a turnpike road and a gate for toll, in a
part of the world in which men, or honest ones at
least, are not yet commonly to be found; and you
think rather too lightly, my good sir, of my claim
to that most vulgar commodity called common
sense, if you suppose me capable of swallowing
this silly story.
Oh, doubtlessyou are a very sagacious young
man, I make no question, said the other, with a
sneerbut you will have to pay the turnpike for
all that.
You speak confidently on this point; but, if I
am to pay this turnpike, at least, I may be permitted
to know who is its proprietor.
To be sure you may. I am always well pleased
to satisfy the doubts and curiosity of young
travellers
who go abroad for information. I take you
to be one of this class.
Confine yourself, if you please, to the matter
in hand, sirI grow weary of this chat, said the
youth, with a haughty inclination, that seemed to
have its effect even upon him with whom he
spoke.
Your question is quickly answered. You
cannot but have heard of the Pony Clubhave
you not?
I must confess my utter ignorance of such an
institution. I have never heard even the name
before.
You have notthen really it is high time to
begin the work of enlightenment. You must know,
then, that the Pony Club is the proprietor of every
thing and every body, throughout the nation, and in
and about this section. It is the king, without let or
limitation of powers, for sixty miles around. Scarce
a man in Georgia but pays in some sort to its
support
and
judge and jury alike contribute to its
treasuries. Few dispute its authority, as you will
have reason to discover, without suffering condign
and certain punishment; and, unlike the tributaries
and agents of other powers, its servitors, like
myself
,
invested with jurisdiction over certain parts
and interests, sleep not in the performance of our
duties; but, day and night, obey its dictates, and
perform the various, always laborious, and
sometimes
dangerous functions which it imposes upon
us. It finds us in men, in money, in horses. It
assesses the Cherokees, and they yield a tithe, and
sometimes a greater proportion, of their ponies in
obedience to its requisitions. Hence indeed the
name of the club. It relieves young travellers,
B 2
like yourself, of their small changetheir
sixpences
;
and when they happen to have a good
patent lever, such an one as, it appears to me, a
smart young gentleman like yourself is very apt
to carry about with him, it is not scrupulous, but
helps them of that too, merely by way of
pas-time
.
And the ruffian chuckled in a half-covert manner
at his own pun.
Truly, a well-conceived sort of sovereignty,
and doubtless, sufficiently well served, if I may
infer from the representative before me. You
must do a large business in this way, most worthy
sir.
Why, that we do, and your remark reminds
me that I have quite as little time to lose as
yourself
.
You now understand, young sir, the toll you
have to pay, and the proprietor who claims it.
Perfectlyperfectly. You will not suppose
me dull again, most candid keeper of the Pony
Turnpike. But have you made up your mind, in
earnest, to relieve me of such trifling
incumbrances
as those you have just mentioned.
I should be strangely neglectful of the duties
of my station, not to speak of the discourtesy of
such a neglect to yourself, were I to do otherwise;
always supposing that you were burdened with
such incumbrances. I put it to yourself, whether
such would not be the effect of my omission.
It most certainly would, thou most frank and
candid of all the outlaws. Your punctiliousness
on this point of honour entitles you, in my mind,
to an elevation above and beyond all others of your
profession. I admire the grace of your manner,
in the commission of acts which the more tame
and temperate of our kind are apt to look upon as
irregular and unlovely. You, I see, have the true
notion of the thing.
The ruffian looked with some doubt upon the
youthinquiringly, as if to account in some way
for the singular coolness, not to say sarcastic
bitterness
of his replies and manner. There was
something
,
too, of a searching malignity in his glance,
that seemed to recognise in his survey, features
which brought into activity a personal emotion in
his own bosom, not at variance, indeed, with the
craft he was pursuing, but fully above and utterly
beyond it. Dismissing, however, the expression, he
continued in the manner and tone so tacitly
adopted between them,
I am heartily glad, most travelled young
gentleman
,
that your opinion so completely coincides
with my own, since it assures me I shall not be
compelled, as is sometimes the case in the
performance
of my duties, to offer any rudeness to one
seemingly so well taught as yourself. Knowing
the relationship between us so fully, you can have
no reasonable objection to conform quietly to all my
requisitions, and yield the toll-keeper his dues.
Our traveller had been long aware of the kind of
relationship between himself and his companion;
but, relying on his defences, and perhaps,
somewhat
too much on his own personal capacities of
defence; and, possibly, something curious to see
how far the love of speech in his assailant might
carry him in a dialogue of so artificial a character,
he forbore as yet a resort to violence. He found
it excessively difficult, however, to account for the
strange nature of the transaction so far as it had
gone; and the language of the knight of the road
seemed so inconsistent with his pursuit, that, at
intervals
,
he was almost led to doubt whether the
whole was not the clever jest of some country
sportsman, who, in the form of a levier of
contributions
upon the traveller, would make an
acquaintance
,
such as are frequent in the south, and
terminating
usually in a ride to a neighbouring plantation,
and pleasant accommodations as long as the
stranger
might think proper to avail himself of them. If,
on the other hand, he was in reality the ruffian he
represented himself, he knew not how to account for
his delay in the assaulta delay, to the youth's mind,
without an objectunless attributable to a temper
of mind like Robin Hood, and coupled in the person
before him as in that of the renowned king of the
outlaws, with a peculiar freedom and generosity of
habit, and a gallantry and adroitness which, in a
different field, had made him a knight worthy to
follow and fight for Baldwin and the Holy Cross.
Our hero was a
romanticist
, and all of these notions
came severally into his thoughts. Whatever might
have been the motives of conduct in the robber who
thus audaciously announced himself the member of
a club notorious on the frontiers of Georgia and
among the Cherokees for its daring outlawries,
our hero determined to keep up the game so long
as it continued such. After a brief pause, he
replied
to the above politely-expressed demand in
the following language:
Your request, most unequivocal sir, would
seem but reasonable; and so considering it at the
outset, I bestowed due reflection upon it.
Unhappily
,
however, for the Pony Club and its worthy
representative, I am quite too poorly provided with
worldly wealth at this moment to part with much
of it. A few shillings to procure you a cravat
such a one as you may get of Kentucky
manufacture
I
should not object to. Beyond this,
however
(and the difficulty grieves me sorely), I am
so perfectly incapacitated from doing any thing,
that I am almost persuaded, in order to the
bettering
of my condition, to pay the customary fees, and
applying to your honourable body for the privilege
of membership, procure those resources of a lavish
generosity which my necessity, and not my will,
prevents me from bestowing upon you.
A very pretty idea, young master, returned
he of the road; and under such circumstances,
your jest about the cravat from Kentucky is by
no means wanting in proper application. But the
fact is, our numbers are just now completeour
ranks are fulland the candidates for the honour
are so numerous as to leave little chance for an
applicant. You might be compelled to wait for a
long season, unless the Georgia Penitentiary
and Georgia Guard, which, by-the-way, are not
slow at such things, in order to the due promotion
of your wishes, shall create a vacancy in your
behalf.
Truly, the matter is of very serious regret,
with an air of much solemnity, replied the youth,
who seemed admirably to have caught up the spirit
of the dialogue,and it grieves me the more to
know, that, under this view of the case, I can no
more satisfy you than I can serve myself. It is
quite unlucky that your influence is insufficient to
procure me admission into your fraternity; since
it is impossible that I should pay the turnpike, when
the club itself, by refusing me membership, will not
permit me to acquire the means of doing so. So,
most worthy sir, as the woods grow momently
more dull and dark, and as I may have to ride far
for a supper, I am constrained, however unwilling
to leave good company, to bid you a fair evening,
and a long swing of fortune, most worthy knight
of the highway, and trusty representative of the
Pony Club.
With these words, the youth, gathering up the
bridle of the horse, and slightly touching him with
the rowel, would have proceeded on his course, but
the position of the outlaw underwent a
corresponding
change, and, grasping the rein of the animal,
he arrested his farther progress.
I am less willing to separate than yourself from
good company, gentle youth, as you may perceive;
since I so carefully restrain you from a ride over a
road so perilous as this. You have spoken like a
fair and able scholar this afternoon; and talents,
such as you possess, come too seldom into our
forests to suffer them, after so brief a sample, to
leave us so abruptly. You must come to terms
with the turnpike.
Take your hands from my horse, sirrah! was
the only response made by the youth; his tone and
manner changing with the corresponding change
in the situation of the parties. I would not do
you a harm willingly; for I want no man's blood
on my head, however well he may deserve his fate.
My pistols too, let me assure you, are much more
readily come at than my purse. Tempt me not to
the use of them; but stand from the way.
It may not be, replied the robber, with a
composure
and coolness that underwent no change;
your threats affect me not. I have not taken my
place here without a perfect knowledge of all its
dangers and consequences. You had better come
peaceably to terms; for, were it even the case that
you could escape me, which is very unlikely, you
have only to cast your eye up the path before you,
to be assured of the utter impossibility of escaping
those who aid me. The same glance will also
show you the toll-gate, which you could not see
before. Look ahead, young sir, and be wise in
time; and let me perform my duties without
hinderance.
Casting a furtive glance on the point indicated
by the ruffian, the youth saw, for the first time, a
succession of bars, in the form, and of the material,
usually employed among the farmers for fencing
purposes, completely crossing the narrow pathway
and precluding all passage. Approaching in the
direction of the place of strife, the same glance
assured him of the presence of two men, well
armed, and hurrying towards the scene with an air
of preparation that convinced him they were the
accomplices of the robber who had pointed to them
as such. The prospect grew more and more
perilous
,
and the youth, whose mind was one of that
make which avails itself of its energies seemingly
only in emergencies, with a moment's reflection,
beheld his true course, and hesitated not a single
moment in its adoption. He saw that something
more was necessary than to rid himself merely of
the ruffian immediately before him, and that an
unsuccessful
blow or shot would leave him entirely
at the mercy of the gang. To escape, a free rein
must be given to the steed, on which he felt
confident
he could rely; and, though prompted by the
most natural impulse to send a bullet through the
scull of his assailant, he wisely determined on a
course which, as it would be unlooked for, had
therefore a better prospect of success. Without
further pause, drawing suddenly from his bosom
the dirk-knife commonly worn in those regions,
and bending forward, he aimed a blow at the
ruffian, which, as he had anticipated, was
expertly
eludedthe assailant, sinking under the
neck of the steed, and relying on the strength
of the rein he still continued to hold to keep
him from falling, while at the same time he
kept the check upon the horse. This movement
was that which the youth had looked for and
desired
.
The blow was but a feint, for suddenly
turning the direction of the knife when his enemy
was out of its reach, he cut the bridle upon which
he hung, and the head of the horse, freed from the
painful restraint, was at once elevated in the air,
the suddenness of his motion whirling the ruffian
to the ground; while the rider, wreathing his hands
in the mane of the noble animal, gave him a free
spur, and plunged at once over the struggling
wretch, in whose cheek a glance of his hoof
effected a deep gash. The steed bounded forward
a few paces, nor did his rider for a moment seek
to restrain him, though advancing full up the hill
and in the teeth of his new enemies. Satisfied
that he was approaching their station, the
accomplices
of the foiled ruffian, who had seen the whole
affray, sunk into the covert; but what was their
mortification to perceive the traveller, though
without
any true command over his steed, by an adroit
use of the broken bridle, so wheel him round as to
bring him, in a few leaps, over the very ground of
the strife, and before the staggering robber had yet
fully arisen from the path. By this man\uvre he
placed himself in advance of the now
approaching
banditti. Driving his spurs resolutely and
unsparingly into the flanks of his horse, while
encouraging
him with well known words of cheer,
he rushed over the scene of his late struggle with
a velocity that set all restraint at defiancehis
late opponent scarcely being able to put himself in
safety. A couple of shots, that whistled wide of the
mark, announced his extrication so far from his
difficultybut, to his surprise, his enemies had been
at work behind him, and the edge of the copse
through which he was about to pass, was
blockaded
with bars in like manner with the path
in front. He heard the shouts of the ruffians
in the rearhe felt the danger, if not
impracticability
of his pausing for their removal; and,
in the spirit which had heretofore marked his
conduct
,
he determined upon the most daring
endeavour
.
Throwing off all restraint from his steed,
and fixing himself firmly in the stirrup and saddle,
he plunged onwards to the leap, and to the
chagrin
of the pursuers, who had relied much upon
the obstruction, and who now appeared in sight,
the noble animal, without a moment's reluctance,
cleared it handsomely. Another volley of pistol
shot rung in the ears of the youth, as he passed
the impediment, and he felt himself wounded in the
side. The wound gave him little concern at the
moment, for under the excitement of the strife, he
felt not even its smart; and turning himself upon
the saddle, he drew one of his own trusty weapons
from its case, and discharging it, by way of taunt,
in the faces of the outlaws, laughed aloud with
the exulting spirit of youth at the successful result
of an adventure, due entirely to his own perfect
coolness, and the warm courage which had been his
predominating feature from childhood. The
incident
just narrated had dispersed a crowd of gloomy
reflections, so that the darkness which now
overspread
the scene, coupled as it was with the
cheerlessness
of prospect before him, had but little
influence
upon his spirits. Still, ignorant of his course,
and beginning to be enfeebled by the loss of blood,
he moderated the speed of the noble animal whose
sagacity, not less than prowess, had done so much
towards his master's extrication, and gave up to
him the choice of direction. He did not, however,
relax so greatly in his progress as to permit of
his being overtaken by the desperates whom
he had foiled. He knew the danger and
hopelessness
of a second encounter with men
sufficiently
odious, in common report, to make him
Vol. I.C
doubly cautious, after the adventure so nearly
fatal. Exiled from society, after having acquired
a large taste for many of its enjoyments, they
found in the frontier impunity for those crimes
and offences, for the punishment of which it had
imposed ineffectual and defrauded penalties; and
conscious of no responsibility to divine or human
laws, a vindictive exacerbation of spirit, the result
of their tacit outlawry, had prompted them to
retort
upon men the stern severities of justice.
Without restraining his good steed, therefore, our
young traveller simply gauged his speed to his
capacities
,
as he entered upon a road which, in the dim
twilight, had something of the appearance of that
from which he had in the first instance so erringly
departed. He had not much time, however, for
observation, when a numbness seized upon his
frame, a strange sickness came over his heart, and
his grasp losing all further tenacity, he fell from his
horse without an effort upon the long grass, in
utter unconsciousness.
CHAPTER III.
And thus they grew apace, and thus they loved
How should they else, with every thought alike,
And each emotion? springing, too, at once,
As at a birth, their two hearts knit in one
And grew together; so, from parted stems,
Two trees will link in air their kindred arms,
And have but one life thence for evermore.
Not
to go back too greatly in our narrative, let
us change our ground; and leaving our youthful
traveller upon the greensward, as the night gathers
over him, let us endeavour to make the reader
somewhat better acquainted with the history upon
which we have commenced, and of the motive of
that adventurous journey which we have beheld
thus rudely interrupted.
Ralph Colleton, the youth already described, was
the only son of a Carolinian of the same name,
originally of fine fortune, but who, from
circumstances
,
had been compelled to fly from the place
of his nativity; an adventurer, struggling with a
proud mind and a thousand difficulties, in the less
known but more productive regions of Tennessee.
Born to wealth, seemingly adequate to all
reasonable
desires, a fine plantation, numerous slaves, and
the host of friends who necessarily come with
such a condition, his individual improvidence,
thoughtless extravagance, and lavish mode of life
a habit not uncommon in the South,had rendered
it necessary, at the age of fifty, when the mind, not
less than the body, requires repose rather than
adventure
,
that he should emigrate from the place of
his birth; and with resources diminished to an
existence
almost nominal, break ground once more in
unknown forests, and commence the toils and
troubles of life anew. With an only son (the
youth before us) then a mere boy, and no other
family, Colonel Ralph Colleton did not hesitate at
such an exile. He had found out the worthlessness
of men's professions at a period not very remote from
the general knowledge of his loss of fortune: and
having no other connexion claiming from him either
countenance or support, and but a single relative
from whom separation might be painful, he felt,
comparatively speaking, but few of the privations
usually following such a removal. An elder
brother
,
like himself a widower, with a single child, a
daughter, formed the whole of his kindred left
behind
him in Carolina; and, as between the two
brothers there existed, at all times, some leading
dissimilar points of disposition and character, an
occasional correspondence, due rather to form than
to affection, served all necessary purposes in
keeping
up the sentiment of kindred in their bosoms.
There were but few real affinities which could
bring them together. They never could altogether
understand, and certainly had but a limited desire
to appreciate or to approve many of the several
and distinct habits of one another, and thus they
separated with but few sentiments of genuine
concern
.
William Colleton, the elder brother, was
the proprietor of several thousand highly valuable
and pleasantly situated acres, upon the waters of
the Santeea river which irrigates a region in the
state of South Carolina, notorious for its wealth,
lofty pride, polished manners, and noble and
considerate
hospitality. Affluent equally with his
younger brother by descent, marriage had still
further contributed towards the growth of
possessions
,
which a prudent management had always kept
entire and always improving. Such was the
condition
of William Colleton, the uncle of the young
Ralph, then a mere child, when he was taken by
his father into Tennessee.
There the fortune of the adventurer still
maintained
its ancient aspect. He had bought lands,
and engaged in trade, and made sundry efforts in
various and honourable ways, but without success.
Vocation after vocation had a common and certain
termination, and after many years of profitless
experiment
,
the ways of prosperity were as far remote
from his knowledge and as perplexing to his pursuit,
as at the first hour of his adventure. In worldly
concerns
he stood just where he started fifteen years
before, with this difference for the worse, however,
that he had grown older in this scope of time, less
equal to the tasks of adventure, and with the moral
energies checked as they had been by continual
disappointments, recoiling in despondency and
gloom with trying emphasis upon a spirit otherwise
noble and sufficiently daring for every legitimate
and not unwonted species of trial and occasion.
Still he had learned little, beyond
hauteur
and
querulousness, from the lessons of experience.
Economy was not more the inmate of his dwelling
than when he was blessed with the large income
of his birthright; but, extravagantly generous as
ever, his house was the abiding-place of a most
lavish and unwise hospitality.
His brother, William Colleton, on the other hand,
with means hourly increasing, exhibited a
disposition
narrowing at times into a selfishness the
most pitiful. He did not, it is true, forego or forget
any of those habits of freedom and intercourse in
his household and with those about him, which
C 2
forms so large a peculiarity among the people of
the south. He could give a dinner, and furnish an
ostentatious entertainmentlodge his guest in the
style of a prince for weeks together, nor exhibit a
feature likely to induce a thought of intrusion in
the mind of his inmate. In public, the populace
had no complaints to urge of his penuriousness;
and in all outward shows he manifested the same
general features which marked the habit of the
class to which he belonged. But his selfishness
lay in things not so much on the surface. It was
more deep and abiding in its character; and
consisted
in the false estimate which he made of the
things around him. He had learned to value wealth
as a substitute for mind, for moralsfor all that is
lofty, and all that should be leading, in the
consideration
of society. He valued few things beside. He
had different emotions for the rich from those which
he entertained for the poor; and from perceiving
that among men, money could usurp all places
could defeat virtue, command respect denied to
morality and truth, and secure a real worship,
when the deity must be content with shows and
symbolshe gradually gave it the place in his
regard
,
which petrified the genuine feeling. He
valued it not for itself, and not with any disposition
simply to procure and to increase the quantities in
his possession. He was by no means a miser or a
mercenary, and his regards were given to it as the
visible embodiment of power little less than divine.
He was, in short, that worst of all possible
pretenders
,
the exclusive, the aristocrat, on the score of
his property.
In one respect, however,and this had somewhat
created or revived the sympathies of boyhood
between
themthe fortunes of the two brothers had
been by no means dissimilar. After a pleasant
union of a few years, they had lost their
respective
wives; a single child preserving for each
a miniature and beloved likeness of the parents
whom, though representing, they had never known.
A son, to the younger brother, had concentrated the
affections of that exile, whose chief sorrows on
the subject of his declining fortunes and fruitless
endeavours, grew entirely out of those thoughts
about the future which every look upon his boy was
calculated to provoke; while, to William Colleton,
the elder, the young and beautiful Edith, a few
months older than her cousin Ralph, repaired
greatly the absence of her mother, and neutralized
in part, if in some respects she did not subdue,
some few of the less favourable features in the
character
of the father.
Separated by several hundred miles of
uncultivated
and seldom travelled forest, the brothers did
not frequently see one another; but they
corresponded
,
and when Ralph was fifteen, a sudden
humour of amiability on the part of his uncle,
with a reluctant consent wrung with great
difficulty
from his father, transferred the youth, with
the view to his education, to the control and
direction of his uncle. The two cousins met in
Georgia for the first time, and after a brief journey
together in the more populous parts of that large,
though at that period, sparsely settled state, Ralph
was despatched to College.
The separation of the son from the father,
however
beneficial to the former in some respects, was
fatal to the latter. The privation added to his
sufferings
,
and his defeats of fortune received
additional
influence and exaggerated sting from the
solitude following his departure. He had
anticipated
this result; and it was only when his brother,
with a more earnest appeal to his fraternal regard
than he had been capable for many long years of
making, urged him not to defeat by a weak
selfishness
the parental plan which he had formed for the
benefit of the youth, that he consented to the sacrifice.
The charge of selfishness brought about his resolve,
and his noble heart determined to suffer in silence
for the good of his son. He no longer withheld his
consent, and attending the youth to Georgia where
his brother had engaged to meet him, he delivered
him to his uncle, and after some days' pause, he
parted with, never again to behold, him. A few
months only had elapsed, when the intelligence of
his death was received by the orphan and
highly-sensitive
boy. He died, like many similar spirits,
of no known disorder.
From fifteen to nineteen is no very long leap in
the history of youth. We will make it now, and
place the young Ralphnow something older,
returned
from college, finely formed, intellectual,
handsome, vivacious, manly, spirited, and
susceptible
,
as such a person should beonce again in
close intimacy with his beautiful cousin. The
season
which had done so much for him, had been no
less liberal with her; and we now survey her, the
expanding flower, all bloom and fragrance, a
tribute
of the waning spring, in the bosom of the more
forward summer.
Ralph came from college to his uncle's domicile,
now his only home. The circumstances of his
father's fate and fortune, continually acting upon
his mind and sensibilities from boyhood, had made
his character a marked and singular one,proud,
jealous, and sensitive to an extreme which was
painful
not merely to himself, but at times to others.
But he was noble, lofty, sincere, without a touch of
meanness in his composition, above
circumlocution
,
with a simplicity of character strikingly
great, but without any thing like puerility or
weakness
.
The children,for such, in reference to their
experience
,
we may almost call themhad learned to
recognise
in the progress of a few seasons but a single
existence. Ralph looked only for Edith, and cared
nothing for other sunlight; while Edith, with scarcely
less reserve than her bolder companion, had speech
and thought for few besides Ralph. Circumstances
contributed not a little to what would appear the
natural growth of this mutual dependance. They
were perpetually left together, and without many of
those tacit and readily understood restraints,
unavoidably
accompanying the presence of others
older than themselves. Residing, save at few brief
intervals, at the plantation of Col. Colleton, they
saw little and knew less of society; and the
worthy
colonel, not less ambitious than proud, having
become a politician, had still further added to those
opportunities of intimacy which had now become
so important to them both. Half of his time
was taken up in public matters. A leader of his
party in the section of country in which he
lived, he was always busy in the responsibilities
imposed upon him by such a station; and what
with canvassing at election-polls, and
muster-grounds
,
and dancing attendance as a silent voter at
the halls of the state regislature, to the membership of
which his constituents had returned him, he saw
but little of his family, and they almost as little of
him. His influence grew unimportant with his
wards, in proportion as it obtained vigour with
his factionwas seldom referred to by them,
and, perhaps, such was the rapid growth of their
affections, would have been but little regarded. He
appeared to take it for granted, that having
provided
them with all the necessaries called for by
life, he had done quite enough for the benefit of its
members; and actually gave far less of his
consideration
to his own and only child than he did to
his plantation, and the success of a party measure,
involving possibly the office of door-keeper to the
house, or of tax-collector to the district. The taste
for domestic life, which at one period might have
been held with him exclusive, had been entirely
swallowed up and forgotten in his public relations;
and entirely overlooking the fact, that in the silent
goings-on of time, the infantile will cease to be so,
he saw not that the children he had brought
together
but a few years before might not with reason
be considered children any longer. Children
indeed
!
What years had they not livedwhat
volumes
of experience in human affections and
feelings
had the influence and genial warmth of a
Carolina
sun not unfolded to their spirits in the few sweet
and uninterrupted seasons of their intercourse.
How imperious were the dictates of that nature, to
whose immethodical but honest teachings they had
been almost entirely given up. They lived together,
walked together, rode togetherread in the same
books, conned the same lessons, studied the same
prospects, saw life through the common medium
of mutual associations; and lived happy, only in
the sweet unison of emotions, gathered at a
common
fountain, and equally dear, and equally
necessary
to them both. And this is lovethey loved!
They loved, but the discovery was yet to be
made by them. Living in its purest luxuries, in
the perpetual communion of the only one
necessary
objecthaving no desire and as little prospect
of changeignorant of and altogether unlessoned
by the vicissitudes of lifeenjoying the sweet
association
which had been the parent of that passion,
dependant now entirely upon its continuance
they had been content, and had never given
themselves
any concern to analyze its origin, or to find
for it a name. A momentary doubtthe presages
of a dim perspectivewould have taught them better.
Had there been a single moment of discontent in their
lives at this period, they had not remained so long
in such ignorance. The fear of its loss can alone
teach us the true value of our treasure. But the
discovery was at hand.
A pleasant summer afternoon in June found the
two young people, Ralph and Ediththe former
something over nineteen years of age, and the
latter
in the same neighbourhood, half busied, half
idle, in the long and spacious piazza of the family
mansion. They could not be said to have been
employed, for Edith rarely made much progress
with the embroidering needle and delicate fabric
in her hands, while Ralph, something more absorbed
in a romance of the day, evidently exercised little
concentration of mind in scanning its contents.
He skimmed at first, rather than studied the pages
before him; conversing occasionally with the young
maiden, who, sitting beside him, occasionally glanced
at the volume in his hand, with something of an air of
discontent that it should take even so much of his
regard
from herself. As he proceeded, however, in its
perusal, the story grew upon him, and he became
unconscious of her occasional efforts to control his
attention. The needle of Edith seemed also
disposed
to avail itself of the aberrations of its
mistress
and rise in rebellion; and, having pricked
her finger more than once, in the effort to proceed
with her work, while her eyes wandered to her
companion, she at length threw down the gauzy
fabric upon which she had been so partially
employed
,
and hastily rising from her seat, passed into
the adjoining apartment. Her departure was not
attended to by her companion, who for a time
continued his perusal of the book. No great while,
however, elapsed, before rising also from his seat,
with a hasty exclamation of surprise, he threw down
the volume, and followed her into the room, where
she sat pensively meditating over thoughts and
feelings as vague and inscrutable to her mind as
they were clear and familiar to her heart. With a
degree of warm impetuosity, even exaggerated
beyond
his usual manner, which bore, at all times,
this characteristic, he approached her, and seizing
her hand passionately in his, exclaimed hastily
Edith, my sweet Edith, how unhappy that
book has made me!
How so, Ralphwhy should it make you
unhappy
?
It has taught me much, Edithvery much, in
the last half hour. It has spoken of privation and
disappointment as the true elements of life, and
has shown me so many pictures of society in such
various situations, and with so much that I feel
assured must be correct, that I am unable to resist
its impressions. We have been happyso happy,
Edith, and for so many years, that I could not
bear to think that either of us should be less so;
and yet that volume has taught me, in the story of
parallel fortunes with ours, that it may be so. It
has given me a long lesson in the sometime and
hollow economy of that world which men seek,
and name society. It has told me that we, or I,
at least, may be made and kept miserable for ever.
How, Ralph, tell me, I pray youhow should
that book have taught you this strange notion?
speak! What book is it? was the gasping
exclamation
of the astonished girlastonished no
less by the impetuous manner, than the strong
language
of the youth, as with the tenderest concern,
she laid her hand upon his arm, while her eyes,
full of the liveliest interest, yet moistened with a
tearful apprehension, were fixed earnestly upon his
own.
It is a foolish book, a very foolish booka story
of false sentiment, and of mock and artificial
feelings
,
of which I know, and care to know, nothing.
But it has told me much that I feel is true, and that
chimes with my own experience. It has told me
much that, as it is true, I am glad to have been
taught. Hear me then, dear Edith, and smile not
carelessly at my words, for I have now learned to
tremble when I speak to you, in fear lest I should
offend you.
She would have spoken words of assurance
she would have taught him to think better of her
affections and their strength; but his impetuosity
checked her in her speech.
I know what you would say, and my heart
thanks you for it, as if its very life had depended upon
the utterance. You would tell me to have no such
fear; but the fear is a portion of myself nowit is
my heart itself. Hear me then, Edith,my Edith,
if you will so let me name you.
Her hand rested on his assuringly, with a gentle
pressure. He continued
Hitherto we have lived with each other, only
with each otherwe have loved each other, and I
have almost only loved you. Neither of us, Edith
(may I believe it of you?) have known much of
any other affection. But how long is this to last?
that bookwhere is it? but no matterit has
taught me, that now, when a few months will carry
us both into the world, it is improper that our
relationship
should continue. It says we cannot be the
children any longer that we have beenthat such
intercourse
,
Vol. I.D
I can now perceive why, would be
injurious
to you. Do you understand me?
The blush of a first consciousness came over
the cheek of the maiden as she withdrew her hand
from his passionate clasp.
Ah! I see already, he exclaimed: you too
have learned the lesson. And is it thusand we
are happy no longer!
Ralph!she endeavoured to speak, but could
proceed no further, and her hand was again, silently
and without objection, taken into the grasp of his.
The youth, after a brief pause, in a tone which
though it had lost much of its impetuousness, was
yet full of stern resolve, proceeded,
Hear me, Edithbut a worda single word.
I love youbelieve me, my sweet Edith, I love
you.
The effect of this declaration was scarcely such
as the youth had desired. She had been so much
accustomed to his warm admiration, indicated
frequently
in phrases such as these, that it had the
effect of restoring to her much of that
self-possession
,
of which the nature of the previous dialogue
had not a little deprived her; and in the most
natural manner in the world, she repliedperhaps
too, we may add, with much of the artlessness of
artWhy, to be sure you do, cousin Ralph,it
would be something strange indeed if you did not.
I believe you love me, as I am sure you can never
doubt how much you are beloved by me!
Cousin
Ralph
Cousin
Ralph! exclaimed the
youth with something of his former impetuousness,
emphasizing ironically as he spoke the unfortunate
family epithetAh, Edith, you will not
understand
menor indeed, an hour ago, should I
altogether
have understood myself. Suddenly, dear
Edith, however, as I read the passages of that
book, the thought darted through my brain like
lightning, and I saw into my own heart, as I had
never been permitted to see into it before. I there
saw how much I loved younot as my cousin
not as my sister, as you sometimes would have
me call you, but as I will not call you againbut
asas
As what?
As my wifeEdithas my own, own wife!
He clasped her hand in his, while his head sank,
and his lips were pressed upon the taper and
trembling
fingers which grew cold and powerless in his
grasp.
What a volume was at that moment opened,
for the first time, before the gaze and understanding
of the half-affrighted and deep-throbbing heart of
that gentle girl. The veil which had concealed its
burning mysteries was torn away in that instant.
The key to its secret places was in her hands, and
she was bewildered with her own discoveries.
Her cheeks alternated between the pale and
crimson
of doubt and hope. Her lips quivered
convulsively
,
and an unbidden but not painful
suffusion
overspread the warm brilliance of her deep
blue eye. She strove, ineffectually, to speak; her
words came forth in broken murmurs; her voice
had sunk into a sigh; she was dumb. The youth
once more took her hand into his, as, speaking with
a suppressed tone, and with a measured slowness
which had something in it of extreme melancholy,
he broke silence:
And have I no answer, Edithand must I
believe
that for either of us there should be other
loves than those of childhoodthat new affections
may usurp the place of old onesthat there may
come a time, dear Edith, when I shall see an arm,
not my own, about your waist, and the eyes that
would look on no prospect if you were not a part
of it, may be doomed to that fearfullest blight of
beholding your lips smiling and pressed beneath
the lips of another?
Never, oh never, Ralph; speak no more, I
beseech
you, in such language. You do me wrong
in thisI have not thought of thisI shall not
think of itI will be yours, and yours only, Ralph
yours only as you have ever known me.
She spoke with a sweet and life-giving energy;
her head, from which the light brown hair streamed
down in profuse volumes, was settled upon his
shoulderhis arms encircled her waist; and his
lips rested passionately upon her burning cheek,
when a third party entered the room in the person
of Colonel Colleton.
CHAPTER IV.
You have done wrong and should be rated, sir
Look to itfor the punishment's at hand,
When you do err again.
He shall not bear it thus so loftily
He is no lord of mineI am no slave,
To wait and watch his nod, to bend the knee,
And bide reproof, and seek applause from him,
And fetch and carry in his service thus!
The
glance of Colonel Colleton indicated no
small astonishment. He was now for the first
time made conscious of the rapid progress of events,
and the effects which a few comprehensive years
had had upon his household. His daughter, at that
moment, seemed much taller than he had ever before
seen her; and, as with a stern expression, his eye
settled upon the fine and speaking features of Ralph,
the youth certainly grew more than ever erect.
There was something in the glance of his uncle
which pleased him not; and, proudly sensitive, his
soul rose in arms at the thought that his relative was
desirous of assuming a new position of relationship
to which he felt not the slightest disposition to
yield assent. The countenance of Edith was full
of a certain consciousness, than which, at such a
period, no expression could be more sweetly
natural. Still, the look of her father, as, without
advancing, he stood at the entrance, with fixed eye
scanning the young offenders, had little of
encouragement
.
Though one, who, at no time, had
overmuch
troubled himself with his child, he had never
been positively unkind; at least, though neglectful,
he had not been stern; consequently, the features
which he now wore were somewhat unwonted.
Struck, therefore, by contrariant emotions into
dumbness, the young maiden uttered no word; but
in silence, following the direction of his finger, she
left the presence of her father; not however
without
stealing, as it were by instinct, a gentle and
rather confident glance at her more assured lover.
The departure of Edith was the signal for that issue
for which the two parties were evidently
preparing
.
Colonel Colleton, having mustered his storms,
approached for the attack; his looks were dark
and unpromising; his glances were addressed
searchingly to the youth, who, somewhat chafed
with their unusual expression, returned him look
for look, while his own brows, unconsciously, also
grew lowering and dark. These preliminaries
were, however, but the work of a single instant;
the colonel broke the silence, at last, by the brief
inquiry.
And what, Ralph, am I to understand from this?
Why, uncle, what should you understand, but
D 2
that Edith and myself have discovered that we
are something more than cousins to each other?
Indeed! and how long is it, I pray, since you
have made this discovery, fair nephew? was the
response, with a dryness of phrase and manner
nowise
seductive.
Within the hour, sir. Not that we have not
always loved each other, uncle; but that, until this
moment, we had not been conscious of the true
nature
of our feelings.
The youth replied with a simplicity the most
provoking to the colonel, who, it appears, had
taken it for granted that his disinclination to such
a proceeding should have been intuitively
understood
.
And with what reason, sir, should you suppose
that I would sanction such a passion? what, I pray
you, are your pretensions to the hand of Edith
Colleton? were the haughty interrogations.
My pretensionsthe hand of Edith!were
the involuntary exclamations of the youth. Do
I hear you rightly, sir? let me not misunderstand
you, uncle?
My words are as I have said them. They are
sufficiently explicit. You need not misunderstand
them. What, I ask, are your pretensions to the
hand of my daughter, and how is it that you have
so far forgotten yourself as thus to abuse my
confidence
,
stealing into the affections of my child?
Uncle, I have abused no confidence, and will
not submit to any charge that would dishonour me.
What I have done has been done openly, before all
eyes, and without resort to cunning or contrivance.
I must do myself the justice to believe that you
knew all this without the necessity of my speech,
and even while your lips spoke the contrary.
You are bold, Ralph, and seem to have
forgotten
that you are yet but a mere boy. You
forget your years and mine.
No, sirpardon me when I so speakbut it
is you who have forgotten them. Was it well to
speak as you have spoken? proudly replied the
youth.
Ralph, you have forgotten much, or have yet
to be taught many things. You may not have
violated confidence, but
I
have not
violated confidence! was the
abrupt
and somewhat impetuous response, and will
not have it spoken of in that manner. It is not
true that I have abused any trust, and the
assertion
which I make shall not therefore be
understood
as a mere possibility.
The uncle was something astounded by the
almost fierce manner of his nephew; but the only
other effect of this expression was simply, while it
diminished his own testiness of manner in his
speeches, to add something to the severity of their
character. he knew the indomitable spirit of the
youth, and his pride was enlisted in the desire for
its overthrow.
You are yet to learn, Ralph Colleton, I
perceive
,
the difference and distance between yourself
and my daughter. You are but a youth, yet
quite too young to think of such ties as those
of marriage, and to make any lasting
engagement
of that nature; but even were this not the
case, I am entirely ignorant of those pretensions
which should prompt your claim to the hand of
Edith.
Had Colonel Colleton been a prudent and
reflective
manhad he, indeed, known much, if any thing,
of human nature, he would have withheld the latter
part of this sentence. He must have seen that its
effect would only irritate a spirit needing an
emollient. The reply was instantaneous.
My pretensions, Colonel Colleton? You have
twice uttered that word in my ears, and with
reference
to this subjectlet me understand you. If
you would teach me by this sentence the
immeasurable
individual superiority of Edith over
myself
,
in all things, whether of mind, or heart, or
person, the lesson is gratuitousI need no teacher
to this end. I acknowledge its truth, and none on
this point can more perfectly agree with you than
myself. But if, looking beyond these particulars,
you would have me recognise in myself an
inferiority
marked and singular, in a fair comparison with
other menif, in short, you would convey an
indignity
;
andbut you are my father's brother,
sir! and the blood mounting to his forehead, and
his heart swelling, the youth turned proudly away,
and rested his head upon the mantel.
Not so, Ralph; you are hasty in your thought,
not less than in its expression; said his uncle,
soothingly. I meant not what you think. But
you must be aware, nephew, that my daughter,
not less from the fortune which will be exclusively
hers, and her individual accomplishments, than
from the leading political station which her father
fills, will be enabled to have a choice in the
adoption
of a suitor, which this childish passion might
defeat.
Mine is no childish passion, sir; though young,
my mind is not apt to vary in its tendencies; and,
unlike that of the mere politician, has little of
inconsistency
in its predilections with which to
rebuke itself. But, I understand you. You have
spoken of her fortune, and that reminds me that I
had a father, not less worthy, I am surenot less
generous, I feelbut certainly far less prudent than
hers. I understand you, sir, perfectly.
If you mean, Ralph, by this sarcasm, that my
considerations are those of wealth, you mistake me
much. The man who seeks my daughter must
not look for a sacrifice; she must win a husband
who has a name, a high placewho has a standing
in society. Your tutors, indeed, speak of you in
fair terms; but the public voice is every thing in
our country. When you have got through your
law studies, and made your first speech, we will
talk once more upon this subject.
And when I have obtained admission to the
practice of the law, do you say that Edith shall be
mine?
Nay, Ralph, you again mistake me; I only
say, it will be then time enough to consider the
matter.
Uncle, this will not do for me. Either you
sanction, or you do not. You mean something by
that word pretensions which I am yet to
understand
;
my name is Colleton, like your own,
and
There was a stern resolve in the countenance of
the colonel, which spoke of something of the same
temper with his impetuous nephew, and the cool
and haughty sentence which fell from his lips
in reply, while arresting that of the youth, was
galling to the proud spirit of the latter, whom it
chafed nearly into madness.
Why, true, Ralph, such is your name indeed;
and your reference to this subject now, only
reminds
me of the too free use which my brother
made of it when he bestowed it upon a woman so
far beneath him and his family in all possible
respects
.
There again, sir, there again! It is my mother's
poverty that pains you. She brought my father
no dowry. He had nothing of that choice
prudence
which seems to have been the guide of others
of our family in the bestowment of their affections.
He did not calculate the value of his wife's income
before he suffered himself to become enamoured
of her. I see it, sirI am not ignorant.
If I speak with you calmly, Ralph, it is because
you are the indweller of my house, and because I
have a pledge to my brother in your behalf.
Speak freely, sir, let not this scruple trouble
you any longer. It shall not trouble me; and I
shall be careful to take early occasion to release
you most effectually from all such pledges.
Colonel Colleton proceeded as if the last speech
had not been uttered.
Edith has a claim in society which shall not be
sacrificed. Her father, Ralph, did not descend to
the hovel of the miserable peasant, choosing a wife
from the inferior grade, who, without education,
and ignorant of all refinement, could only appear a
blot upon the station to which she had been raised.
Her mother, sir, was not a woman obscure and
uneducated, for whom no parents could be found.
What means all this, sir? Speak, relieve me
at once, Colonel Colleton. What know you of my
mother?
Nothingbut quite as much as your father
ever knew. It is sufficient that he found her in a
hovel, without a name, and with the silly romance
of his character through life, he raised her to a
position
in society which she could not fill to his
honour
,
and which, finally, working upon his pride and
sensibility, drove him into those extravagancies
which in the end produced his ruin. I grant that
she loved him with a most perfect devotion, which
he too warmly returned, but what of that?she
was still his destroyer.
Thus sternly did the colonel unveil to the eyes
of Ralph Colleton a portion of the family picture
which he had never been permitted to survey
before.
Cold drops stood on the brow of the now nerveless
and unhappy youth. He was pale, and his eyes
were fixed for an instant; but, suddenly recovering
himself, he rushed hastily from the apartment
before
his uncle could interpose to prevent him. He
heard not or heeded not the words of entreaty
which called him back; but proceeding at once to
his chamber, carefully fastened the entrance, and
throwing himself upon his couch, found relief from
the deep mental agony thus suddenly brought upon
him in a flood of tears.
For the first time in his life, deriving his feeling
in this particular rather from the opinions of society
than from any individual consciousness of
debasement
,
he yet felt a sentiment of humiliation
working
in his breast. His mother he had little known,
but his father's precepts and familiar conversation
had impressed upon him, from his childhood, a
feeling for her of the deepest and most unqualified
regard. This feeling was not lessened, though
rebuked
,
by the development so unnecessarily and
so wantonly conveyed. It taught a new lesson
of distrust for his uncle, whose harsh manner and
ungenerous insinuations, in the progress of the
preceding half-hour, had lost him not a little of
the youth's esteem. He felt that the motive of his
informer was not less unkind than was the
information
painful and oppressive; and his mind, now
more than ever excited and active from this thought,
went on discussing from point to point all existing
relations, until a stern resolve to leave, that very
night, the dwelling of one whose hospitality had
been made a matter of special reference, was the
only and settled conclusion to which his pride
could possibly come.
The servant reminded him of the supper-hour,
but the summons was utterly disregarded. The
colonel himself condescended to notify the
stubborn
youth of the same important fact, but with
almost as little effect. Without opening his door,
he signified his indisposition to join in the usual
repast, and thus closed the conference.
I meet him at the table no morenot at his
table, at least, was the muttered speech of Ralph,
as he heard the receding footsteps of his uncle.
He had determined, though without any distinct
object in view, upon leaving the house and
returning
to Tennessee where he had hitherto resided.
His excited spirits would suffer no delay, and that
very night was the period chosen for his departure.
Few preparations were necessary. With a fine
horse of his own, the gift of his father, he knew
that the course lay open. The long route he had
more than once travelled before; and he had no
fears, though he well knew the desolate character
of the journey, in pursuing it alone. Apart from
this, he loved adventure for its own sake. The
first lesson which his father had taught him, even
in boyhood, was that daring of trial which alone
can bring about the most perfect manliness. With a
stout heart and with limbs not less so, the difficulties
before him had no thought in his mind; there was
buoyancy enough in the excitement of his spirit at
that moment to give even a pleasurable aspect to
the difficulties gathering before him.
At an early hour he commenced the work of
preparation: he had little trouble in this respect.
He studiously selected from his wardrobe such
portions of it as had been the gift of his uncle, all
of which he carefully excluded from among the
contents of the little portmanteau which readily
comprised the residue. His travelling-dress was
quickly adjusted; and not omitting a fine pair of
pistols and a dirk, which may be held in the
south and south-west legitimate companions, he
found few cares for other arrangement. One
token alone of Editha small miniature linked
with his own, taken a few seasons before, when
both were children, by a strolling artistsuspended
by a chain of the richest gold, was carefully hung
about his neck. It grew in value, to his mind, at
a moment when he was about to separateperhaps
for everfrom its sweet original.
At midnight, when all was silenthis
portmanteau
under his armbooted, spurred, and ready
for travelRalph descended to the lower story, in
which slept the chief servant of the house. Csar
was a favourite with the youth, and he had no
difficulty
in making himself understood. The worthy
black was thunderstruck with his determination.
Ky! Mass Ralph, how you talk! what for
you go dis time o'night? What for you go 't all?
The youth satisfied him, in a manner as evasive
and brief as possible, and urged him in the
preparation
of his steed for the journey. But the worthy
negro absolutely refused to sanction the
proceeding
unless he were permitted to go along with
him. He used not a few strong arguments for this
purpose.
And what we all for do here, when you leff?
'speck ebbery ting be dull, wuss nor ditch-water.
Nomore funno more shuffle-foot. Old masser no
lika de fiddle, and nebber hab party and jollication
like udder people. Don't tink I can stay here,
Mass Ralph, after you gone; 'spose you no 'jection I
go 'long wid you? You leff me I take de swamp,
sure as a gun.
No, Csar, you are not mineyou belong to
your young mistress. You must stay and wait
upon her.
Ha! was the quick response of the black,
Vol. I.E
with a significant smirk upon his lip, and with a
cunning emphasisenty I seewhat for I hab
eye if I no see wid em? I 'speck young misses
hab no 'jection for go tooeh, Mass Ralph! all you
hab for do is for ax em!
The eye of the youth danced with a playful
light, as if a new thought, and not a disagreeable
one, had suddenly broken in upon his brain; but
the expression lasted but for an instant. He
overruled
all the hopes and wishes of the sturdy black,
who, at length, with a manner the most desponding,
proceeded to the performance of the required duty.
A few moments sufficed, and with a single look to
the window of his mistress, which spoke unseen
volumes of love, leaving an explanatory letter for
the perusal of father and daughter, though
addressed
only to the latterhe gave the rough hand
of his sable friend a cordial pressure, and was
soon hidden from sight by the thickly spreading
foliage of the long avenue. It is scarcely
necessary
to inform the reader, that the youth, whose
escape in a preceding chapter we have already
narrated, and Ralph Colleton of the present, are
one and the same person.
He had set forth, as we have seen, under the
excitation of feelings strictly natural; but which,
subtracting from the strong common sense
belonging
to his character, had led him prematurely into
an adventure, having no distinct purposes, and
promising largely of difficulty. What were his
thoughts of the future, what his designs, we are
not prepared to say. His character was of a firm
and independent kind; and the probability is, that
looking to the profession of the law, in the study
of which noble science his mind had been for some
time occupied, he had contemplated its future
practice in those portions of Tennessee in which his
father had been known, and where he himself had
passed sundry very pleasant years of his own life.
With economy, a moderate talent, and habits of
industry, he was well aware that, in those regions,
the means of life are with little difficulty
attainable
by those who are worthy and will adventure.
Let us now return to the wayfarer, whom we
have left in that wildest region of the then little-settled
state of Georgiadoubly wild as forming the
debateable
land between the savage and the civilized
partaking of the ferocity of the one, with the
skill, cunning, and cupidity of the other.
CHAPTER V.
'Tis a wild spot, and hath a gloomy look
The bird sings never merrily in the trees,
And Nature smiles not oft, as is her wont
But, cheerlyman is there.
At
first, not altogether insensible at the time of
his fall, our traveller for a few moments remained
conscious of his peril; and a renewed exercise of
the mental energies, brought about, and for a little
while sustained, an increased consciousness, which
perhaps rather added to his pain. It taught him
his own weakness, when he strove vainly to
support
himself against the tree to which he had
crawled; and in despair, the acuteness of which
was only relieved by the friendly stupor, arising
from the loss of blood, which came to his aid, he
closed his eyes, and muttering a brief sentence,
which might have been a prayer, he resigned
himself
to his fate.
But he was not thus destined to perish. He had
not lain many minutes in this situation when the
tones of a strong voice rang through the forest.
There was a whoop and halloo, and then a catch
of song, and then a shrill whistle, all strangely
mingled together, finally settling down into a rude
strain, which, coming from stentorian lungs, found a
ready echo in every jutting rock and space of
wood for a mile round. The musician went on
merrily from verse to verse of his forest
minstrelsy
as he continued to approach; describing in
his strain, with a ready ballad-facility, the
numberless
associations of pleasure in the life of the
woodman
.
Uncouthly, and in a style partaking rather
more of the savage than the civilized taste and
temper
,
it enumerated the distinct features of each
mode of life with much ingenuity; and, in stanzas
smartly epigrammatic, did not hesitate to decide, as
we may readily imagine, by assigning the
preference
to the former.
As the new-comer approached the spot where
lay the form of our elder acquaintance, there was
still a partial though dim light over the forest. The
twilight was richly clear, and there were some
faint yellow lines of the sun's last glances lingering
still, as if reluctant to depart, on the remote horizon.
The moon, too, in the opposite sky, about to come
forth, had sent before her some few faint harbingers
of her approach; and it was not difficult for the
sturdy woodman who now appears, to discern the
body of our traveller, lying, as in part it did,
directly
in the path. A few paces farther on stood
his steed, cropping the young grass, and
occasionally
,
with uplifted head, looking round with
something
like human wonderment, for the exercise of
that superiority which heretofore had him in charge.
At the approach of the stranger he did not start,
but seeming conscious of some change for the
better in his own prospects, he fell again to work
upon the herbage as if no interruption had
occurred
to his repast.
The song of the woodman ceased as he
discovered
the body. With an exclamation, he stooped
down to examine it, and his hands were suffused
with the blood which had found its way through
the garments. He saw that life was not extinct,
and readily understanding the stupor as the
consequence
of loss of blood rather than of vital injury,
he paused a few moments as in seeming
meditation
,
then turning from the master to his
unreluctant
steed, he threw himself upon his back, and was
quickly out of sight. In an hour he returned. He
brought with him a wagon and team, such as all
farmers possess in that region, and lifting the
inanimate
form into the rude vehicle with a tender
caution that indicated a true humanity, walking
slowly beside the horses, and carefully avoiding all
such obstructions in the road as by disordering the
motion would have given pain to the sufferer, he
carried him safely, and after the delay of a few
hours, into the frontier, and then almost unknown,
village of Chestatee.
It was well for the youth that he had fallen into
such hands. There were few persons in that part
of the world like Mark Forrester. A better heart,
a more honourable spirit lived not; and in spite
of an erring and a neglected educationof evil
associations, and sometimes evil pursuitshe was
still a worthy specimen of manhood. We may as
well here describe him, as he appears to us; for
at this period the youth was still insensible
unconscious
of his deliverance as he was of his
deliverer
.
Mark Forrester was a stout, strongly built, yet
E 2
active person, some six feet in height, square and
broad-shoulderedexhibiting an outline, wanting,
perhaps, in some of the more rounded and taking
graces of form and figure, yet at the same time far
from any indication of symmetrical deficiency.
There was also not a little of ease and agility,
together
with a rude gracefulness in his action, the
result less of the well-combined organization of
his animal man than of the hardy habits of his
woodland course of life. His appearance was
youthful, and the passing glance would perhaps
have rated him at little more than six or
seven-and-twenty
.
His broad full chest heaving strongly
with a consciousness of mighttogether with the
generally athletic muscularity of his whole person,
indicated correctly the possession of prodigious
strength. His face was finely southernit wanted
the calculating lines of cunning,that false
presentiment
of wisdom, fatal to honesty, which so
many, mistaking for the true object, fall down and
worship. His features were frank and fearless
moderately intelligent, and well-markedthe
tout
ensemble
indicating an active vitality, strong, and
usually just feelings, and a good-natured familiarity
of character, which enlisted confidence, and seemed
likely to acknowledge few restraints of merely
conventional
creation. Nor, in any of these particulars,
did the outward falsely interpret the inward man.
With the possession of a giant's powers, he was
seldom so far borne forward by his impulses,
whether
of pride or of passion, as to permit of their
wanton or improper use. His eye, too, had a not
unpleasing twinkle, promising more of
good-fellowship
and a heart at ease than may well
consort with a less jaundiced or distempered
spirit. His garb indicated, in part, and was well
adapted to, the pursuits of the hunter and the
lahours
of the woodmanwe couple these
employments
together, for, in the wildernesses of North
America, the dense forests, and broad prairies, they
are utterly inseparable. In a belt, made of
buckskin
,
which encircled his middle, was stuck, in a
sheath of the same material, a small axe, such as,
among the Indians, was well known to the early
settlers as a deadly implement of war. The head
of this instrument, or that portion of it opposite the
blade, and made in weight to correspond with and
balance the latter when hurled from the hand, was
a pick of solid steel, narrowing down to a point,
and calculated, with a like blow, to prove even
more fatal, as a weapon in conflict, than the more
legitimate member to which it was appended. A
thong of ox-hide, slung over his shoulder, supported
easily a light rifle of the choicest bore; for there
are few matters indeed upon which the wayfarer
in the southern wilds exercises a nicer and more
discriminating taste than in the selection of a
companion
,
in a pursuit like his, of the very last
importance
;
and which, in time, he learns to love
with a passion almost comparable to the love of
woman. The dress of the woodman was
composed
of a coarse gray stuff, of a make sufficiently
outre to the eye taught in the nice sinuosities of the
city fashions, but which, fitting him snugly, served to
set off his robust and well-made person to the
utmost
advantage. A cap of the fox-skin, of
domestic
manufacture, the tail of which, studiously
preserved, obviated any necessity for a foreign
tassel, rested slightly upon his head, giving an
unique finish to his appearance, which a
fashionable
hat would never have supplied. It accorded
happily with the scenes and circumstances of his
condition, and the forest employ which he so
vigorously
pursued. Such, to the eye, was the
personage
,
who, so fortunately for our hero, plied his craft
in that fearful region; and who, stumbling upon
his insensible form at nightfall, as already narrated,
carefully conveyed him to his own lodgings at the
village inn of Chestatee.
The town of Chestateefor such it was in the
acceptation of the time and country,may well
deserve some little description; not for its own
sake and intrinsic importance, but because it will
be found to resemble some ten out of every dozen
of the country towns in all the corresponding
region. It consisted of thirty or forty dwellings,
chiefly of log construction; not, however, so
immediately
in the vicinity of one another as to give
any very decided air of regularity and order to
their appearance. As usual, in all the interior
settlements
of the South and West, wherever, an
eligible situation presented itself, the squatter laid
the foundation logs of his dwelling, and proceeded
to its erection. No public squares, and streets laid
out by line and rule, marked the conventional
progress
of an orderly and methodical society; but,
regarding individual convenience as the very
ne
plus ultra
in arrangements of this nature, they took
little note of any other, and to them less
important
,
matters. They built where the land rose into
a ridge of moderate and gradual elevation,
commanding
a long reach of prospectwhere a good
spring threw out its crystal waters, jetting, in
winter and summer alike, from the hillside or the
rock; or, in its absence, where a fair branch,
trickling over a bed of small and yellow pebbles,
kept up a perpetually clear and undiminishing
current
where
the groves were thick and
umbrageous
;
and lastly, but not less important than either,
where agues and fevers came not, bringing clouds
over the warm sunshine, and taking all the hue, and
beauty, and odour from the flower. These
considerations
were at all times the most important to the
settler when once the place of his abode was fairly
determined upon; and with these advantages at
large, the company of squatters, of whom our
hero's acquaintance, Mark Forester, made one, and
one by no means the least important among them,
had regularly, for the purposes of gold-digging,
colonized the little boundary into which, in
company
with the reader, we have now ventured to
penetrate.
Preliminary to any farther advance in our
narrative
,
it may be quite as well to say, that, as might
easily be imagined, the various adventurers of
which this wild congregation was made up were
impelled to their present common centre by
motives
and influences as contrariant and manifold as
the differing features of their several countenances.
They came, not only from all parts of the
surrounding
country, but many of them from all parts of the
surrounding world; oddly and confusedly jumbled
together, the very
olla-podrida
of moral and
mental
combination. They were chiefly those to whom
the ordinary operations of human trade and labour
had proved tedious or unproductivewith whom
the toils, aims, and impulses of society were
deficient
of interest, or, upon whom, an inordinate
desire
of a sudden to acquire wealth had exercised
a sufficiently active influence to impel to the novel
employment of gold-findingor rather gold-
seeking
,
for it was not always that the search was
successful
the
very name of such a pursuit carrying
with it to the bosoms of many no small degree of
charm and persuasion. To these, a wholesome
assortment of other descriptions may be added, of
character and caste such as will be found
ordinarily
to compose the frontier and outskirts of
civilization
,
as rejected by the wholesome current, and
driven, like the refuse and the scum of the
waters
,
in confused stagnation to their banks and
margin
.
Here, alike, came the spendthrift and the
indolent, the dreamer and the outlaw,
congregating
,
though guided by varying and
contradictory
impulses, in the formation of a common caste,
and in the pursuit of a like objectsome with the
view to profit and gain; others, simply from no
alternative being left them, and that of
gold-seeking
,
with a better sense than their neighbours,
being
in their own contemplation, truly, a
dernier
resort. The reader can better conceive than we
describe, the sort or rather the sorts of people,
passions and pursuits herding thus confusedly
together
,
and with the various objects of which we
speak. Others, indeed, came into the society, like
the rude but honest woodman to whom we have
already afforded the civility of an introduction,
almost purely from a spirit of adventure, that,
growing impatient of the confined boundaries of
its birth-place, longed to tread new forests, and
contend with new enemies among its recesses. A
spirit, we may add, the same, or not materially
differing with that, which, at an earlier period of
human history, though in a condition of society
not dissimilar, begot the practices denominated
by a most licentious courtesy those of chivalry.
But, of whatever stuff the
moral
of this people
may have been made up, it is not less certain than
natural that the mixture was still incoherentthe
parts had not yet entirely coalesced together.
Though ostensibly in the pursuit of the same
interest
and craft, they had any thing but a like
fortune
,
and the degree of concert and harmony
which subsisted between them was but shadowy
and partial. A mass so heterogeneous in its origin
and tendency might not so readily amalgamate.
Strife, discontent, and contention were not
unfrequent
;
and the labourers at the same instrument,
mutually depending on each other, not uncommonly
came to blows over it. The successes of any
one individualfor, as yet, their labours were
unregulated
by arrangement, and each worked on his
own scoreprocured for him the hate and envy
of some of the company; while it aroused the
ill-disguised
dissatisfaction of all; and nothing was
of more common occurrence, than, when striking
upon a fruitful and productive section, even among
those interested in the discovery, to find it a
disputed
dominion. Copartners no longer, a division
of the spoils, when accumulated, was usually
terminated by a resort to blows; and the bold
spirit and the strong hand, in this way, not
uncommonly
acquired the share for which it was too
indolent
to toil in the manner of its companions.
The issue of these conflicts, as may be imagined,
was sometimes wounds and bloodshed, and
occasionally
death: the field, we need scarcely add,
since this is the history of all usurpation,
remaining
,
in every such case, in possession of the
party proving itself most strong or courageous.
Nor need this history surpriseit is history,
veracious
and sober history of a period, still within
recollection, and of events of almost recent
occurrence
.
The wild condition of the countrythe
absence of all civil authority, and almost of laws,
certainly of officers sufficiently daring to undertake
their honest administration, and shrinking from the
risk of incurring for the performance of their duties
the vengeance of those, who, though disagreeing
among themselves, at all times made common
cause against the ministers of justice as against a
common enemymay readily account for the
frequency
and impunity with which these desperate
men committed crime, and defied its
consequences
.
But we are now fairly in the centre of the
village
a
fact of which, in the case of most
southern
and western villages, it is necessary distinctly,
and in so many words, to apprize the traveller. In
those parts, the scale by which towns are laid out
is always magnificent. The founders seem to have
calculated usually upon a population of millions;
and upon spots and sporting-grounds, measurable by
the olympic coursers, and the ancient fields of
combat
,
when scythes and elephants and chariots made
the warriors, and the confused cries of a yelping
multitude composed the conflict itself. There was
no want of room, no risk of narrow streets and
pavements, no deficiency of area in the formation
of public squares. The houses scattered around
the traveller, dotting at long and unfrequent
intervals
the ragged wood which enveloped them, left
few stirring apprehensions of their firing one
another
.
The forest, where the land was not
actually
built upon stood up in its primitive simplicity
undishonoured by the axe. Such was the
condition
of the settlement at the period when our hero
so unconsciously entered it. It was night, and the
lamps of the village were all in full blaze,
illuminating
with an effect the most picturesque and
attractive
the fifty paces immediately encircling
them. Each dwelling boasted of this auxiliar and
attraction; and in this particular but few cities
afford so abundantly the materials for a blaze as
our country villages. Two or more slight posts
are erected at convenient distances from each
other in front of the buildinga broad scaffold,
sufficiently
large for the purpose, is placed upon them,
on which a thick coat of clay is plastered; at evening
a pile is built upon this of dry timber and the rich
pine which overruns and mainly marks the forests
of the south. These piles, in a blaze, serve the
nightly strollers of the settlement as guides and
beacons, and with their aid, our hero, safely driven
by Forrester, wound his way into the little village
of Chestatee.
Forming a square, in the very centre of the town,
a cluster of four huge fabrics, in some sort
sustained
the pretensions of the settlement to this
epithet
.
This ostentatious collection, some of the
members of which appeared placed there rather
for show than service, consisted of the court-house,
the jail, the tavern, and the shop of the blacksmith
the two last-mentioned being at all times the
very first in course of erection, and the essential
nucleus in the formation of the southern and
western
settlement. The court-house and its apt
corollary
the jail, standing directly opposite and
fronting each other, carried in their faces a family
outline of sympathetic and sober gravity. There
had been some effort at pretension and dignity in
their construction, both being unnecessarily and
cumbrously large, awkward, and unwieldy; and,
occupying, as they did, the only portion of the
village
which had been stripped of its forest
covering
,
bore an aspect of mutual and ludicrous
wildness and vacancy. They had both been built
upon a like plan and equal scale; and the only
difference existing between them, but one that was
immediately perceptible to the eye, was the
superfluous
abundance of windows in the former, and
the deplorable deficiency in this particular which
characterized the latter. A moral agency had
most probably prompted the architect to the
distinction
here hit uponand he felt, doubtless, in
admitting free access to the light in the house of
justice, and in excluding it almost entirely from that
of punishment, that he had recognised the
proprieties
Vol. I.F
of a most excellent taste and true judgment.
These apertures, clumsily wrought in the logs of
which the buildings were made, added still more
to their generally uncouth appearance. There
was yet, however, another marked difference
between
the court-house and jail, which we should
not omit to notice. The former had the
advantage
of its neighbour and ally, in being
surmounted
by a small tower or cupola, in which
a bell of moderate size hung suspended, permitted
to speak only on such important occasions as the
opening of court, Sabbath service, and the
respective
anniversaries of the birthday of Washington
and the Declaration of Independence. This
building
,
thus distinguished above its fellows, served
also all the purposes of a place of worship,
whenever
some wandering preacher found his way to the
settlement; an occurrence, at the time we write,
of most occasional character. To each of the
four vast walls of the jail, in a taste certainly not
bad, if we consider the design and character of the
fabric, but a single window was allottedthat too
of the very smallest description for human uses,
and crossed at right angles with rude and slender
bars of iron, the choicest specimens of
workmanship
from the neighbouring smithy. The
distance between each of these four equally
important
buildings was by no means inconsiderable,
if we are required to make the scale for our
estimate, that of the cramped and diminished limits
accorded to like matters in cities, where men and
women appear to increase in due proportion as the
field lessens upon which they must encounter in the
great struggle for existence. Though neighbours
in every substantial respect, the four fabrics were
most uncharitably remote, and stood frowning
coldly and gloomily over and against one another
scarcely relieved of the cheerless and sombre
character of their rough outsides, even when thus
brightly illuminated by the glare thrown upon
them by the several blazes, flashing out upon
the scene they were approaching, from the twin
lamps, advanced some twenty paces from, and in
front of, the tavern, through whose wide and
unsashed
windows an additional lustre, as of many
lights, gave cheering indications of life and good
lodgings within. At a point equidistant from, and
forming one of the angles of the same square with
each of these, the broader glare from the smith's
furnace streamed in bright lines across the plain
between, pouring through the unclayed logs of
the hovel, in which, at his craft, the industrious
proprietor
was even then busily employed.
Occasionally
,
the sharp click of his hammer, ringing
upon and redounding from his anvil, and a full
blast from his capacious bellows, indicated the busy
animation, if not the sweet concert, the habitual
cheerfulness and charm, of a more civilized and
better regulated society.
Nor was the smith, at the moment of our
entrance
,
the only noisy member of the little village.
The more pretending establishment to which we
are rapidly approaching, threw out its clamours,
and the din of many voices gathered upon the
breeze in most wild and incoherent confusion.
Deep bursts of laughter, and the broken stanza of
an occasional catch roared out at intervals,
promised
something of relief to the dull mood; while, as
the sounds grew more distinct, the quick ear of
Forrester was enabled to distinguish the voices of
the several revellers. But even Forrester was not
at a little loss, seemingly, to account for the rather
extravagant degree of their hilarity. He knew
how slight were the links of fellowship between
the gold diggers generally, and felt satisfied that
some unwonted occasion must have arisen for the
uproar. A nearer approach soon informed him
of the mystery; but all further speculations of his
own were arrested by a deep groan and an
impatient
movement in the bottom of his wagon.
Forgetting
all other matters, he procured assistance,
and avoiding the chief entrance to the inn, carried
our wounded traveller to a quiet couch in the
upper story of the building, then set off, at once, in
seach of the self-constituted surgeon of that
insulated
region.
CHAPTER VI.
Did you ever, ever, ever, in your life ride a rail?
Such a deal of pleasure's in it that I wonder you refuse,
You are perch'd upon the shoulders of those who never fail,
In spite of all your pleading, sir, to chuck you where they
choose.
What though a group of brambles present their thorny faces,
They do not wait to ask you how you like the situation,
But down you go and test awhile those penetrating places,
Nor scramble out until you give a cry of approbation.
Ho! for the ride, the pleasant ride, the ride upon a rail,
The pedler's worthy of his pay, so give him his regale
The seven-sided pine rail, the pleasant bed of briar,
The little touch of Lynch's law, with a dipping in the mire.
Song of the Regulators
.
The
leech was soon procured, and a few
moments
of examination showed the wounds of Ralph
Colleton to be easily medicable. The loss of
blood alone had been the cause of his stupor, and
the moderate skill of our country surgeon sufficed
to put the mind of Forrester at rest upon the
subject
of his charge. The hurts of the youth were
quickly dressed, and returning consciousness soon
enabled him to appreciate the communicative
character
of his burly friend. Prevented from speech
himself, he was content to receive from the
woodman
a brief account of the manner of his
discovery
and his present whereabouts. From this point
the transition was quite natural to the subject of
the uproarious mirth going on in the apartments
below, the cause of which the woodman gave in
the following characteristic language.
Why, you must know, 'squire, that the
regulators
have made out to catch a certain, Yankee
pedlerone Jared Bunce; and you must know,
'squire, a more cunning and presumptious
rapscallion
don't come from all Connecticut. They
caught the critter not an hour ago, and they'll
hammer him into another guess sort of machinery
'fore he gets through their hands; though I'm very
much afeared all that will be of little service; for,
you know, as the old people say, `what's bred in
the bone won't come out of the flesh.' Maybe he
isn't a great scamp. You can't measure his
rascality
,
'squire, if you was to try. Why, he can
walk through your pockets, and the money will
naturally cleave to him as if he were all wax.
His very look stands for dollars and cents. Ah,
but he's a raal one. He does come over the old
folks so with his tin wareshis coffee-pots and
kettles, put together with soft solderand there's
no standing his blarney. He can cheat you
out of your eyes, and you won't know about it,
till it's all done, and too late to make a fuss. He's
been playing his tricks through the clearing, it's
now better than three years, and somehow he
always got off; but last year the
regulators
swore
for him, and he
cut dirt
, I tell you.
F 2
Who are the regulators? inquired the youth.
What, you live in Georgia, and never heard
tell of the regulators? Well, that's queer,
anyhow
.
But, the regulators are just, simply, you
see, our own people; who, every now and then,
turn out,now one set and now another,and
whenever a chap like this same Jared Bunce goes
about, living on everybody, and coming Yankee
over everybody, they hunt him up and pay off old
scores. Sometimes they let him off with a light
hand, but then, you see, it altogether happens
according
to his behaviour. Sometimes they give
him Lynch's Law, after old Nick Lynch, who
invented
it in Virginny, long before your time or
mine. Sometimes they ride him upon a rail, and
then duck him in the pond. It all depends, you
see, upon the humour of the regulators.
And which of these punishments will they
inflict
upon the Yankee?
Well, now, I can't saybut I take it, he runs a
chance of hitting hard agin all of 'em. They've
got a long score agin him. He's taken in
everybody
with his notions. Some bought his clocks,
which went only while the rogue was in sight, and
after that they came to a full stand. Some bought
ready-made clothes, which never lasted long enough
for soap and the washerwoman; and there's old
Jeremiah Seaborn that swears agin him for a fusee
he sold little Jeremiah, the son, that bursted into
flinders the very first fire, and tore the boy's hand
and arm, there's no telling how. I reckon he's in
a fair road for stumps.
And will they seriously harm the poor fellow,
and that too without law?
The woodman turned more fully to the youth, as
if doubting the sincerity, as he certainly seemed
not a little surprised at the simplicity, of the
question
.
Harm himpoor fellow! I wonder, 'squire,
that you should speak so of such a fellow;a
fellow
that's got no more soul than my whip-handle,
and isn't half so much to be counted on in a fight.
Why, he only goes about the country to rob and to
defraud; and ha'n't spirit enough, would you
believe
it, either to get drunk with his friend or have
it out with his enemy. I shouldn't myself like to
see the fellow's throat cut, but I an't scrupulous to
say, I see no harm in his having the benefit of a
few hickories, and a dip in the horsepond; and if
you knew but half as much of his rogueries as I,
you'd soon come over to my opinion.
Ralph well knew how perfectly idle must be any
effort in such an argument to overcome the
prejudices
of the sturdy woodman, in which, from
repeated
and extravagant impositions of the kind
spoken of, the humble classes of the South had been
taught but a common spirit. He contented
himself
,
therefore, with a single remark upon the
general
propriety of forbearance where the laws could
administer ample justice. But Forrester had his
answer for this also.
There, again, 'squire, you are quite out. The
laws, somehow or other, can't touch these
conniving
fellows. They run through the country a wink
faster than the sheriff's deputies, and laugh at all
the processes you send after them. So, you see,
there's no justice, no how, unless you catch a rogue
like this, and wind up with him for all the gang
for they're all alike, all of the same family, and
it comes to the same thing in the end.
But the volubility of Forrester was now suddenly
concluded, as he discovered in his charge a
manifestation
of slumber so unequivocal, as to lead him
to apprehend that much of his eloquence had been
fruitlessly and unprofitably uttered. Leaving him,
therefore, he descended to the hall from whence the
merriment proceeded. The pedler was in truth in
a custody by no means desirable, and the luckless
Jared Bunce, whose experience had been
somewhat
extensive in difficulties of the like nature, now
found himself in a situation, in which, perhaps for
the first time in his life, he coveted nothing. His
prospect was indeed a dreary one. He was
dragged before judges, all of whom had complaints
to prefer, and injuries to redress; and none of whom
were over-scrupulous as to the nature or the
measure
of that punishment which was to procure them
the desired atonement. The company was not so
numerous as noisy. It consisted of some fifteen
persons, villagers as well as small planters in the
neighbourhood, all of whom, having partaken
ad
libitum
of the various liquors distributed freely
about the table, which, in part, they surrounded, had,
in the Indian phrase, more voices than tongues, and
were sufficiently aroused by their potations to enter
readily into any mischief. Some were smoking
with all the industrious perseverance though with
little of the phlegm and gravity of the Hollander;
others, at brief intervals of the dialogue, if that
may be considered such in which all parties were
heard at the same moment, shouted forth songs in
honour of the bottle, and with all the fervour and
ferment of Bacchanalian novitiates; and not a few,
congregating about the immediate person of the
pedler, assailed his ears with threats sufficiently
pregnant with tangible illustration to make him
understand
and acknowledge, by repeated starts and
wincings, the awkward and uncomfortable
predicament
in which he stood. At length, the various
disputants for justice, finding it difficult, if not
impossible
,
severally, to command that attention to
their claims which they conceived they merited,
resolved themselves into something like a
committee
of the whole, and proceeded to the settlement
of their controversy and the pedler's fate, in a
manner
more suited to the importance of the occasion.
Having procured that attention which was
admitted
to be the great object, more by the strength of
his lungs than his argument, one of the company,
who was dignified with the title of colonel, spoke
out for the rest.
I say, boys,'tisn't of any use, I reckon, for
everybody to speak about what everybody knows.
One speaker's quite enough, I take it, in this here
matter before us. Here's none of us that ha'n't
something to say agin this pedler, and the doings
of the grand scoundrel in and about these parts, for
a matter going on now about three years. Why,
everybody knows him, big and little; and his
reputation
is so now, that the very boys take his name
to frighten away the crows with. Indeed, for that
matter, I take it, the name of any Yankee would
be just as good, for of the two, the crows take less
of our corn than the Yankees, and are more easily
frightened. Now, one person can jist as well
make a plain statement as another. I know, of my
own score, there's not one of my neighbours, for
ten miles round, that can't tell all about the rotten
prints he put off upon my old woman; and I knows
myself of all the tricks he's played at odd times,
more than a dozen, upon 'Squire Nicholls there,
and Tom Wescott, and Bob Snipes, and twenty
others, and everybody knows them just as well as
I. Now, to make up the score, and square off with
the pedler, without any fuss or flustration, I move
you that Lawyer Pippin take the chair, and judge
in this matter; for I take it the day has come for
settling off accounts, and I don't see why we
shouldn't be the regulators of Bunce, seeing that
everybody agrees that he's a rogue, and a
pestilence
,
and desarves regulation.
This speech was highly approved, and chimed
in admirably with all prejudices. The pedler had
many misdeeds to answer for, and the voice that
called Lawyer Pippin to preside over the
deliberations
of the assembly was a unanimous one.
The gentleman thus highly distinguished, was a
dapper and rather portly little personage, with
sharp twinkling eyes, a ruby and remarkable nose,
a double chin, retreating forehead, and corpulent
cheek. He wore green glasses of a dark, and a
green coat of a light, complexion. The lawyer was
the only member of the profession living in the
village
,
had no competitor save when the sitting of the
court brought in one or more from neighbouring
settlements, and, being thus circumstanced, without
opposition, and the only representative of his craft,
he was literally, to employ the slang phrase
common
in that quarter, the cock of the walk. He
was, however, not so much regarded by the
villagers
a worthy as an able man. It required not
much erudition to win the credit of profundity,
and the lawyer knew how to make the most of his
learning among those who had none. Like many
other gentlemen of erudition, he was grave to a
proverb when the occasion required it, and would
not have been seen to laugh out of the prescribed
place, though Nestor swore the jest was
laughable
.
He relied greatly on saws and sayings
could quote you the paradoxes of Johnson and the
infidelities of Hume without always understanding
them, and mistook, as men of that kind and calibre
are very apt to do, the capacity to repeat the old
absurdities of others as a proof of something in
himself. His business was not large, however,
and among the arts of his profession, and as a mean
for supplying the absence of more legitimate
occasions
for its employment, he was reputed as
excessively
expert in making the most of any
difficulty
among his neighbours. The egg of mischief
and controversy was hardly laid, before the
worthy
lawyer, with maternal care, came clucking
about it; he watched and warmed it without
remission
;
and when fairly hatched, he took care
that the whole brood should be brought safely into
court, his voice and words and actions fully
attesting
the deep interest in their fortunes which he had
manifested from the beginning. Many a secret
slander, ripening at length into open warfare, had
been traced to his friendly influence, either
ab ovo
,
or at least from the perilous period in such cases
when the very existence of the embryo relies upon
the friendly breath, the sustaining warmth, and the
occasional stimulant. Lawyer Pippin, among
his neighbours, was just the man for such
achievements
,
and they gave him, with a degree of
shrewdness
common to them as a people, less qualified
credit for the capacity which he at all times
exhibited
in bringing a case into, than in carrying it out
of court. But this opinion in nowise affected the
lawyer's own estimate of his pretensions. Next
to being excessively mean, he was excessively
vain, and so highly did he regard his own opinions,
that he was never content until he heard himself
busily employed in their utterance. An
opportunity
for a speech, such as the present, was not
suffered
to pass without due regard; but as we
propose
that he shall exhibit himself in the most happy
manner at a future period in our narrative, we
shall abridge, in few, the long string of queerly
associated
words in the form of a speech, which, on
assuming the chair thus assigned him, he poured
forth upon the assembly. After a long prefatory,
apologetic, and deprecatory exordium, in which
his own demerits, as is usual with small speakers,
were strenuously urged; and after he had
exhausted
most of the commonplaces about the
purity
of the ermine upon the robes of justice, and
the golden scales, and the unshrinking balance, and
the unsparing and certain sword, he went on thus:
And now, my friends, if I rightly understand
the responsibility and obligations of the station
thus kindly conferred upon me, I am required to
arraign
before you, on behalf of the country, which
country, as the clerk reads it, you undoubtedly are;
and here let me remark, my friends, the excellent
and nice distinction which this phrase makes
between
the man and the soil, between the noble
intellect
and the high soul, and the mere dirt and
dust upon which we daily tread. This very phrase,
my friends, is a fine embodiment of that democratic
principle upon which the glorious constitution is
erectedbut, as I was saying, my friends, I am
required
to arraign before you this same pedler,
Jared
Bunce, on sundry charges of misdemeanor, and
swindling, and fraudin short, as I understand it,
for endeavouring, without having the fear of God
and good breeding in his eyes, for endeavouring to
pass himself off upon the good people of this
county as an honest man. Is this the charge, my
friends?
Ay, ay, lawyer, that's the how, that's the very
thing itself. Put it to the skunk, let him deny that
if he canlet him deny that his name is Jared
Buncethat he hails from Connecticutthat he is a
shark, and a pirate, and a pestilence. Let him deny
that he is a cheatthat he goes about with his
notions
and other rogueriesthat he doesn't
manufacture
maple seeds, and hickory nutmegs, and
ground coffee made out of rotten rye. Answer to
that, Jared Bunce, you white-livered lizard.
Thus did one of his accusers take up the thread
of the discourse as concluded in part by the
chairman
.
Another and another followed with like
speeches in the most rapid succession until all
was again confusion; and the voice of the lawyer,
after a hundred ineffectual efforts at a hearing,
degenerated into a fine squeak, and terminated at
last in a violent fit of coughing that fortunately
succeeded in producing that degree of quiet around
him in which his language had, singularly enough,
entirely failed. For a moment the company ceased
its clamour, out of respect to the chairman's
cough; and having cleared his throat with the
contents of a tumbler of Monongahela which
seemed to stand permanently full by his side, he
recommenced
the proceedings; the poor criminal,
in the mean time, standing mute and motionless,
perfectly stupified with his terror, conscious of
repeated
offences, knowing perfectly the reckless
spirit of those who judged him, and hopeless of
escape from their hands, without, in the country
phrase, the loss at least of his wing and tail
feathers.
The chairman with due gravity began:
Jared Bunceis that your name?
Why, lawyer, I can't deny that I have gone by
that name, ever since I began business, and I guess
it's the right name for me to go by, seeing that I
was christened by the name of Jared, after my old
uncle Jared Withers, that lives down at Dedham,
in the state of Massachusetts. He did promise to
do something for me, seeing I was named after
him, but he han't done nothing yet, no how. Then
the name of Bunce, you see, lawyer, I took from
my father, his name being Bunce, too, I guess.
Vol. I.G
Well, Jared Bunce, answer to the point and
be particular, and without circumlocution. You
have heard some of the charges against you.
Having taken them down in short-hand, I will
repeat
them to you severally.
The pedler approached a few steps, advanced
one leg, raised a hand to his ear, and put on all
the external signs of devout attention, as the
chairman
proceeded in the long and curious array.
First, then, it is charged against you, Bunce,
by young Dick Jenkins, that stands over in front
of you there, that somewhere between the fifteenth
and twenty-third of June, last June was a year,
you came by night to his plantation, he living at
that time in De Kalb county; that you stopped the
night with him, without charge, and in the
morning
you traded a clock to his wife for fifteen
dollars
,
and that you had not been gone two days,
before the said clock began to go whiz, whiz, whiz,
and commenced striking, whizzing all the while,
and never stopped till it had struck clear thirty-one,
and since that time it will neither whiz, nor strike,
nor do nothing.
Why, lawyer, I an't the man to deny the truth
of this transaction, you see; but then, you must
know, much depends upon the way you manage a
clock. A clock is quite a delicate and ticklish
article
of manufacture, you see, and it an't
everybody
that can make a clock, or can make it go
when it don't want to; and if a man takes a
hammer
or a horsewhip, or any other unnatural
weapon
to it, as if it was a house or a horse, why, I
guess, it's not natural to expect it to keep in order,
and it's no use in having a clock no how, if you
don't treat it well. As for its striking thirty-one,
that indeed is something quite remarkable, for I
never heard one of mine strike more than twelve,
and that's jest the number they're regulated to
strike. But, after all, lawyer, I don't see that squire
Jenkins has been much a loser by the trade, seeing
that he paid me in bills of the  Bank, and that
stopped payment about the time, and before I could
get the bill changed; it's true, I didn't let on that
I knowed any thing about it, and got rid of the
paper
a little while before the thing was known abroad
in the country.
Now, look ye, you gingerbread-bodied Yankee
I'd like to know what you mean about taking
whip and hammer to the clock. If you mean to
say that I ever did such a thing, I'll lick you now,
on the spot, by the eternal scratch.
Order, order, Mr. Jenkinsorder. The chair
must be respected. You must come to order, Mr.
Jenkins was the vociferous and urgent cry of
the chairman, repeated by half a dozen voices
the pedler, in the meanwhile, half doubting the
efficacy of the call, retreating with no little terror
behind the chair of the dignified personage who
presided.
Well, you needn't make sich a howling about
it, said Jenkins, wrathfully, and looking around
him with the sullen ferocity of a chafed bear. I
know jist as well how to keep order, I reckon, as
any on you; but I don't see how it will be out of
order to lick a Yankee, or who can hinder me, if I
choose it.
Well, don't look at me, Dick Jenkins, with such
a look again, or I'll have a finger in that pie, old
fellow. I'm no Yankee to be frightened by sich a
lank-sided fellow as you, and by dogs, if nobody
else can keep you in order, I'm just the man to try
if I can't. So don't put on any shines, old boy, or
I'll darken your peepers, if I don't come very nigh
plucking them out altogether. So spake another
of the company, who, having been much delectified
with the trial, as it may be called, had been
particularly
solicitous in his cries for order, and to
whom therefore the glance of Jenkins had been
specially directed. Jenkins was not indisposed to
the affray, and made an angry retort, which
provoked
another still more angry; but other parties
interfering, the adjustment of the new difficulty
was made to give place to that already in hand.
The imputation upon Jenkins, that his ignorance
of the claims of the clock to gentle treatment,
alone had induced it to speak thirty-one times, and
at length refuse to speak at all, had touched his
pride nearly; and, sorely vexed, he retired upon a
glass of whiskey to the further corner of the room,
and with his pipe, nursing the fumes of his wrath,
he awaited impatiently the signal for that wild
mischief which he knew would come. In the
mean while, the examination of the culprit
proceeded
;
but, as we cannot hope to convey to
the reader a description of the affair as it happened,
to the life, we shall content ourselves with a simple
and brief summary. The chair went on rapidly
enumerating the sundry misdeeds of the Yankee,
demanding, and in most cases receiving, rapid
and unhesitating repliesevasively and adroitly
framed, for the offender well knew that a single
unlucky word or phrase would bring down upon
his shoulders a wilderness of blows.
You are again charged, Bunce, with having
sold to Colonel Blundell, a coffee-pot, and two tin
cups, all of which went to pieces, the solder
melting
off at the very sight of the hot water.
Well, lawyer, it stands to reason I can't
answer
for that. The tin wares I sell stand well
enough in a northern climate: there may be some
difference in yours that I can't account for; and I
guess, pretty much, there is. Now, your people are
a mighty hot-tempered people, and take a fight
for breakfast, and make three meals a day out of
itnow, we in the north have no stomach for such
fare; so here now, as far as I can see, your climate
takes pretty much after the people, and if so, it's
no wonder that solder can't stand it. Who knows,
again, but you boil your water quite too hot? Now,
I guess, there's jest as much harm in boiling water
too hot, as in not boiling it hot enough. Who
knows? All I can say, in the way of excuse to
the colonel, is, that the lot of wares I bring to
this market next season, shall be calkilated on
purpose to suit the climate.
The chairman seemed struck with this view of
the case, and spoke with a gravity to his auditory
corresponding with the deep sagacity he conceived
himself to have exhibited.
There does seem to be something, my friends,
in this particular; and it stands to reason, what
will do for a nation of pedlers and patchers won't
do for us. Why, when I recollect that they are
buried in snows half the year, and living on
nothing else the other half, I wonder how they get
the water to boil at all. Answer to that, Bunce.
Well, lawyer, I guess you must have travelled
pretty considerably down east, in your time and
among my people, for you do seem to know all
about the matter, jest as well and something better
than myself.
The lawyer was not a little flattered by the
compliment so slyly and evasively put in, and
responded
to the remark with a due regard to his own
increase of importance.
I am not ignorant of your country, pedler,
and of the ways of its people; but it is not me
that you are to satisfy. Answer to the gentlemen
G 2
around, if it is not a difficult matter for you to get
water to boil at all during the winter months.
Why, to say the truth, lawyer, when coal is
scarce and high in the market, heat is very hard
to come. Now I guess the ware I brought out
last season was made under those circumstances;
but I have a lot on hand now, which will be here
in a day or two, which I should like to trade to the
colonel, and I guess I may venture to say, all the
hot water in the country won't melt the solder off.
I tell you what, pedler, we are more likely to
put you in hot water than try any more of your
tin ware in that way. But where is your plunder
let us look into it, and see this fine lot of notions
you speak of; was the speech of the colonel
already
so much referred to, and whose coffee-pot
bottom furnished so broad a foundation for the
trial. He was a wild and roving person, to whom
the tavern, and the race-course, and the cock-pit,
from his very boyhood up, had been as the breath
of life, and with whom a chance of mischief was
never willingly foregone. But the pedler was
wary, and knew perfectly his man. The lurking
and but partially suppressed smile and sneer of
the speaker had enough in them for the purposes
of warning, and he replied cautiously and evasively.
Well, colonel, you shall see them by Tuesday
or Wednesday. I should be glad to have a trade
with youthe money's no object, and if you have
furs, or skins, or any thing that you like off your
hands, there's no difficulty that I can see to a long
bargain.
But why not trade now, Bunce?what's to
hinder us now, you leather-faced Jew? I shan't
be in the village after Monday.
Well, then, colonel, that'll just suit me, for I
did calkilate to call on you at the farm, on my
way into the nation where I'm going looking out
for furs.
Yes, and live on the best for a week, under
some pretence that your nag is sick, or you sick, or
something in the way of a startthen go off, and
cheat and laugh at me in the bargain. I reckon,
old boy, you don't come over me in that way again;
and I'm not half done with you yet about the
kettles
.
That story of yours about the hot and cold
climates may do for the daws to peck at, but you
don't think the hawks will swallow it, do ye? Come
out with your notions!
Oh, to be sure, only give a body time, colonel,
as, pulled by the collar, with some confusion and in
great trepidation, responded the beleaguered dealer
in clocks and calicoesthey shall all be here in
a day or two, at most. Seeing that one of my
creatures was foundered, I had to leave the goods,
and drive the other here without them.
The pedler had told the truth in part only. One
of his horses had indeed struck lame, but he had
made out to bring him to the village with all his
wares, and this fact, as in those regions of question
and inquiry was most likely to be the case, had
already taken wind.
Now, look ye, Bunce, do you take me for a
blear-eyed mole, that can't look upon the daylight,
and never seed the light of a man's eyes?
inquired
Blundell, now closely approaching the beset
tradesman, and taking him leisurely by the nape of
the neck, Do you want to take a summerset
through that window, old fellow, that you try to
stuff us with such tough stories? If you do, I
rether
reckon you can have your desires without
much difficulty or delay. Thus speaking, and
turning to some of those around him, he gave
directions
which imparted to the limbs of the pedler
a continuous and crazy motion, that made his teeth
chatter.
Hark ye, boys, jist step out, and bring in the
cart of Jared Bunce, wheels and all, if so be that
the body won't come off easily. We'll see into
the collection for ourselves.
It was now the pedler's turn for speechand,
for a few moments forgetting the precise
predicament
in which he personally stood, and only
solicitous
to save his chattels from the fate which he
plainly saw awaited them, his expostulations and
entreaties were rapid and energetic.
Now, dear colonelgood gentlemenmy dear
friendsto-morrow or the next day you shall see
them allI'll go with you to your plantation
No, thank you. I want none of your company
and look ye, if you know when you're well off,
don't undertake to call me your friend. I say, Mr.
Chairman, if it's in orderI don't want to do any
thing disorderlyI move that Bunce's cart be
moved into this very roomhere, in the midst of
us, that we may see for ourselves the sort of
substance
he brings here to put off upon us.
The chairman had long since seemingly given
up all hope of exercising, in their true spirit, the
duties of the station which he held. For a while,
it is true, he battled with no little energy for the
integrity of his dignity, with unlocked lungs and a
stout spirit; but though fully a match in these
respects
for any one, or perhaps any two of his
competitors
,
he found the task of contending with the
dozen rather less easy, and in a little while, his
speeches, into which he had lugged many a choice
ad captandum
of undisputed effect on any other
occasion, having been completely merged in, and
mingled with those of the mass, he wisely forbore
any further waste of matter, in the stump oratory
of the south, usually so precious; and drawing
himself up proudly and profoundly in his high
place, he remained dignifiedly still and sullen, until
the special reference thus made by Colonel
Blundell
again opened the fountains of the oracle, and
set them flowing. The lawyer, thus appealed to,
in a long tirade, and in his happiest manner,
delivered
his opinion in the premises, and in favour of
the measure. How, indeed, could he do otherwise,
and continue that tenacious pursuit of his own
interests
which had always been the primary aim and
object, as well of the profession as the person. He
at once sagaciously beheld the embryo lawsuit and
contingent controversy about to result from the
proposition; and, in his mind, with a far and free
vision, began to compute the costs and canvass the
various terms and prolonged trials of county court
litigation. His fancy, in the approaching docket,
enumerated at least twenty cases of tortassaults
and batteries were in abundant store for the
criminal
,
and the Common Pleas calender teemed richly
to his view, with case after case, in trespass,
assumpsit
,
trover, detinue, contract, &c. &c., to all
which, as plaintiff's attorney, should be tacked the
pretty and plump cognomen of Peter Pippin, Esq.
He saw fee after fee thrust into his handshe
beheld
the opposing parties desirous to conciliate, and
extending to him sundry of those equivocal
courtesies
,
which, though they take not the shape of
money, are money's worth, and the worthy
chairman
had no scruples as to the propriety of the
measure. The profits and pay once adjusted to
his satisfaction, his spirit took a broad sweep, and
the province of human fame, circumscribed, it is
true, within the ten mile circuit of his horizon, was
at once open before him. He beheld the strife, and
enjoyed the triumph over his fellow-labourers at
the barhe already heard the applauses of his
neighbours at this or that fine speech or sentiment;
and his form grew insensibly erect, and his eye
glistened proudly, as he freely and fully assented to
the measure which promised such an abundant
harvest. Vainly did the despairing and dispirited
pedler implore a different judgment;the huge
box which capped the body of his travelling
vehicle
,
torn from its axle, without any show of
reverential
respect for screw or fastening, was borne in
a moment through the capacious entrance of the
hall, and placed conspicuously upon the table.
The key, Bunce, the key! was the demand of
a dozen.
The pedler hesitated for a second, and the pause
was fatal. Before he could redeem his error, a
blow from a hatchet settled the difficulty, by
distributing
the fine deal-box cover, lock and hinges, in
fragments over the apartment. The revelation of
wares and fabricsa strange admixture, with
propriety
designated notionsbrought all eyes
immediately
around, and rendered a new order, for
common convenience, necessary in the
arrangement
of the company. The chairman, chair and
man, were in a moment raised to a corresponding
elevation upon the table, and over the collection;
and the controversy and clamour, from
concentrating
,
as it did before, upon the person of the pedler,
were now transferred, very rationally, to the
commodities
he brought for sale. Order having been
at length procured, Colonel Blundell, who assumed
to be the spokesman, and undertook the assertion of
his own and the wrongs of his fellow-sufferers from
the cupidity of the pedler, obtained and kept
uninterrupted
possession of the floor.
And now, Mr. Chairman, as you have already
heard the case, I will jist, with your permission, go
a little into the particulars of the rogueries and
rascalities
of this same white-livered Yankee. Now,
in the first place, he is a Yankee, and that's enough,
itself, to bring him to punishmentbut we'll let
that pass, and go to his other transactionsfor, as
I reckon, it's quite punishment enough for that
offence, to be jist what he is. He has traded rotten
stuffs about the country, that went to pieces the
first washing. He has traded calico prints,
warranted
for fast colours, that run faster than he ever
ran himself. He has sold us coffee-pots, kettles,
and other tin stuffs, that didn't stand hot water at
all; and then thinks, do you see, Mr. Chairman, to
get off in this thing, by saying they were not made
for our climateand, let me ask, Mr. Chairman, if
they wasn't made for our climate, why did he
bring 'em here? let him come to the scratch, and
answer that, neighboursbut he can't. Well, then,
as you've all heard, he has traded clocks to us at
money's worth, that one day run faster than a
Virginny
mare, and, at the very next day, would strike
lame, and wouldn't go at all, neither for beating
nor coaxingand besides all these, neighbours, if
these an't quite enough to carry a skunk to the
horse-pond, he has committed his abominations
without number, all through the country, high and
lowfor hasn't he lied and cheated, and then had
the mean cowardice to keep out of the way of the
regulators
, who have been on the look out for his
tracks for the last half year? Now, if these things
an't
desarving
of punishment, there's nobody fit to
be hungthere's nobody that ought to be whipped.
Hickories oughtn't to grow any longer, and the
best thing the governor can do would be to have
all the jails burnt down from one
eend
of the
country to the other. The proof stands up
agin
Bunce, and there's no denying it; and it's no use,
no how, to let this fellow come among us, year
after year, to play the same old hand, and take our
money for his rascally goods, and then go away
and laugh at us. And the question before us, Mr.
Chairman, is
jist
what I have said, and what shall
we do with the
critter?
To show you that it's high
time to do something in the matter, look at this
piece of calico print, that looks, to be sure, very
well to the eye, except, as you see, here's a tree
with red leaves and yellow flowersa most
ridiculous
notion, indeed, for who ever
seed
a tree
with
sich
colours here, in the very beginning of
summer?
Here the pedler, for the moment, more solicitous
for the credit of the manufacturers than for his own
safety, ventured to suggest that the print was a
mere fancy, a matter of tastein fact, a notion,
and not therefore to be judged by the standard which
in a spirit rather more Procrustean than was
necessary
,
had been brought to decide upon its merits.
He did not venture, however, to say what, perhaps,
would have been the true horn of the difficulty,
that the print was an autumn or winter illustration,
for that might have subjected him to condign
punishment
for its unseasonableness. As it was, the
defence set up was to the full as unlucky as any
other might have been.
I'll tell you what, Master Bunce, it won't do
to take natur in vain. If you can show me a
better painter than natur, from your
parts
, I give
up; but until that time, I say that any man who
thinks to give the woods a different sort of face
from what God give 'em, ought to be
licked
for his
impudence if nothing else.
The pedler ventured again to expostulate; but
the argument having been considered conclusive
against him, he was made to hold his peace, while
the prosecutor, for so we may style him,
proceeded
.
Now then, Mr. Chairman, as I was saying
here is a sample of the kind of stuff he thinks
to impo e upon us. But it won't do, Mr.
Chairman
.
Look now at the rottenness of this here
article
,
and I reckon its
jist
as good as any of the
rest, and say whether a little touch of Lynch's law
an't the very thing for the Yankee!
Holding up the devoted calico to the gaze of the
assembly, with a single effort of his strong and
widely distended arms, he rent it asunder with
little difficulty, the sweep not terminating until the
stuff, which, by-the-way, resigned itself without
struggle or resistance to its fate, had been most
completely and evenly divided. The poor pedler
in vain endeavoured to stay a ravage that, once
begun, now became an epidemic. He struggled
and strove with a tenacious hand and unreluctant
spirit, holding on to sundry of his choicest bales,
and claiming protection from the chair, until warned
of his imprudent zeal in behalf of goods so little
deserving of his risk, by the sharp and sudden
application
of an unknown hand to his ears, which
sent him reeling against the table, and persuaded
him into as great a degree of patience, as, under
existing
circumstances, he could be well expected to
exhibit. Article after article underwent a like
analysis of its strength and texture, and a warm
emulation took place among the rioters, as to their
several capacities in the work of destruction.
The shining bottoms were torn from the tin-wares
in order to prove that such a separation was
possible
,
and it is doing but brief justice to the pedler
to say, that, whatever, in fact, might have been the
true character of his commodities, the very choicest
Vol. I.H
of human fabrics, could never have resisted the
various tests of bone and sinew, tooth and nail, to
which they were indiscriminately subjected.
Immeasurable
and wild was the confusion that
followed
.
All restraints were removedall
hinderances
,
moral and physical, were withdrawn, and
the tide rushed onward with a most headlong
tendency
.
Apprehensive of pecuniary
responsibilities
in his own person, and having his neighbours
wrought to the desired pitch of phrensy,fearing
also, lest his station might somewhat involve
himself
in the meshes he was desirous of weaving
around the limbs of others, the sagacious
chairman
,
upon the first show of violence, roared out
his resignation, and descended from his pride of
place. But this movement did not in the least
impair
the industry of the
regulators
. A voice was
heard from the crowd, proposing a bonfire of the
merchandise, and no second suggestion was
necessary
to this end. All hands but those of the
pedler and the attorney were employed in
building
the pyre in front of the tavern some thirty
yards, and here, in choice confusion, lay flaming
calicoes, illegitimate silks, worsted hose, wooden
clocks and nutmegs, maple-wood seeds of all
descriptions
,
plaid cloaks, scents, and spices, jumbled
up in ludicrous combinations of most infinite
variety
.
A dozen hands busied themselves in
procuring
materials for the blaze, and in applying the
torch to the toppling and devoted masshowling
over it, at every successive burst of flame that went
up into the dark atmosphere, a wild and savage
yell of triumph that tallied well with the
proceeding
in which they were engaged. The shouts and
screams of the revellers, for such they literally
seemed, were broken occasionally into something
like a methodical arrangement of sounds, of a
character rather euphonous than otherwise, which
took at length the form of a barbarous chorus,
well known to that part of the country, and recited
the modes of punishment usually adopted in the
cases of the obnoxious.
With something like the stupor of despair, not
venturing nigh, however, did the unfortunate
merchant
survey the conflagration which in a moment
consumed the substance of a long season of
industrious
labour. Whatever may have been his
demerits
,
his case deserved the sympathy which it
did not find on this occasion. A verse of the wild
and savage chorus referred to, and in which all
the voices joined, smote harshly on his senses, and
aroused him to a something of exaggerated
consciousness
.
The strain ran on in most uncouth
doggerel, in a variety of measures, and detailed
the luxuries of a ride upon a rail somewhat at
length and by no means unattractively. A single
verse has been preserved as properly introductory
to this chapter; but the song itself, and at full length,
had been long before made familiar to the ears
now most deeply interested in the burthen. The
pedler heard but seemed heedless; all senses, it
would appear, having been lost or locked up in that of
sight; for, motionless and mute, with immoveable
feature, the perfect imbodiment of despair, he
looked forth from the window, not venturing nigher
to the spot where, in a huge pile, smoking and
kindling
,
lay his devoted commoditieshis entire stock
in trade. The lawyer alone stood by him,
wearing
an expression of countenance as meaningless
as it might well be made.
Do you hear that song, Bunce? was his
question
,
as a stanza of the wild chorus swelled upon
the earDoes your spirit take in its meaning, my
friend.
Friend! was the very natural exclamation of
the person so addressed, as he shrunk from the
touch of the inquirer's hand, while a glance of
concentrated
bitterness and scorn passed rapidly into
his eyes, giving to his countenance, at that moment,
a degree of fierce manhood, which somewhat
elevated
his character even in the sight of Pippin
himself. The sentiment, however, passed from
his features, if not from his heart, as he replied,
reproachfully enough, and justly enough, we may
add, from our knowledge of the whole transaction
Why, lawyer, you needn't ask me that
question
,
or indeed any question, seeing that I owe as
much of this misfortune to you as to anybody
else; for though you did stop when they began the
mischief, yet if you had but acted like a friend,
you could have saved the stuff and kept me out of
harm.
There you do me wrong, pedler. They had
sworn against you long ago, and you know them
well enough to know the devil himself couldn't
stop them when fairly upon the track. But now,
Bunce, don't be down in the mouth. I'm the man
to have justice done you, and get you recompense
for this.
You, lawyer? well, I should like to know how
you calkilate to do that?
I'll tell you. You know my profession.
I guess I do, pretty much.
Thus, thenmost of these are men of substance;
at least they have enough to turn out a pretty good
case each of themnow all you have to do is to
bring suit. I'll do all that, you know, the same as
if you did it yourself. You must lay your
damages
handsomely, furnish a few affidavits, put the
business entirely in my hands, andhow much is
the value of your goods?
Well, I guess they might be worth something
over three hundred and twenty dollars and six
shillings, York money.
Well, give me all the particulars, and I venture
to assure you that I can get five hundred dollars
damages at least, and perhaps a thousand. But of
this we can talk more at leisure when you are in
safety. Where's your cart, Bunce?
On t'other side of the housewhat they've left
of it.
Now, then, while they're busy over the blaze,
put your tackle on, hitch your horse, and take the
back track to my clearing; it's but a short mile and
a quarter, and you'll be there in no time. I'll
follow
in a little while, and we'll arrange and
deliberate
upon the matter.
Well, now, lawyer, but I can'tmy horse, as
you see, having over eat himself, is struck with the
founders and can't budge a step. I put him in
'Squire Dickens' stable, 'long with his animals, and
seeing that he had'nt had much the day before, I
emptied the corn from their trough into his, and jest
see what's come of it. I hadn't ought to done so,
to be sure.
That's bad, Bunce; very badbut that must
not stop you. Your life, Bunce, is in danger, and
I have too much regard for you to let you risk
it by longer stay here. Take my nag, therethe
second one from the tree, and put him in the
gears in place of your own. He's as gentle as a
spaniel, and goes like a deer; so you need'nt be
afraid of him. You know the back track to my
house, and I'll come after you, quietly bringing
your creature along. I 'spose he's not so stiff
but he can bring me.
He can do that, lawyer, I guess, without
difficulty
.
I'll do as you say, and be off pretty slick.
Five hundred dollars damage, lawyereh?
H 2
No matter about that, till I see you. Put your
nag in gears quickly and quietlyyou have little
time to spare!
The pedler proceeded to the work, and was in
a little while ready for a start. But he lingered at
the porch.
I say, lawyer, it's a hard bout they've given
me this time. I did fear they would be rash
and obstropulous, but did'nt think they'd gone
so far. Indeed, it's pretty clear, if it had'nt been
that the cursed cretur failed me, I should not have
trusted myself in the place, after what I was told
they meant to do with me.
Well, but Bunce, you have been rather too sly
in your dealings, and they have, you must confess, a
good deal to complain of. Now, though I said
nothing about it, that coat you sold me for a black
grew red with a week's wear, and threadbare in a
month.
Now, don't talk, lawyer, seeing you ha'n't paid
me for it yet; but that's neither here nor there.
I have, as you say, done some queer things in my
time, and did sell my goods for something more
than might have been their vally; but I hadn't
ought to had such a punishment as this.
The wild song of the rioters rung in his ears,
followed by a proposition, seemingly made with
the utmost gravity, to change the plan of
operations
,
and instead of giving him the ride upon the
rail, cap the blazing goods of his cart with the
proper person of the proprietor. The pedler
lingered
to hear no further; and the quick ear of the
lawyer, as he returned into the hall, distinguished
the rumbling motion of his cart hurrying down the
road. But he had scarcely reseated himself and
resumed his glass, before Bunce also reappeared.
Why, man, I thought you were off. You burn
daylight; though they do say, those whom water
won't drown, rope must hang.
There is some risk, lawyer, to be sure; but
when I recollected how much I want this box, which
you see is a fine one, though they have disfigured
it, I thought I should have time enough to take it
with me, and any thing that might be lying about;
looking around the apartment as he spoke, and
gathering up a few fragments which had escaped
the notice of the enemy.
Begone, fool! exclaimed the lawyer,
impatiently
.
They are upon youthey come
fly for your life, you dogI hear their voices.
I'm off, lawyerand looking once behind
him as he hurried off, the pedler passed from the
rear of the building as they who sought him
re-entered
in front.
The blood's in himthe Yankee will be Yankee
still, though his ears suffer for it, was the
muttered
remark of the lawyer, as he prepared to
encounter
the returning rioters.
CHAPTER VII.
Here be a goodly company enough,
Much merriment and clamournot to speak
Of the fair jest, and laughter-making bowl
Will't please you join us?
It
was at this moment that Forrester entered the
tavern-hall, curious to know the result of the trial,
from which his attendance upon our hero had
unavoidably
detained him. The actors of the drama
were in better humour than before, and uproarious
mirth had succeeded to ferocity. They were all
in the very excess of self-glorification; for, though
somewhat disappointed of their design, and
defrauded
of the catastrophe, they had nevertheless
done much, according to their own judgment, and
enough, perhaps, in that of the reader, for the
purposes
of justice. The work of mischief had been
fully and foully consummated; and though, to their
notion, still somewhat incomplete from the escape
of the pedler himself, they were in great part
satisfied
some
few among them, indeedand among
these our quondam friend Forrester may be
included
were
not sorry that Bunce had escaped
the application of the personal tests which had
been contemplated for his benefit; for, however
willing, it was somewhat doubtful whether they
would have been altogether able to save him from
the hands of those having a less scrupulous regard
to humanity. Still, the uproar of the party, though
now of a less wolfish nature, had undergone little
diminution.
The sudden appearance of Forrester revived the
spirit of the transaction, now beginning somewhat
to decline, as several voices undertook to give him
a veracious account of its progress and results.
The lawyer was in his happiest mood, as things,
so far, had all turned out as he expected. His
voice was loudest, and his oratory more decidedly
effective than ever. The prospect before him was
also of so seductive a character, that he yielded
more than was his wont to the influences of the
bottle-god, standing before him in the shape of the
little negro, who served forth the whiskey, in
compliance
with the popular appetite, from a little
iron-hooped
keg, perched upon a shelf conveniently in
the corner.
Here Cuffee, you thrice-blackened baby of
Beelzebub!why stand you there, arms akimbo,
and showing your ivories, when you see we have no
whiskey! Bring in the jug, you imp of darkness
touch us the Monongahela, and a fresh tumbler
for Mr. Forresterand, look you, one too for Col.
Blundell, seeing he's demolished the other. Quick,
you terrapin!
Cuffee recovered himself in an instant. His
hands fell to his sideshis mouth closed intuitively;
and the whites of his eyes changing their fixed
direction
,
marshalled his way with a fresh jug,
containing
two or more quarts, to the rapacious
lawyer.
Ah, you blackguard, that will donow, Mr.
Forresternow, Col. Blundelldon't be slowno
backing out, boyshey, for a long drink to the stock
in trade of our friend the pedler.
So spoke Pippin: all glasses were at once in
hand, and a wild huzza attested the good-humour
which the proposition excited. Potation rapidly
followed potation, and the jug again demanded
replenishing
.
The company was well drilled in this
species of exercise; and each individual claiming
caste in such sphere and circle, must be well
prepared
,
like the knight-challenger of old tourney, to
defy all comers. In the cases of Pippin and
Blundell
,
successive draughts, after the attainment of a
certain degree of mental and animal stolidity,
seemed rather to fortify than to weaken their
defences
,
and to fit them more perfectly for a due
prolongation
of the warfare. The appetite, too, like
most appetites, growing from what it fed on,
ventured
few idle expostulations; glass after glass, in
rapid succession, fully attested the claim of these
two champions to the renown which such exercises
in that section of the world had won for them
respectively
.
The subject of conversation, which, in
all this time, accompanied their other indulgences
for the American drinker, unlike the German, grows
garrulous with drinkwas very naturally that of
the pedler and his punishment. On this topic,
however
,
a professional not less than personal policy
sealed completely the lips of our lawyer, saving on
those points which admitted of a general remark,
without application or even meaning. Though
drunk, his policy was that of the courts; and the
practice of the sessions had served him well, in his
own person, to give the lie to the
in vino veritas
of the proverb.
Things were in this condition when the company
found increase in the person of the landlord, who
now made his appearance; and, as we purpose
that he shall be no unimportant auxiliar in the
action
of our story, it may be prudent for a few
moments
to dwell upon the details of his outward man,
and severally to describe his features. We have him
before us in that large, dark, and somewhat heavy
person who sidles awkwardly into the apartment,
as if only conscious in part of the true uses of his
legs and arms. He leans at this moment over the
shoulders of one of the company, and, at the same
time, with an upward glance, surveys the whole,
while whispering in his ears. His lowering eyes,
almost shut in and partially concealed by his
scowling
and bushy black eyebrows, are of a quick gray,
stern and penetrating in their general expression,
yet, when narrowly observed, putting on an air of
vacancy, if not stupidity, that furnishes a perfect
blind to the lurking meaning within; his nose is
large, yet not disproportionately so; his head is
well made, though a thorough-bred phrenologist
might object to a strong animal preponderance in
the rear; his mouth, bold and finely curved, is
rigid however in its compression, and the lips, at
times almost woven together, are largely indicative
of ferocity; they are pale in colour, and dingily
so, yet his flushed cheek and brow bear striking
evidence of a something too frequent revel; his
hair, thin and scattered, is of a dark brown
complexion
and sprinkled with gray; his neck is
so very short that a single black handkerchief,
wrapped loosely about it, removes all seeming
distinction between itself and the adjoining
shoulders
the
latter being round and uprising,
forming
a socket, into which the former appears to
fall as into a designated place. As if more
effectually
to complete the unfavourable impression of
such an outline, an ugly scar, partly across the
cheek, and slightly impairing the integrity of the
left nostril, adds to his whole look a sinister
expression
,
calculated to defeat entirely any
neutralizing
or less objectionable feature. His formto
conclude the pictureis constructed with singular
power; and though not symmetrical, is far from
ungainly. When impelled by some stirring
motive
,
his carriage is easy, without seeming effort,
and his huge frame throws aside the sluggishness
which at other times invests it, putting on a habit
of animated exercise which changes the entire
appearance of the man. Such was Walter, or, as
he was more familiarly termed in the conventicle,
Wat Munro. He took his seat with the company,
with the ease of one who neither doubted nor
deliberated
upon the footing which he claimed among
them. He was not merely the publican of his
profession, but better fitted indeed for perhaps
any other avocation, as may possibly be discovered
in the progress of our narrative. To his wife, a good
quiet sort of body, who, as Forrester phrased it,
did not dare to say her soul was her own, he
deputed
the whole domestic management of the
tavern
;
while he would be gone, nobody could say
where or why, for weeks and more at a time,
away from bar and hostel, in different portions of the
country. Nobody ventured to inquire into a
matter
that was still sufficiently mysterious to arouse
curiosity; the people who lived with and about
him generally entertaining a degree of respect,
amounting almost to vulgar awe for his person and
presence, which prevented much inquiry into his
doings. Some few, however, more bold than the
rest, spoke in terms of dislike and suspicion; but
the number of this class was inconsiderable, and
they themselves felt that the risk which they
incurred
was not so unimportant as to permit of
their going much out of the way to trace the
doubtful features in the landlord's life. As we
have already stated, he took his place along with
his guests; the bottles and glasses were
replenished
,
the story of the pedler again told, and each
individual once more busied in describing his own
exploits. The lawyer, immersed in visions of grog
and glory, rhapsodized perpetually and clapped
his hands. Blundell, drunkenly happy, at every
discharge of the current humour, made an abortive
attempt to chuckle, the ineffectual halloo gurgling
away in the abysses of his mighty throat; until,
at length, his head settled down supinely upon his
breast, his eyes were closed, and the hour of his
victory had gone by; though even then, his huge
jaws opening at intervals for the outward passage
of something which by courtesy might be
considered
a laugh, attested the still anxious struggles
of the inward spirit, battling with the weaknesses of
the flesh. The example of a leader like Blundell
had a most pernicious effect upon the uprightness of
the greater part of the wild company. Having
the sanction of such high authority, several others,
the minor spirits it is true, settled down into or
under their chairs without a struggle. The
survivors
made some lugubrious efforts at a triumph
over their less stubborn companions, but the
laborious
and husky laugh was but a poor apology for
the proper performance of this feat. Munro, who
to his other qualities added those of a study
bon
vivant
, together with Forrester, and a few who
still girt in the lawyer as the prince of the small
jest, discharged their witticisms without any dread
of replication, upon the staggering condition of
affairs; not forgetting in their assaults the fruitful
and disputatious civilian himself. That worthy,
we regret to add, though still unwilling to yield,
and still striving to retort, had nevertheless suffered
considerable loss of equilibrium. His speeches
were more than ever confused, and it was
remarked
that his eyes danced about hazily, with a
most moist and ineffectual expression. He looked
about, however, with a stupid gaze of
self-satisfaction
;
but his laugh and language, forming a
Vol. I.I
strange and most unseemly coalition, degenerated
at last into a most dolorous and wo-begone sniffle,
indicating the rapid departure of the few mental
and animal holdfasts which had lingered with him
so long. While thus reduced, his few surviving
senses were at once called into acute activity by
the appearance of a sooty little negro, who placed
within his grasp a misshapen fold of dirty paper,
which a near examination made out to take the
form of a letter.
Why, what the dl, dd sort of fist is this
you've given me, you bird of blackness! where
got you this vile scrawlfaughyou've had it in
your jaws, you raven, have you not?
The terrified urchin retreated a few paces
while answering the inquiry.
No, massa lawyerde pedlerda him gib um
to me so. I bring um straight as he gib um to
me.
The pedlerwhy, where is hewhat the devil
can he have to write about! was the universal
exclamation.
The pedler! said the lawyer, and his
sobriety
grew strengthened at the thought of
business
:
he called to the waiter and whispered in his
ears
Hark ye, Cuffee; go bring out the pedler's
horse, saddle him with my saddle which lies in the
gallery, bring him to the tree, and look ye, make no
noise about it, you scoundrel, as you value your
ears.
Cuffee was gone on his mission, and the whole
assembly, aroused by the name of the pedler and
the mysterious influence of the communication
upon the lawyer, gathered, with inquiries of
impatient
anticipation, around the person of that
worthy. Finding him slow at the revelation, they
clamoured for the contents of the epistle and the
route of the writerneither of which did Pippin
seem desirous to communicate. His evasions and
unwillingness were all in vain, and he was at
length compelled to undertake the perusal of the
scrawl; a task he would most gladly have avoided
while in their presence. He was in doubt and fear
what could the pedler have to communicate, on
paper, which might not have been left over for
their interview? His mind was troubled with
forebodings, and pushing the crowd away from
immediately about him, he tore open the envelope
and began the perusal; proceeding with a
measured
gait, the result as well of the `damned cramp
hand' as of the still foggy intellect and unsettled
vision of the reader. But as the characters and
their signification became more clear and obvious
to his gaze, his features grew more and more
sobered and intelligenta blankness overspread
his facehis hands trembled, and finally, his
apprehensions
,
whatever they might have been, having
seemingly undergone full confirmation, he crumbled
the villanous scrawl in his hands, and dashing it
to the floor in a rage, roared out, in quick
succession
,
volley after volley of invective and
denunciation
upon the thrice blasted head of the
troublesome
and terrible pedler. The provocation must
have been great, no doubt, to impart such
animation
at such a time to the man of law; and the
curiosity of one of the revellers getting the better
of his scruples in such matters, if indeed scruples
of any kind abode in such a section, prompting
him to seize upon the epistle thus pregnant with
mortal matter, in this way the whole secret
became
public property. As, therefore, we shall
violate no confidence and shock no decorum, we
proceed to read it aloud for the benefit of all.
To the Lawyer Pippin, Esquire
.
Dear Lawyer
,
I guess I am pretty safe now from the
regulators
,
and saving my trouble of mind, well enough,
and nothing to complain about. Your animal goes
as slick as grease, and carried me in no time out
of reach of rifle shotso you see it's only right
to thank God, and you, lawyer; for if God hadn't
touched you, and you hadn't lent me the nag, I
guess it would have been a sore chance for my
bones, in the hands of them savages and beasts of
prey.
I've been thinking, lawyer, as I driv along,
about what you said to me, and I guess it's no
more than right and reasonable I should take the
law on 'em; and so I put the case in your hands,
lawyer, to make the most on it; and seeing that
the damages, as you say, may be over five hundred
dollars, why, I don't see but the money is just as
good in my hands as theirs, for so it ought to be.
The bill of particulars, for the notions and other
stuffs, I will send you in the bill. In the
meanwhile
you may say, having something to go upon,
that the whole comes to five hundred and fifty
dollars or thereabouts, for with a little calculation
and figering, I guess it won't be hard to bring it up
to that. This don't count the vally of the cart,
for as I made it myself it didn't cost me much; but,
if you put it in the bill, which I guess you ought to,
put it down for twenty dollars moreseeing that
if I can't trade for one somehow, I shall have to give
something like that for another.
And now, lawyer, there's one thingI don't
like to be in the reach of them 'ere regulators for
some time to come yet, and guess 'twouldn't be
altogether
the wisest to stop short of a ride of fifteen
miles to-nightso, therefore, you see it won't be in
my way, no how, to let you have your nag, which
is a main fine one, and goes slick as a whistle
pretty much as if he and the wagon was made for
one another; but this I guess will be no difference
to you, seeing that you can pay yourself his vally
out of the damages. I'm willing to allow you one
hundred dollars for him, though he an't worth so
much, no how, and the balance of the money you
can send to me, or my brother, in the town of
Meriden, in the state of Conneticut. So no more,
dear lawyer, at this writing, from
Your very humble sarvant to
command, &c. &c.
(Signed) JARED BUNCE.
The dismay of the hapless and horseless attorney,
at this epistle, was only exceeded by the chagrin
with which he perceived its circulation, and
anticipated
the odium in consequence. He leaped
about the hall, among the company, in a restless
paroxysm, now denouncing the pedler, now
deprecating
their doubts and dissatisfaction at finding
out the double game which their chairman had
been playing. This trick of the runaway almost
gave him a degree of favour in their eyes, which did
not find any diminution when the lawyer, rushing
forth from the apartment, with many imprecations,
encountered a new trial in the horse left him by
the pedler; the miserable beast being completely
ruined, unable to move a step, and more dead than
alive. The punishment was complete.
I 2
CHAPTER VIII.
A hopeless discontent, I still depart,
Denied the wholesome lights that others see,
And cheerless in the general providence.
Ralph
opened his eyes at a moderately late
hour on the ensuing morning, and found his
acquaintance
,
Forrester, in close attendance. He
felt himself somewhat sore from his bruises in
falling
,
but the wound gave him little concern.
Indeed
,
he was scarcely conscious of it. He had
slept well, and was not unwilling to enter into the
explanatory conversation which the woodman
begun
.
From him he learned the manner and
situation
in which he had been found, and was made
familiar with a partial history of his present
whereabouts
.
In return, he gave a particular account
of the assault made upon him in the wood, and
of his escapeall of which, already known to
the reader, will call for no additional details. In
reply to the unscrupulous inquiry of Forrester, the
youth, with as little hesitation, declared himself to
be a native of the neighbouring state of South
Carolina
,
born in one of its middle districts, now about
to visit Tennessee. He concluded with giving his
name.
Colleton, Colletonrepeated the other, as if
reviving some recollection of the olden time
Why, 'squire, I once
know'd
a whole family of
that name in Carolina. I'm from Carolina myself,
you must know. There was an old codgera fine
hearty buckold Ralph ColletonColonel Ralph,
as they used to call him. He did have a power of
money, and a smart chance of lands and field
niggers
;
but they did say he was going behind hand,
for he didn't know how to keep what he had. He
was always buying, and living largebut that can't
last for ever. I saw him first at a muster. I was
then just eighteen, and went out with the rest, for
the first time. Maybe, 'squire, I didn't take the
rag off the bush that day. I belonged to Captain
Williams's troop, called the `Bush Whackers.'
We were all fine looking fellows, though I say it
myself. I was no chicken, I tell you. From that
day Mark Forrester wrote himself down `
man
.'
And well he might, 'squire, and no small one neither.
Six feet in stocking-foot, sound in wind and limb
could outrun, outjump, outwrestle, outfight, and
outdo anyhow, any lad of my inches in the whole
district. There was Tom Foster, that for five long
years counted himself cock of the walk, and crowed
like a chicken whenever he came out upon the
ground. You never saw Tom, I reckon, for he went
off to Mississippi after I sowed him up. He couldn't
stand it any longer, since it was no usewell, I
licked him in short order; he wasn't a mouthful.
After that the whole ground was minenobody
could stand before me, 'squire; though now the
case may be different, for Sumter's a district,
'squire, that an't slow at raising game chickens.
At the close of this rambling harangue, Mark
Forrester, as we may now be permitted to call him,
looked down upon his own person with no small
share of complacency. He was, doubtless, all the
man he boasted himself to have been. His
person
,
as we have already briefly described it,
offering
,
as well from its bulk and well distributed
muscle as from its perfect symmetry, a fine model
for the hand of the statuary. After the indulgence
for a few moments in this harmless egotism, he
returned
to the point, as if but now recollected, from
which he set out.
Well, then, Master Colleton, as I was saying,
'twas at this same muster that I first saw the
'squire. He was a monstrous clever old buck now,
I tell you. Why, he thought no more of money
than if it growed in his plantationhe almost
throwed it away for the people to scramble after.
That very day, when the muster was over, he
called all the boys up to Eben Garratt's tavern, and
told old Eben to set the right stuff afloat, and put
the whole score down to him. Maybe old Eben
didn't take him at his word. Eben was a cunning
chap, quite Yankee like, and would skin his shadow
for a saddle back, I reckon, if he could catch it.
I tell you what, when the crop went to town the
old 'squire must have had a mighty smart chance
to pay; for whatever people might say of old
Eben, he knew how to calculate from your pocket
into his with monstrous certainty. Well, then, as
I was saying, 'squire, I shouldn't be afraid to go you
a little bet,your nag agin mine or sothat that
same old Ralph Colleton was some kin of your'n.
You're both of the same stock, I reckon.
I must do all justice to your conjectures,
replied
the youththe person of whom you speak
was indeed a near relative of minehe was no
other than my father.
There nowI could have said as much, for
you look for all the world as if you had come out
of his own mouth. There is a trick of the eye
which I never saw in any but you two; and even
if you had not told me your name, I should have
made pretty much the same calculation about you.
The old 'squire, if I rightly recollect, was
something
stiff in his way, and some people did say he
was proud, and carried himself rather high; but,
for my part, I never saw any difference 'twixt him
and most of our Carolina gentlemen, who, you
know, generally walk pretty high in the collar and
have no two ways about them. For that matter,
however, I couldn't well judge at that timeI may
have been something too young to say for certain,
what was what, at that time of my life.
You are not even now so far advanced in
years, Mr. Forrester, that you speak of your youth
as of a season so very remote. What, I pray, may
be your age? We may ask without offence such
a question of menthe case, where the other sex
is concerned, is, you are aware, something
different
.
The youth seemed studiously desirous of
changing the direction of the dialogue.
Man or woman, 'squire, I see, for my part, no
harm in the question. But do call me Forrester,
or Mark Forrester, whichever pleases you best,
and not mister, as you just now called me. I go
by no other name. Mister is a great word, and
moves people quite too far from one another. I
never have any concern with a man that I have to
mister and sir. I call them 'squire, because that's
a title the law gives themand when I speak to
you, I say 'squire, or Master Colleton. You may be
a 'squire yourself, but whether you are or are not, it
makes no difference; for you get the name from
your father, who is one. Then, again, I call you
masterbecause you see you are but a youth, and
have a long run to overtake my years, few as you
may think them. Besides, master is a friendly
word and comes easy to the tongue. I never, for
my part, could see the sense in mister, except when
people go out to fight, when it's necessary to do
every thing in the politest manner; and then, it
smells of long shot, and cold business, 'squire.
'Tis n't, to my mind, a good word among friends.
The youth smiled slightly and for a moment at
the distinction, drawn with such nicety by his
companion, between words which he had hitherto
been taught to conceive synonymous or nearly so;
and the reasons, such as they were, by which the
woodman sustained his free use of the one to the
utter rejection of the other. He did not think it
advisable or important, however, to make up an
issue on the point, however dissenting from the
logic of his companion; and contented himself
simply with a repetition of the question in which it
had originated.
Why, I take shame to answer you rightly,
'squire, seeing I am no wiser and no better than I
am; but the whole secret of the matter lies in the
handle of this little tomahawk, and this I made out
of a live oak sapling some sixteen years agoIt's
much less worn than I, yet I am twice its age, I
reckon.
You are now then about thirty-two?
Ay, ay, just thirty-two. It don't take much
calculating to make out that. My own schooling,
though little enough for a large man, is more than
enough to keep me from wanting help at such easy
arithmetic.
With the exception of an occasional and
desultory
remark or two, the conversation had reached
a close. The gravitythe almost haughty
melancholy
which, at intervals, appeared the prevailing
characteristic of the manners and countenance of
the youth, served greatly to discourage even the
blunt freedom of Mark Forrester; who seemed
piqued at length by the unsatisfactory issue of
all his endeavours to enlist the familiarity and
confidence
of his companion. This Ralph soon
discovered
he
had good sense and feeling sufficient
to perceive the necessity of some alteration in his
habit, if he desired a better understanding with
one, whose attendance, at the present time, was not
only unavoidable but indispensableone who
might be of use, and who was not only willing and
well-intentioned, but to all appearances honest and
harmless, and to whom he was already so largely
indebted. With an effort, therefore, not so much
of mind as of mood, he broke the ice which his own
indifference had suffered to close, and by giving a
legitimate excuse for the garrulity of his
companion
,
unlocked once more the treasure-house of his
good-humour and volubility.
From the dialogue thus recommenced, we are
enabled to take a farther glance into the history of
Master Mark Forrester's early life. He was, as
he phrased it, from old So. Ca. pronouncing the
name of the state in the abridged form of its
written
contraction. In one of the lower districts he
still held, in fee, a small but inefficient patrimony;
the profits of which were put to the use of a young
sister. Times, however, had grown hard, and
with the impatience and restlessness so peculiar
to nearly all classes of the people of that state,
Mark set out in pursuit of his fortune among
strangers. He loved from his childhood all hardy
enterprises; all employments calculated to keep
his spirit from slumbering in irksome quiet in his
breast. He had no relish for the labours of the
plough, and looked upon the occupation of his
forefathers
as by no means fitted for the spirit, which,
with little beside, they had left him. The warmth,
excitability, and restlessness which were his
prevailing
features of temper, could not bear the slow
process of tilling and sowing and cultivating the
earthwatching the growth and generations of
pigs and potatoes, and listening to that favourite
music with the staid and regular farmer, the
shooting
of the corn in the still nights, as it swells with
a respiring movement, distending the contracted
sheaves which enclose it. In addition to this
antipathy
to the pursuits of his ancestors, Mark had
a decided desire, a restless ambition, prompting
him to see and seek and mingle with the world.
He was fond, as our readers may have observed
already, of his own eloquence, and having worn
out the patience and forfeited the attention of all
auditors at home, he was compelled, in order to the
due appreciation of his faculties, to seek for others
less experienced abroad. Like wiser and greater
men, he too had been won away, by the desire of
rule and reference, from the humble quiet of his
native fireside; and if, in after life, he did not
bitterly
repent of the folly, it was because of that
light-hearted and sanguine buoyancy of
temperament
which never deserted him quite, and
supported
him in all events and through every
vicissitude
.
He had wandered much after leaving his
parental home, and was now engaged in an
occupation
and pursuit which our future pages must
develop. Having narrated in his desultory way
to his companion, the facts which we have
condensed
,
he conceived himself entitled to some share
of that confidence of which he had himself
exhibited
so fair an example; and the cross
examination
which followed did not vary very materially
from that to which most wayfarers in this region
are subjected, and of which, on more than one
occasion
,
they have been heard so vociferously to
complain.
Well, Master Ralphunless my eyes greatly
miscalculate, you cannot be more than nineteen or
twenty at the most; and if one may be so bold,
what is it that brings one of your youth and
connexions
abroad into this wilderness, among wild
men and wild beasts, and we gold-hunters, whom
men do say are very little if any better than
them?
Why, as respects your first conjecture,
Master
Forrester, returned the youth, you are by no
means out of the way. I am not much over
nineteen
,
and am free to confess, do not care to be held
much older. Touching your further inquiry, not to
seem churlish, but rather to speak frankly and in a
like spirit with yourself, I am not desirous to repeat
to others the story that has been, perhaps, but
learned in part by myself. I do not exactly believe
that it would promote my plans to submit them to
the examination of other people; nor do I think that
any person whomsoever would be very much
benefited
by the knowledge. You seem to have
forgotten
,
however, that I have already said that I
am journeying to Tennessee.
Left Carolina for good and all, heh?
Yesperhaps for ever. But we will not talk
of it.
Well, you're in a wild world now, 'squire.
This is no strange region to me, though I have
lost my way in it. I have passed a season in the
county of Gwinnett and the neighbourhood, with
my uncle's family, when something younger, and
have passed, twice, journeying between Carolina
and Tennessee, at no great distance from this
very spot. But your service to me, and the fact
of your Carolina birth, deserves that I should be
more free in my disclosures; and to account for
the sullenness of my temper, which you may
regard
as something inconsistent with our
relationship
,
let me say, that whatever my prospects might
have been and whatever my history may be, I am
at this moment altogether indifferent as to the
course which I shall pursue. It matters not very
Vol. I.K
greatly to me whether I take up my abode among
the neighbouring Cherokees, or, farther on, along
with them, pursue my fortunes upon the shores of
the Red River or the Missouri. I have become,
during the last few days of my life, rather
reckless
of human circumstance; and, perhaps, more
criminally indifferent to the necessities of my
nature and my responsibilities to society and
myself, than might well beseem one so youthful,
and, as you say, with prospects like those which
you conjecture, and not erroneously, to have been
mine. All I can say is, that when I lost my
pathway
last evening, my first feeling was one of a
melancholy satisfaction; for it seemed to me that
destiny itself had determined to contribute towards
my aim and desire, and to forward me freely in the
erratic progress, which, in a gloomy mood, I had
most desperately and perhaps childishly
undertaken
.
The tone in which these remarks were made,
enforced, in a great measure, the truth, in his own
belief at least, of that portion of the youth's
language
which spoke of his indifference to his
future
destiny. There was a stern melancholy in
the deep and low utterancethe close compression
of lipthe steady, calm eye, that somewhat tended to
confirm the almost savage sentiment of despairing
indifference to life, which his sentiments conveyed;
and had the effect of eliciting a larger degree of
respectful consideration from the somewhat
uncouth
but really well-meaning and kind companion
who stood beside him. Mark Forrester had good
sense enough to perceive that the youth had been
gently and well nurtured and deferentially treated
that his pride or vanity, or perhaps some nobler
emotion, had suffered slight or rebuke; and that it
was more than probable this emotion would, before
long, give place to others, if not of a more manly
and spirited, at least of a more reflective and
reasonable
character. Accordingly, without appearing to
annex any importance to, or even to perceive the
melancholy defiance contained in the speech of the
young man, he confined himself entirely to a
passing
comment upon the facility with which, having
his eyes open, and the bright sunshine and green
trees for his guides, he had suffered himself to lose
his wayan incident excessively ludicrous in the
contemplation of one, who, in his own words, could
take the tree with the 'possum, the scent with the
hound, the swamp with the deer, and be in at the
death with all of themfor whom the woods had
no labyrinth, and the night no mystery. He
laughed heartily at the simplicity of the youth, and
entered into many details, not so tedious as long,
of the various hair-breadth escapes, narrow chances
and curious enterprises of his own initiation into
the secrets of wood-craft, and to the trials and
perils of which, in his own probation, his
experience
had necessarily subjected him. At length he
concluded his narrative by seizing upon one
portion
of Ralph's language with an adroitness and
ingenuity that might have done credit to an older
diplomatist; and went on to invite the latter to
quarter upon himself for a few weeks at least.
Well, Master Colletonso you see you are
rambling, as you say, indifferent quite as to what
quarter of the compass you turn the head of your
creaturesuppose now you take up quarters with
me. I have, besides this room, which I only keep for
my use of a Saturday and Sunday when I come to
the villagea snug lodge a few miles off, and there's
room enough, and provisions enough, if you'll only
stop a while and take what's going. Plenty of hog and
hominy at all times, and we don't want for other and
better things, if we please. Come, stay with me for
a month, or long as you choose, and when you
think to go, I can put you on your road at an hour's
warning. In the mean time, I can show you all
that's to be seen. I can show you where the gold
grows, and may be had for the gathering. We've
snug lodgings, plenty of venison; and, as you must
be a good shot coming from Carolina, you may
bring down at day-dawn of a morning, a sluggish
wild turkey, so fat that he will split open the
moment
he strikes the ground. Don't fight shy,
now, 'squire, and we'll have sport long as you
choose to stay with us.
The free and hearty manner of the woodman,
who, as he concluded his invitation, grasped the
hand of the youth warmly in his own, spoke quite
as earnestly as his language, and Ralph in part
fell readily into a proposal which promised
something
in the way of diversion. He gave Forrester to
understand that he would probably divide his time
for a few days between the tavern and his lodge,
which he proposed to visit whenever he felt
himself
perfectly able to manage his steed. He
signified
his acknowledgment of the kindness of his
companion with something less of hauteur than
had hitherto characterized him; and remembering
that on the subject of the assault made upon him,
Forrester had said little, and that too wandering to
be considered, he again brought it up to his
consideration
,
and endeavoured to find a clew to the
persons of those enacting the outlaws, whom he
had endeavoured, though very imperfectly, to
describe
.
On this point, however, he procured but
little satisfaction. The description which he gave
of the individual assailant whom alone he had been
enabled to distinguish, though evidently under
certain
disguises, was not sufficient to permit of
Forrester's
identification. The woodman was
something
at a loss, though evidently satisfied that the
parties were not unknown to him in some other
character. As for the Pony Club, he gave its
history, confirmatory of that already related by the
outlaw himself; and though avowing his own
personal
fearlessness on the subject, did not withhold
his opinion that the members were not to be trifled
with:
And, a word in your ear, 'squireone half of
the people you meet with in this quarter know
more of the Pony Club than is becoming in honest
menso steer clear of them, and keep a sharp
look-out right and left, if you would get off with
whole bones. They'll hardly trouble a body here,
for you see there's some of us that can pull
trigger and fling a knife, and won't stand long to
think when honest folks are in danger. But I'll
see you again in an hour. I must go and look after
our horses.
K 2
CHAPTER IX.
Is not the feast prepared? why sit ye not,
Cheerly, at ease, and with an appetite
Which, if the sauce be wanting, shall supply
That which it lacks of, so ye note it not?
Fall to, I pray.
So young, and yet so desolate'tis sad,
The wilderness should win the city's loss,
Yet know not of its gain.
In
a few days, so much for the good nursing of
Forrester, and of his
soi-disant
medical attendant,
Colleton was able to descend to the lower
apartments
of the tavern. His wound had been slight,
and its treatment fortunate; his bruises were less
manageable, and from these he suffered infinitely
more than from the shot. With a hardy frame,
however
,
and an impatient spirit, Ralph contrived to
conquer much of the pain and inconvenience which
they gave him, and proving how much in these
matters depends upon the will, to resume his
erect posture as if nothing had occurred. His
exercise, however, was moderated duly, so as not
to irritate anew his fast healing injuries. On this
point, Forrester, who assumed all the offices of
counsellor, was rigid, and it was only after repeated
overtures on the part of the youth, and a lapse of
several days, in all of which his impatience had
been loud, that he permitted him to descend to the
dinner-table of the inn, in compliance with the
clamorous warning of the huge bell which stood
at the entrance.
It was a subject of much doubt and deliberation
in our mind, whether or not to furnish to the
reader a full and dainty detail of the viands spread
out on the present occasion. A supper or dinner
has at all times been a favourite theme for display
among the romancers. They appear to have
seized upon it for portraiture and description,
with as much reckless avidity usually as the
most hungry knight among them might be
conjectured
to exhibit towards the real banquet and
the substantials, after the labour of a hard day's
fight for his honour and his mistress. Regarding
such a theme evidently with an eye of great
favourpossibly, as a common passage of arms,
attesting the due degree of skill necessary for
permission
to enter upon the liststhere are few
among our ablest writers in this field that have
withheld their whole strength from the subject.
Scott, following the example of Homer, always
feeds his heroes well; and some excellent lessons
might be gleaned from his writings by those
over-delicate
novelists, who seldom furnish hero or
heroine
with an appetite at all. Cooper keeps his
adventurers well also, and is particular to have
them fully supplied when in the woods and among
the Indians. We cannot say that Bulwer has often
admitted us to a regular dinner-partyGuloseton
is no exceptionunless it be among the rogues
associated with one of his heroes, in the stews of
London; but enough for example, in this particular,
as well as authority, may be found in the
industriously
plied labours of the thousand and one
followers and rivals of these great leaders in the
field we speak of. Nor have our purely American
writersa tribe rather servilely dependent, we are
constrained to admit, upon the dicta of
European
authoritydisdained imitation in this respect.
It is rather remarkable that the very best passages
from sundry of their worksso far as they appear
to have been penned
con amore
, and under the
influence
of a spirit highly susceptible to the
operations
of its own fanciesare devoted to this sort
of description. They have dilated with singular
and conscious felicity, linked with a strange
viand-like
fascination of style, fitly illustrative of the
subject
,upon
the grace of gravies, the cream of
custards
,
the currency of currantsthe fantasies, in
short, of fish, flesh, and fowl alike; and with a
glorious hocus pocus, worthy of the weird sisters
of Macbeth, they have made the whole earth and
every sea contribute their dainty delectabilities,
as indeed they should, to the pleasing of the
palate
of that hero, in whose fortunes, as in duty bound,
the whole world must be so much interested. The
compounds and concatenations of Paristhat
centre
of soup and civilizationmingled on the same
board with the more solid characteristics of John
Bull's refectory in London, exhibit a more
beautiful
national affinity, than, in political matters, we
can ever hope to see take place between them.
To these we may add the almost savage
association
of ponderosities and delicacies, in the furnishing
of which the generous purveyor has seemingly
spared neither labour nor expense, though
sacrificing
,
most grievously we take it, all pretensions
to good taste and a decent propriety, in the choice
and distribution of his various dishes.
It was therefore, as we have already said, with
a deliberation certainly due to, and imperatively
demanded by the subject, that we debated with
ourselves
as to what we should do in the furnishing
our hero's dinner-table. What shall we have,
landlord
what's
in the larder, most sweet hostess?
Wanting in the Dame Quickly, and the Mistress
Ford, and sweet Anne Page, and that most truculent
and magnificent of all worthies, Sir John Falstaff,
our apprehensions as to the quality of our viands,
by way of recompense for our other deficiencies,
were only reasonable. We dreaded too, lest with
a reference to what we have all this time been
saying, we should not be able to provide our
readers
with that kind and quality of repast, to which
it was but fair to infer their appetites had been
accustomed; and, not without much hesitation,
many misgivings, and a close examination into our
right, as good chroniclers, to withhold any thing
however humble in the progress of our story, we
determined upon the seemingly rash step which
in part we have taken. We perfectly well knew,
that in our semi-barbarian region, south of the
Potomac
,
or, in more familiar phrase, of Mason's and
Dixon's linewe could not cater so widely or so
variously for the dinner-table as in the land of
notions and novelties, where the apples grow ready
baked, in pies of goodly dimensions, and where
Cape Cod, tendering its all bountiful aids and
auxiliars
,
robs the sea-serpent of those delicate fins for
which, it appears, in just revenge, he has pursued
the smackmen into the very harbours of Yankee
land. Our apprehensions may well be conceived,
therefore, though it passes our ability to describe
them, until, calling a council of war with our
hostess, Mrs. Dorothy Munro,whom your eye
may perceive doling out sundry capacious plates
of soup from the corpulent vessel beside her,
we determined, in few words, rather with the
view to the enlightenment than the temptation of
the reader, to set the repast, such as it is, without
further hesitation before him.
The company at the dinner-table was much less
numerous than that assembled in the great hall at
the trial of the pedler. Many of the persons then
present were not residents, but visiters in the
village
from the neighbouring country, who had
congregated
there, as is usually the case, on each
Saturday of the week, with the view not less to
the procuring of their necessaries, than the
enjoyment
of company. Having attended in the first
place to the ostensible objects of their visit, the
village
tavern, in the usual phrase, brought them
up; and in social, yet wild carousal, they
commonly
spent the residue of the day. It was in
this way that they met their acquaintancefound
society, and obtained the news; objects of primary
importance, at all times, with a people whose
insulated
positions, removed from the busy mart
and the stirring crowd, left them no alternative
but to do this or rust altogether. The regular
lodgers of the tavern were not numerous therefore,
and consisted in the main of those labourers in the
diggings who had not yet acquired the means of
establishing a household of their own.
There was little form or ceremony in the
proceedings
of the repast. Colleton was introduced
by a few words from the landlord to the landlady,
Mrs. Dorothy aforesaid, and to a young girl, her
niece, who sat beside her. It does not need that we
say much in regard to the formershe interferes
with no heart in our story; but Lucy, her niece,
may not be overlooked so casually. She has not
only attractions in herself which claim our notice,
but occupies no minor interest in the story we
propose
to narrate. Her figure was finely formed,
slight and delicate, but neither diminutive nor feeble
of fair proportion, symmetry, and an ease and
grace of carriage and manners belonging to a far
more refined stage of social organization than that
in which we find her. But this is easily accounted
for, and the progress of our tale will save us the
trouble of dwelling farther upon it now. Her skin,
though slightly tinged by the sun, was beautifully
smooth and fair. Her features might not be held
regular; perhaps not exactly such as in a critical
examination we should call or consider handsome;
but they were attractive nevertheless, strongly
marked, and well defined. Her eyes were darkly
blue; not languishingly so, but on the contrary
rather lively and intelligent in their accustomed
expression
.
Her mouth, exquisitely chiselled, and
coloured by the deepest blushes of the rose, had a
seductive persuasiveness about it that might readily
win one's own to some unconscious liberties; while
the natural position of the lips, leaving them slightly
parted, gave to the eye an added attraction in the
double range which was displayed beneath of
pearl-like
and well-formed teeth; her hair was unconfined,
but short; and rendered the expression of her
features
more youthful and girl-like than might have
been the result of its formal arrangementit was
beautifully glossy, and of a dark brown colour.
Her demeanour was that of maidenly reserve and
a lady-like dignity, a quiet serenity, approaching
at periods, when any remark calculated to
infringe
in the slightest degree upon those precincts
with which feminine delicacy and form have
guarded its possessora stern severity of glance,
approving her a creature taught in the true school
of propriety, and chastened with a spirit that slept
not on a watch, always of perilous exposure in one
so young and of her sex. On more than one
occasion
did Ralph, in the course of the dinner,
remark
the indignant fire flashing from her intelligent
eye, when the rude speech of some untaught boor
assailed a sense finely wrought to appreciate the
proper boundaries to the always adventurous
footstep
of unbridled licentiousness. The youth felt
assured from these occasional glimpses that her
education
had been derived from a different influence,
and that her spirit deeply felt and deplored the
humiliation
of her present condition and abode.
The dinner-table, to which we now come, and
which two or three negroes have been busily
employed
in cumbering with well filled plates and
dishes, was most plentifully furnished; though but
few of its contents could properly be classed
under the head of delicacies. There were eggs
and ham, hot biscuits, hominy, milk,
marmalade
,
venison,
Johnny
, or journey cakes, and dried
fruits stewed. These, with the preparatory soup,
formed the chief components of the repast. Every
thing was served up in a style of neatness and
cleanliness, that, after all, was perhaps the best of
all possible recommendations to the feast; and
Ralph soon found himself quite as busily employed
as was consistent with prudence, in the destruction
and overthrow of the tower of biscuits, the pile
of eggs, and such other of the edibles around him
as were least likely to prove injurious to his
debilitated
system. The table was not large and the
seats were soon occupied. Villager after villager
had made his appearance and taken his place
without
calling for observation; and, indeed, so busily
were all employed, that he who should have made
his entre at such a time with an emphasis
commanding
notice, might, not without reason, have been set
down as truly and indefensibly impertinent. So
might one have thought, not employed in like
manner
and surveying the prospect. Forrester alone
contrived to be less selfish than those about him,
and our hero found his attentions at times rather
troublesome and provoking. Whatever in the eye
and estimation of the woodman seemed attractive, he
studiously thrust into the youth's plate, pressing
him to eat, long after the main supplies had been
furnished to the activity of his masticatory
members
.
Chancing at one of these periods of
polite
provision on the part of his quondam friend, to
direct his glance to the opposite extreme of the
table, he was struck with the appearance of a man
whose eyes were fixed upon himself with an
expression
which he could neither comprehend nor
tolerate. The look of this man was naturally of a
sinister kind, but now his eyes wore a malignant
aspect, which not only aroused the youth's remark
and indignant retort through the same medium, but
struck him as indicating a feeling of hatred to
himself of a most singular character. Meeting
thus the responsive look of the youth, the stranger
rose hurriedly and left the table, but still lingered
in the room. Ralph was struck with his
features
,
which it appeared to him he had seen before,
but as the person wore around his cheeks,
encompassing
his head, a thick handkerchief, it was
impossible
for him to decide well upon them. He
turned to Forrester, who was busily intent upon the
dissection of a chicken, and in a low tone inquired
the name of the stranger. The woodman looked
up and replied
Who, that?that's Guy Riversthough what
he's got his head tied up for I can't say. I'll ask
him and with the word, he at once did so.
In answer to the question, Rivers explained his
bandaging by charging his jaws to have caught cold
rather against his will, and to have swelled
somewhat
in consequenceand while making this reply,
our hero again caught his glance, curiously fixed
upon himself, with an expression which again
provoked
his surprise, and occasioned a gathering
sternness in the look of fiery indignation which he
Vol. I.L
sent back in return. Rivers immediately after this
by-play
left the apartment. The eye of Ralph changed
its direction, and beheld that of the young maiden
observing him closely, with an expression of
countenance
so alive with anxiety, that he felt persuaded
she must have beheld the mute intercourse, if so
we may call it, between himself and the person
whose conduct had so ruffled him. The colour
had fled from her cheek, and there was something of
warning in her gaze. The polish and propriety
which had distinguished her conduct so far as he
had seen it, was so different from any thing that he
had been led to expect, and reminded him so
strongly of associations of another region, that,
rising from the table, he approached the place
where she sat, took a chair beside her, and with a
gentleness and ease of manner, the due result of
his own education and of the world he had lived
in, commenced a conversation on trivial and
legitimate
topics, and was pleased to find himself
encountered
by a modest freedom of opinion, a grace
of manner, and a general intelligence, which
promised
him better company than he had looked for.
The villagers had left the apartment, all but
Forrester
;
who, following Ralph's example, took up
a seat beside him, and sat a pleased listener to a
dialogue in which the intellectual charm was strong
enough, except at very occasional periods, to
prevent
him from contributing much. The old lady
sat silently by. She was a trembling, timid body,
thin, pale, and emaciated, who appeared to have
suffered much, and certainly stood in as much awe
of the man whose name she bore as it was well
fitting in such a relationship to permit. She said
as little as Forrester, but seemed equally well
pleased with the attentions and the conversation of
the youth.
Find you not this place lonesome, Miss Munro?
You have been used, or I mistake much, to a more
cheering, a more civilized region.
I have, sir, and sometimes I repinenot so
much at the world I live in, as for the world I have
lost. Had I those about me with whom my earlier
years were passed, the lonely situation and the
little circle would trouble me slightly.
She uttered these words with a sorrowful voice,
and the moisture gathered around the blue spheres,
which derived additional brightness from its
proximity
.
The youth, after a passing and
commonplace
remark upon the vast difference upon the
heart between moral and physical privations, went
on
Perhaps, Miss Munro, with a true knowledge
of all the conditions of life, there may be thought
little philosophy in the tears we shed at such
privations
.
The fortune that is unavoidable,
however
,
I have always found the more deplorable for
that very reason. I shall have to watch well, that I
too be not surprised with regrets of a like nature
with your own, since I find myself recurring
mentally
to a world which perhaps I shall have little
more to do with.
Rising from her seat, and leaving the room as
she spoke, with a smile of studied gayety upon her
countenance, full also of earnestness and a
significance
of manner that awakened surprise in the
person addressed, the maiden replied
Let me suggest, sir, that you observe well the
world you are in; and do not forget, in recurring to
that which you leave, that while deploring the loss of
friends in the one you may be unconscious of the
enemies which surround you in the other.
Perhaps
,
sir, you will find my philosophy in this
particular
the most useful, if not the most agreeable.
Wondering at her language, which, though of
general remark, and fairly deducible from the
conversation
,
he could not avoid referring to a
peculiar
origin, the youth rose, and bowed with
respectful
courtesy as she retired. His eye followed
her form for an instant, while his meditations
momentarily
wrapped themselves up more and more
in inextricable mysteries, from which his utmost
ingenuity of thought failed entirely to disentangle
him. In a maze of conjecture he passed from the
room into the passage adjoining, and, taking
advantage
of its long range, promenaded with steps, and
a spirit, now moody and uncertain. In a little time
he was joined by Forrester, who seemed solicitous
to divert his mind and relieve his melancholy, by
describing the country round, the pursuits,
characters
and conditions of the peoplethe habits of
the miners, and the productiveness of their employ,
in a manner inartificial and modest, and
sometimes
highly entertaining. While engaged in this
way, the eye of Ralph caught the look of
Rivers, again fixed upon him from the doorway
leading into the great hall; and without a moment's
hesitation, with impetuous step, he advanced
towards
him, determined on some explanation of that
curious interest which had become offensive; but
when he approached him with this object the
individual
sought hastily left the passage. Taking
Forrester's
arm, Ralph also left the house, in the hope
to encounter him in the neighbourhood; but failing
in this, they proceeded to examine the village, or
such portions of it as might be surveyed without
too much fatigue to the wounded manwhose
hurts, though superficial, might by imprudence
become
troublesome. They rambled till the sun
went down, and at length returned to the tavern.
This building, as we have elsewhere said, was of
the very humblest description, calculated, it would
seem, rather for a temporary and occasional than a
lasting shelter. Its architecture, compared with
that even of the surrounding log houses of the
country generally, was excessively rude; its parts
were out of all relative proportion, fitted
seemingly
by an eye the most indifferent, and certainly
without any, the most distant regard, to square and
compass. It consisted of two stories, the upper
being assigned to the sleeping apartments. Each
floor contained four rooms, accessible all,
independently
of one another, by entrances from a great
passage, running both above and below, through
the centre of the structure. In addition to the
main building, a shed in the rear of the main work
afforded four other apartments, rather more closely
constructed and in somewhat better finish than the
rest of the structure: these were in the
occupation
of the family exclusively. The logs, in this
work, were barbarously uneven, and hewn only to
a degree barely sufficient to permit of a tolerable
level when placed one upon the other. Morticed
together at the ends, so very loosely had the work
been done, that a timid observer, and one not
accustomed
to the survey of such fabrics, might
entertain
many misgivings of its security when one
of those severe hurricanes were raging which in
some seasons of the year so dreadfully desolate
the southern and southwestern country.
Chimneys
of clay and stone intermixed, of the rudest
fashion, projected from the two ends of the building,
threatening, with the toppling aspect which they
wore, the careless way farer, and leaving it something
more than doubtful whether the oblique and outward
direction which they took was not the result of a wise
precaution against a degree of contiguity with the
fabric they were meant to warm, which, from the
L 2
liberal fires of the pine woods, might have proved
unfavourable to the protracted existence of either.
The interior of the building aptly accorded with
its outline. It was unceiled, and the rude March
winds were only excluded from access through the
interstices between the remotely allied logs, by the
free use of the soft clay easily attainable in all that
range of country. The light on each side of the
building was received through the medium of a
few small windows, one of which only was allotted
to each apartment, and this was generally found to
possess as many, and perhaps as fully secure
modes of fastening as those of the jail oppositea
precaution referable to the great dread of the
Indian
outrages, and which their near neighbourhood
and irresponsible and vicious habits were well
calculated
to inspire. The furniture of the hotel
amply accorded with all the other features of the
Chestatee Public. A single large and two small
tablesa few old oaken chairs, of domestic
manufacture
,
with bottoms made of the ox or deer
skin, tightly drawn over the seat, and either tied
below with small cords or tacked upon the sides
a broken mirror, that stood ostentatiously over the
mantel, surmounted in turn by a well-smoked
picture
of the Washington family, in a tarnished gilt
frame, asserting the Americanism of the
proprietor
and placecompleted the contents of the great
hall, and was a fair specimen of what might be
found in all the other apartments. The tavern
itself, in reference to the obvious pursuit of many
of those who made it their home, was entitled the
Golden Egga title made sufficiently notorious
to the spectator, from a huge signboard, elevated
some eight or ten feet above the building itself,
bearing
upon a light blue ground a monstrous egg of
the deepest yellow, the effect of which was duly
heightened by a strong and thick shading of
sable
all round itthe artist, in this way, calculating
no doubt to afford the object so encircled its
legitimate
relief. Lest, however, his design in the
painting itself should be at all questionable, he had
taken the wise precaution of showing what he
meant by printing the words Golden Egg, in
huge Roman letters beneath itthese, in turn, being
placed above another inscription, running,
Entertainment
for man and horse.
But the night had now closed in and coffee was
in progress. Ralph took his seat with the rest of
the lodgers of the Golden Egg, though without
partaking of the feast. Rivers did not make his
appearance, much to the chagrin of the youth,
who was excessively desirous to account for the
curious observance of this man. He had some
notion
besides that the former was not utterly
unknown
to him; for though unable to identify him
with any one recollection, his features (what could
be seen of them) were certainly not altogether
unfamiliar
.
After supper, requesting Forrester's
company in his chamber, he left the company, not
however without a few moments of chat with
Lucy Munro and her aunt, conducted with some
spirit by the former, and seemingly much to the
satisfaction of all. As they left the room, Ralph
spoke:
I am not now disposed for sleep, Forrester, and
if you please, I should be glad to hear further about
your village and the country at large. Something,
too, I would like to know of this man Rivers,
whose face strikes me as one that I should know,
and whose eyes have been haunting me to-day
rather more frequently than I altogether like, or
shall be willing to submit to. Give me an hour,
then, if not fatigued, in my chamber, and we will
talk over these matters together.
Well, 'squire, that's just what pleases me now.
I like good company, and 'twill be more
satisfaction
to me, I reckon, than to you. As for fatigue,
that's out of the question. Somehow or other, I
never feel fatigued when I've got somebody to talk
to.
With such a disposition, I wonder, Forrester,
you have not been more intimate with the young
lady of the house. Miss Lucy seems quite an
intelligent
girl, well-behaved and virtuous.
Why, 'squire, she is all that; but though
modest
and not proud, as you may see, yet she's a
little above my mark. She is book-learned, and I
am not; and she paints, and is a musician too, and
has all the accomplishments. She was an only
child, and her father was quite another sort of
person
from his brother who now has her in
management
.
She is an orphan, then?
Yes, poor girl, and she feels pretty clearly that
this isn't the sort of country in which she has a
right to live. I like her very well, but, as I say,
she's a little above me; and besides, you must know,
'squire, I'm rather fixed in another quarter.
They had now reached the chamber of our hero,
and the servant having placed the light and retired,
the parties took seats, and the conversation
recommenced
.
I know not how it is, Forrester, said the youth,
but there are few men whose looks I so little like,
and whom I would more willingly avoid, than that
man Rivers. What he is I know notbut I
dislike
his face. I may be doing wrong to the man,
and injustice to his character; but, really, his eye
strikes me as singularly malicious, almost
murderous
;
and though not apt to shrink from men at any
time, it provoked something of a shudder to-day
when it met my own, which I was most heartily
ashamed of, but which I could not well prevent. He
may be, and perhaps you may be able to say,
whether he is a worthy person or notfor my
part, I should only regard him as one to be watched
jealously and carefully avoided. There is
something
creepingly malignant in the look which shoots
out from his eyes, like that of the rattlesnake,
when coiled and partially concealed in the brake.
When I looked upon this man's eye, as it somewhat
impertinently singled me out for observation, I
almost
felt disposed to lift my heel as if the
venomous
reptile were crawling under it.
You are not the only one, 'squire, that's afraid
of Guy Rivers.
Afraid of him! you mistake me, Forrester; I
fear no man replied the youth, somewhat
hastily
interrupting the woodman. I am not apt to
fear, and certainly have no such feeling in relation
to this person. I distrust, and would avoid him,
merely as one, who, while possessing none of the
beauty, may yet have many of the propensities and
some of the poison of the snake to which I likened
him.
Well, squire, I didn't use the right word, that's
certain, when I said afraid, you see; because 't'ant
in Carolina and Georgia, and hereabouts that
cowards
grow well, or men are apt to get frightened
at trifles. But, as you say, Guy Rivers is not the
man, and everybody here knows it, and keeps
clear of him. None care to say much to him
except
when it's a matter of necessity, and then they
say as little as may be. Nobody knows much
about himhe is here to-day and gone to-morrow
and we never see much of him except when
there's some mischief afoot. He is thick with
Munro, and they keep together at all times I
believe; he has money, and knows how to spend
it. Where he gets it, is quite another thing.
What can be the source of the intimacy
between
himself and Munro? Is he interested in the
hotel?
Why, I can't say for that, but I think not. The
fact is, the tavern is nothing to Munro; he don't
care a straw about it, and some among us do
whisper, that he only keeps it a-going as a kind
of cover and apology for other practices. There's
no doubt that they drive some trade together,
though what it is I can't say, and never gave
myself
much trouble to inquire. I can tell you what
though, there's no doubt on my mind that he's
trying
to get Miss Lucythey say he's fond of her
but I know for myself she hates and despises him,
and don't stop to let him see it.
She will not have him then, you think?
I know she won't if she can help it. But, poor
girl, what can she do? she's at the mercy, as you
may say, of Munro, who is her father's brother
and he don't care a straw for her likes or dislikes.
If he says the word, I reckon she can have nothing
to say which will help her much out of the
difficulty
.
I'm sure he wont regard prayers, or tears,
or any of her objections.
It's a sad misfortune to be forced into
connexion
with one in whom we may not confide
whom we can have no sympathy withwhom we
cannot love!
'Tis so, squireand that's just her case, and she
hates to see the very face of him, and avoids him
whenever she can do so, without giving offence
to her uncle, who, they say, has spoke to and
threatened her bitterly about the scornful
treatment
of Rivers. It's a wonder to me how any
person, man or woman, can do otherwise than
despise
the fellow; for, look you, squire, over and
above his sulky, sour looks, and his haughty
conduct
,
would you believe it, he wont drink himself,
yet he's always for getting other people drunk. But
that's not all: he's a quarrelsome, spiteful,
sore-headed
chap, that wont do as other people. He
never laughs heartily like a man, but always in a
half sniffling sort of manner that actually makes
me sick at my stomach. Then, he never plays and
makes merry along with us, and, if he does, harm is
always sure, somehow or other, to come of it.
When other people dance and frolic, he stands
apart, with a sour scorn in his face, and his black
brows gathering clouds in such a way that he
would put a stop to all sport if people were only
fools enough to mind him. For my part, I take
care to have just as little to say to him as possible,
and he to me, indeed; for he knows me just as
well as I know him, and he knows too that if he
only dared to crook his finger, I'm just the man
that would mount him on the spot.
Ralph could not exactly comprehend the force
of some of the objections urged by his companion to
the character of Riversthose, in particular, which
described his aversion to the sports common to the
people, only indicated a severe temper of mind and
habit, and though rather in bad taste, were certainly
not criminal. Still there was enough to confirm
his own hastily formed suspicions of this person,
and to determine him more fully upon a
circumspect
habit while in his neighbourhood. He saw
that his dislike and doubt were fully partaken of
by those, who, from circumstance and not choice,
were his associates; and felt satisfied, though as
we have seen, without the knowledge of any one
particular which might afford a reasonable
warranty
for his antipathy, that a feeling so general as
Forrester described it, could not be altogether
without
foundation. He felt assured, by an innate
prediction of his own spirit, unuttered to his
companion
,
that, at some period, he should find his
anticipations
of this man's guilt fully realized, though,
at that moment, he did not dream that he, himself,
in becoming his victim, should furnish to his own
mind an almost irrefutable argument in support
of that incoherent notion of relative sympathies
and antipathies to which he had already, seemingly,
given himself up.
The dialogue, now diverted to other topics, was
not much longer protracted. The hour grew
late, and the shutting up of the house, and the
retiring
of the family below, warned Forrester of
the propriety of making his own retreat to the
little cabin in which he took up his abode. He
shook Ralph's hand warmly, and promising to see
him at an early hour of the morning, took his
departure
.
A degree of intimacy, rather inconsistent
with our youth's wonted haughtiness of habit, had
sprung up between himself and the woodman,
enlivened
,
doubtless, on the part of the former, by the
loneliness, and, to him, novel character of his
situation
.
He was cheerless and melancholy, and the
association of a warm, well-meaning spirit, had
something consolatory in it. He thought too, and
correctly, that in the mind and character of
Forrester
he discovered a large degree of sturdy
manly simplicity and a genuine honesty; coloured
deeply with prejudices and without much polish,
it is true, but highly susceptible of improvement,
and by no means stubborn or unreasonable in the
retention of the former. He could not but esteem
the possessor of such characteristics, particularly
when shown in such broad contrast with those of
his associates; and, without any other assurance
of their possession by Forrester than the
sympathies
already referred to, he was not unwilling
to recognise their existence in his person. That
he came from the same part of the world with
himself may also have had its effectthe more
particularly, indeed, as the pride of birth-place
was evidently a consideration with the woodman,
and the praises of Carolina were rung along with
his own, in every variety of change, through almost
all his speeches.
The youth sat musing for some time after the
departure of Forrester. He was evidently
employed
in chewing the cud of sweet and bitter
thought, and referring to memories deeply
imbued
with the closely associated taste of both
these extremes. After a while, the weakness of
heart got seemingly the mastery, long battled
with; and tearing open his vest, he displayed the
massive gold chain circling his bosom in repeated
folds, upon which hung the small locket
containing
Edith's and his own miniature. Looking
over his shoulder, as he gazed upon it, we are
enabled to see the fair features of that sweet young
girl, just entering her womanhoodher blue eyes,
her streaming hair, the cheek delicately pale, yet
enlivened with a southern fire, that seems not
improperly
borrowed from the warm eyes that glisten
above it. The ringlets gather in amorous clusters
upon her shoulder, and half obscure a neck and
bosom of the purest and most polished ivory.
The artist had caught from his subject something
of inspiration, and the rounded bust seemed to heave
before the sight, as if impregnated with the
subtlest
and sweetest life. The youth carried the
semblance to his lips, and muttered words of love
Vol. I.M
and reproach so strangely intermingled and in
unison, that, could she have heard to whom they
were seemingly addressed, it might have been
difficult to have determined the difference of
signification
between them. Gazing upon it long, and
in silence, a large but solitary tear gathered in his
eye, and finally finding its way through his fingers,
rested upon the lovely features that appeared never
heretofore to have been conscious of such a cloud.
As if there had been something of impiety and
pollution
in this blot upon so fair an outline, he hastily
brushed it away; then pressing the features again
to his lips, he hurried the jewelled token again
into his bosom, and prepared himself for those
slumbers upon which we forbear longer to intrude.
CHAPTER X.
I grant him bloody,
Luxurious, avaricious, false, deceitful,
Sudden, malicious, smacking of every sin
That has a name.
Macbeth
.
While
this brief scene was in progress in the
chamber of Ralph, another, not less full of
interest
to that person, was passing in the
neighbourhood
of the village tavern; and, as this portion of
our narrative yields some light which must tend
greatly to our own, and the instruction of the
reader, we propose briefly to record it. It will be
remembered, that, in the chapter preceding, we
found the attention of the youth forcibly attracted
towards one Guy Riversan attention the result
of various influencesproducing in the mind of
the youth a degree of antipathy towards that
person
for which he himself could not, nor did we,
seek to account. It appears that Ralph was not
less the subject of consideration with the
individual
in question. We have seen the degree and kind
of espionage which the former had felt at one time
disposed to resent; and how he was defeated in
his design by the sudden withdrawal of the
obnoxious
presence. On his departure with Forrester
from the gallery, Rivers reappearedhis manner
that of doubt and excitement; and after, for a brief
interval, hurrying with uncertain steps up and
down the apartment, he passed hastily into the
adjoining hall, where sat the landlord smoking
and drinking and expatiating at large to his guests,
upon some topic which need not more particularly
be referred to here. Whispering something in his
ear, he rose, and the two proceeded from the rear
of the building into the adjoining copse, at a point
as remote as possible from hearing, when the
explanation
of this mysterious course of caution was
thus begun by Rivers.
Well, Munro, we are like to have fine work
with your accursed and blundering good-nature.
Why did you not refuse lodgings to this youngster?
Are you ignorant who he is? Do you not know
him?
Know him?no, I know nothing about him.
He seems a clever, good-looking lad, and I see no
harm in him. What is it frightens you? was the
reply and inquiry of the landlord.
Nothing frightens me, as you know, by this
time, or should know at least. But, if you know
not the young fellow himself, you should certainly
not be at a loss to know the creature he rides; for
it is not long since your heart was greatly taken
with him. He is the youth we set upon at the
Catcheta Pass, where your backwardness and my
forwardness got me this badgeit has not yet
ceased to bleedthe marks of which promise fairly
to last me to my grave.
As he spoke he raised the handkerchief which
bound his cheeks, and exposed to view a deep gash,
not of a serious character indeed, but which, as
the speaker asserted, would most probably result
in a mark which would last him his life. The
exposure
of the face confirms the first and
unfavourable
impression which we have already received
from his appearance, and all that we have any
occasion now to add in this respect will be simply,
that, though not beyond the prime of life, there
were ages of guilt, of vexed and vexatious strife,
unregulated pride, without aim or elevation, a
lurking malignity, and hopeless discontentall
embodied
in the fiendish and fierce expression which
that single glimpse developed to the spectator. He
went on
Had it been your lot to have been in my place,
I should not now have to tell you who he is; nor
should we have had any apprehensions of his
crossing
our path again. But so it is. You are always
the last to your placehad you kept your
appointment
,
we should have had no difficulty, and I
should have escaped the mortification of being
foiled by a mere stripling, and almost stricken to
death by the heel of his horse.
And all your own fault and folly, Guy. What
business had you to advance upon the fellow, as
you did, before every thing was ready, and when
we could have brought him, without any risk
whatever, into the snare, from which nothing could
have got him out. But no! you must be at your
old tricks of the lawYou must make speeches
before you cut purses, as was your practice when
I first knew you at Gwinnett County-Court; a
practice which you seem not able to get over. You
have got into such a trick of making fun of people,
that, for the life of me, I can't be sorry that the lad
has turned the tables so handsomely upon you.
You would no doubt have enjoyed the scene
with far more satisfaction, had the fellow's shot
taken its full effect on my scullsince, besides the
failure of our object, you have such cause of
merriment
in what has been done. If I did go something
too much ahead in the matter, it is but simple
justice to say you were quite as much aback.
Perhaps so, Guy; but the fact is, I was right
and you wrong, and the thing's beyond dispute.
This lesson, though a rough one, will do you
service
;
and a few more such will perhaps cure
you of that vile trick you have of spoiling not
only your own, but the sport of others, by
running
your scull into unnecessary danger; and
since this youth, who got out of the scrape so
handsomely, has beat you at your own game, it
may cure you of that cursed itch for tongue-trifling,
upon which you so much pride yourself. 'Twould
have done, and it did, very well at the County
Sessions
,
in getting men out of the wood; but as you
have commenced a new business entirely, it's but
well to leave off the old, particularly as it's now
your policy to get them into it.
I shall talk as I please, Munro, and see not
why, and care not whether, my talk offends you
or not. I parleyed with the youth only to keep
him in play until your plans could be put in
operation
.
Very goodthat was all very well, Guy
and had you kept to your intention, the thing
would have done. But he replied smartly to your
speeches, and your pride and vanity got to work.
M 2
You must answer smartly and sarcastically in
turn, and you see what's come of it. You forgot
the knave in the wit; and the mistake was
incurable
.
Why tell him that you wanted to pick his
pocket, and perhaps cut his throat?
That was a blunder, I grant; but the fact is, I
entirely mistook the man. Besides, I had a reason
for so doing, which it is not necessary to speak
about now.
Oh, ayit wouldn't be lawyer-like if you hadn't
a reason for every thing, however unreasonable,
was the retort.
Perhaps not, Munro; but this is not the matter
now. Our present object must be to put this youth
out of the way. We must silence suspicion, for,
though we are pretty much beyond the operation
of law in this region, yet now and then a sheriff's
officer takes off some of the Club; and as I think
it is always more pleasant to be out of than in the
halter, I am clear for making the thing certain in
the only practicable way. Would you believe it,
this boy of whom we speak, as if in the way of
prediction, actually offered me a shilling to
procure
a cravat from Kentucky?
A plague upon his impudence, say I. But,
are you sure that he is the man. I should know
his horse and shall look to him, for he's a fine
creature and I should like to secure him; which I
think will be the case if you are not dreaming as
usual.
I am sureI do not mistake.
Well, I'm not, and I should like to hear what it
is you know him by, returned the landlord.
A deeper and more malignant expression
overspread
the face of Rivers, as with a voice in which
his thought vainly struggled for mastry with a
vexed spirit, he replied:
What have I to know him by, you ask. I
know him by many thingsand when I told you I
had my reason for talking with him as I did, I
might have added that he was known to me and
fixed in my lasting memory by wrongs and
injuries
before. But there is enough in this for
recollection
,
pointing again to his cheekThis
carries
with it answer sufficient. You may value a
clear face slightly, having known none other than
a blotted one since you have known your own, but
I have a different feeling in this. He has written
himself here, and the damned writing is
perpetually
and legibly before my eyes. He has put a
brand, a Cain-like, accursed brand upon my face,
the language of which cannot be hidden from men;
and yet you ask me if I know the executioner.
Can I forget him? If you think so, Munro, you
know but little of Guy Rivers.
The violence of his manner as he spoke well
accorded with the spirit of what he said. The
landlord, with much coolness and precision,
replied
I confess I do know but little of him and have
yet much to learn. If you have so little temper in
your speech, I have chosen you badly as a
confederate
in employments which require so much of that
quality. This gash, which, when healed, will be
scarcely perceptible, you speak of with all the
mortification of a young girl, to whom, indeed,
such would be an awful injury. How long is it,
Guy, since you have become so particularly
solicitous
of beauty, so proud of your face and
features
?
You will spare your sarcasm for another
season
,
Munro, if you would not have strife. I am not
now in the mood to listen to much, even from you,
in the way of sneer or censure. Perhaps I am a
child in this, but I cannot be otherwise. Besides,
I discover in this youth the person of one to whom
I owe much in the growth of this very hell-heart,
which embitters every thing about and within me.
Of this, at another time, you shall hear more.
Enough that I know this boythat it is more than
probable he knows me, and may bring us into
difficulty
that
I hate him, and will not rest satisfied
until we are secure, and I have my revenge.
Well, well, be not impatient nor angry.
Although
I still doubt that the youth in the house is
your late opponent, you may have suffered wrong
at his hands, and you may be right in your
conjecture
.
I am rightI do not conjecture. I do not so
readily mistake my man, and I was quite too near
him on that occasion not to have seen every
feature
of that face, which, at another and an earlier
day, could come between me and my dearest joys
but, why speak I of this. I know him: not to
remember would be to forget that I am here; and
that he was a part of that very influence which
made me league, Munro, with such as you, and
become a creature of, and a companion with, men
whom even now I despise. I shall not soon forget
his stern and haughty smile of scornhis proud
bearinghis lofty sentimentall that I must admire
all that I do not possessand when to-day he
descended to dinner, guided by that meddling
booby Forrester, I knew him at a glance. I should
know him among ten thousand.
It's to be hoped that he will have no such
memory
.
I can't see, indeed, how he should
recognise
either of us. Our disguises were complete.
Your whiskers taken off, leave you as far from any
resemblance to what you were in that affair, as
any two men can well be from one another; and I
am perfectly satisfied he has little knowledge of
me.
How should he? retorted the other. The
better part of valour saved you from all risk of
danger or discovery alike; but the case is
different
with me. It may be that enjoying the
happiness
which I have lost, he has forgotten the now
miserable object that once dared to aspirebut no
matterit may be that I am forgotten by him
he can never be by me. This speech, which had
something in it vague and purposeless to the mind
of Munro, was uttered with gloomy emphasis,
more as a soliloquy than a reply, by the speaker.
His hands were passed over his eyes as if in agony,
and his frame seemed to shudder at some remote
recollection which had still the dark influence
upon him. Munro was a dull man in all matters
that belonged to the heart, and those impulses
which characterize souls of intelligence and
ambition
.
He observed the manner of his companion,
but said nothing in relation to it; and the latter,
unable
to conceal altogether, or to suppress even
partially his emotions, did not deign to enter into
any explanation in regard to them.
Does he suspect any thing yet, Guy, think you?
have you seen any thing which might sanction a
thought that he knew or conjectured more than he
should? inquired Munro, anxiously.
I will not say that he does, but he has the
perception
of a lynxhe is an apt man, and his eyes
have been more frequently upon me to-day than
I altogether relish or admire. It is true mine were
upon himas how, indeed, if death were in the
look, could I have kept them off! I caught his
glance frequently; turning upon me with that stern,
still expression, indifferent and insolentas if he
cared not even while he surveyed. I
remember
that glance three years ago, when he was
indeed
a boyI remembered it when, but a few
days since, he struck me to the earth, and would
have ridden me to death with the hoofs of his horse
but for your timely appearance.
It may be as you believe, Guy; but, as I saw
nothing in his manner or countenance affording
ground for such a belief, I cannot but conceive it to
have been because of the activity of your
suspicions
that you discovered his. I did not
perceive
that he looked upon you with more curiosity
than upon any other at table; though, if he had
done so, I should by no means have been disposed
to wonder; for at this time, and since your face has
been so tightly bandaged, you have a most
villanously
attractive visage. It carries with it, though
you do regard it with so much favour, a full and
satisfactory reason for observance, without
rendering
necessary any reference to any more serious
matter than itself. On the road, I take it, he saw
quite too little of either of us to be able well to
determine what was what, or who was who, either
then or now. The passage was dark, our
disguises
good, and the long hair and monstrous
whiskers
which you wore did the rest. I have no
apprehensions
and see not that you need have any.
I would not rest in this confidencelet us
make sure that if he knows any thing he shall say
nothing, was the significant reply of Rivers.
Guy, you are too fierce and furious. When
there's a necessity, do you see, for using teeth, you
know me to be always ready; but I will not be for
ever at this sort of work. If I were to let you have
your way you'd bring the whole country down
upon us. There will be time enough when we
see a reason for it to tie up this young man's
tongue.
I seeI see!you are ever thusever
risking
our chance upon contingencies when you might
build strongly upon certainties. You are
perpetually
trying the strength of the rope, when a like
trouble would render it a sure hold-fast. Rather
than have the possibility of this thing being blabbed,
I would
Hushhark! said Munro, placing his hand
upon the arm of his companion, and drawing
him deeper into the copse, at the moment that
Forrester
,
who had just left the chamber of Ralph,
emerged from the tavern into the open air. The
outlaw had not placed himself within the shadow
of the trees in time sufficient to escape the
searching
gaze of the woodman, who, seeing the
movement
and only seeing one person, leaped nimbly
forward with a light footstep and speaking as he
approached:
Hello! therewho's thatthe pedler, sure.
Have at you, Bunce! seizing as he spoke the
arm of the retreating figure who briefly and sternly
addressed him as follows:
It is well, Mr. Forrester, that he you have
taken in hand is almost as quiet in temper as the
pedler you mistake him for, else your position might
prove uncomfortable. Take your fingers from my
arm, if you please.
Oh, it's you, Guy Riversand you here too,
Munro, making love to one another, I reckon, for
want of better stuff. Well, who'd have thought
to find you two squatting here in the bushes!
Would you believe it now, I took you for the
Yankee
not
meaning any offence though.
As I am not the Yankee, however, Mr.
Forrester
,
you will, I suppose, withdraw your hand,
said the other, with a manner sufficiently haughty
for the stomach of the person addressed.
Oh, to be sure, since you wish it, and are not the
pedler, returned the other, with a manner rather
looking, in the country phrase, to a squaring off
for a fightbut you needn't be so gruff about it.
You are on business, I suppose, and so I leave you.
A troublesome fool, who is disposed to be
insolent
,
said Rivers, after Forrester's departure.
Damn him! was the exclamation of that
worthy, on leaving the copseI feel very much
like putting my fingers on his throat; and shall do
it, too, before he gets better manners!
The dialogue between the original parties was
resumed.
I tell you again, Munroit is not by any means
the wisest policy to reckon and guess and
calculate
that matters will go on smoothly, when we
have it in our own power to make them certainly
go on so. We must leave nothing to guess work,
and a single blow will readily teach this youth the
proper way to be quiet.
Why, what do you drive at, Guy. What
would you dowhat should be done?
Beefbeefbeef!mere beef! How dull you
are to-night! were you in yon gloomy and thick
edifice (pointing to the prison which frowned in the
perspective before them), with irons on your
hands, and with the prospect, through its
narrowly-grated
loop-holes, of the gallows tree, at every
turning
before you, it might be matter of wonder even
to yourself that you should have needed any
advice
by which to avoid such a risk and prospect.
Look you, GuyI stand in no greater danger
than yourself of the prospect of which you speak.
The subject is, at best, an ugly one, and I do not
care to hear it spoken of by you, above all other
people. If you want me to talk civilly with you, you
must learn yourself to keep a civil tongue in your
head. I don't seek to quarrel with anybody, but
I will not submit to be threatened with the
penalties
of the rogue by one who is a damned sight
greater rogue than myself.
You call things by their plainest names, Wat,
at least, said the other, with a tone moderated duly
for the purpose of soothing down the bristles he
had made to riseBut you mistake me quite. I
meant no threat; I only sought to show how much
we were at the mercy of a single word from a
wanton
and headstrong youth. I will not say confidently
that he remembers me, but he had some
opportunities
for seeing my face, and looked into it closely
enough. I can meet any fate with fearlessness, but
should rather avoid it, at all risks, when it's in my
power to do so.
You are too suspicious, quite, Guy, even for
our business. I am older than you, and have seen
something more of the world: suspicion and caution
is not the habit with young men like this. They
are free enough, and confiding enough, and in this
lies our success. It is only the old manthe
experienced
in human affairs, that looks out for traps
and pitfalls. It is for the outlawfor you and I, to
suspect allto look with fear even upon one
another
,
when a common interest, and perhaps a
common
fate, ought to bind us together. This being
our habit, arising as it must from our profession,
it is natural but not reasonable to refer a like
spirit to all other persons. We are wrong in this,
and you are wrong in regard to this youthnot
that I care to save him, for if he but looks or winks
awry, I shall silence him myself, without speech
or stroke from you being necessary. But I do
not think he made out your features, and do not
think he looked for them. He had no time for it,
after the onset, and you were well enough
disguised
Vol. I.N
before. If he had made out any thing, he
would have shown it to-night; but, saving a little
stiffness, which belongs to all these young men from
Carolina, I saw nothing in his manner that looked
at all out of the way.
Well, Munro, you are bent on having the
thing as you please. You will find, when too late,
that your counsel will end in having us all in a
hobble.
Pshawyou are growing old and timid since
this adventure. You begin to doubt your own
powers of defence. You find your arguments
failing; and you fear that, when the time comes,
you will not plead with your old spirit, though for
the extrication of your own instead of the neck
of your neighbour.
Perhaps sobut, if there be no reason for
apprehension
,
there is something due to me in the way
of revenge. Is the fellow to hurl me down, and
trench my cheek in this manner, and escape
without
hurt.
The eyes of the speaker glared with a deadly
fury, as he indicated in this sentence the true
motive
for his persevering hostility to Colletonan
hostility for which, as subsequent passages will
show, he had even a better stimulant than the
unpleasing
wound in his face; which, nevertheless,
was in itself, strange as it may appear, a
considerable
eye-sore to its proprietor. Munro
evidently
understood this only in part; and,
unaccustomed
to attribute a desire to shed blood to any
other than a motive of gain or safety, and
without
any idea of a mortified pride or passion being
productive of a thirst unaccountable to his mind,
except in this mannerhe proceeded thus, in a
sentence
,
the dull simplicity of which only the more
provoked the ire of his companion
What do you think to do, Guywhat
recompense
would you seek to havewhat would satisfy
you?
The hand of Rivers grasped convulsively that
of the questioner as he spoke, his eyes were
protruded
closely into his face, his voice was thick,
choking and husky, and his words tremulous, as
he replied,
His bloodhis blood!
The landlord started back with undisguised
horror
from his glance. Though familiar with scenes
of violence and crime, and callous in their
performance
,
there was more of the Mammon than
the Moloch in his spirit, and he shuddered at the
fiend-like look that met his own. The other
proceeded
:
The trench in my cheek is nothing to that
within my soul. I tell you, Munro, I hate the boy
I hate him with a hatred that must have a
tiger-draught
from his veins, and even then will not be
satisfied. But why talk I to you thus, when he is
almost in my grasp, and there is neither let nor
hinderance? Sleeps he not in yon room to the
north-east?
He does, Guy,but it must not be. I must not
risk all for your passion, which seems to me as
weak as it is without adequate provocation. I
care nothing for the youth, and you know it; but
I will not run the thousand risks which your
temper
is for ever bringing upon me. There is
nothing
to be gained, and a great deal to be lost by it,
at this time. As for the scarthat, I think, is fairly
a part of the business, and is not properly a
subject
of personal revenge. It belongs to the
adventure
,
and you should not have engaged in it,
without
a due reference to its possible consequences.
You shall not keep me back by such obstacles
as these. Do I not know how little you care for
the riskhow little you can lose by it.
True, I can lose little, but I have other reasons;
and however it may surprise you, those reasons
spring from a desire for your good, rather than my
own.
For my good? replied the other, with an
inquiring
sneer.
Yes, for your good, or rather for Lucy's. You
wish to marry her. She is a sweet child, and an
orphan. She merits a far better man than you;
and bound as I am to give her to you, I am deeply
bound to myself and to her, to make you as
worthy
of her as possible, and to give her as many
chances for happiness as I can.
An incredulous smile played for a second upon
the lips of the outlaw, succeeded quickly however
by the savage expression, which, from being that
most congenial to his feelings, had become that
most habitual to his face.
I cannot be deceived by words like these, was
his reply, as he stepped quickly from under the
boughs which had sheltered them and made
towards
the house.
Think not to pursue this matter, Guy, on your
life. I will not permit itnot now, at least, if I
have to strike for the youth myself. Thus spoke
the landlord, as he advanced in the same
direction
.
Both were deeply roused, and, though not
reckless alike, Munro was a man quite as decisive
in character as his companion was ferocious and
vindictive. What might have been the result of
their present position, had it not undergone a new
interruption, might not well be foreseen. The sash
of one of the apartments in that part of the
building
devoted to the family was suddenly thrown
up, and a soft and plaintive voice, accompanying
the wandering and broken strains of a guitar, rose
sweetly into song upon the ear.
'Tis Lucythe poor girl! Stay, Guy, and hear
her music. She does not often sing now-a-days.
She is quite melancholy, and it's a long time since
I've heard her guitar. She sings and plays sweetly
her poor father had her taught every thing
before
he failed, for he was very proud of her, as well
he might be.
They sunk again into the covert, the outlaw
muttering sullenly at the interruption which had
come between him and his purposes. The music
touched him not, for he betrayed no consciousness;
when, after a few brief preliminary notes on the
instrument, the musician breathed forth words
like those which follow.
LUCY'S SONG.
I.
I met thy glance of scorn,
And then my anguish slept,
But, when the crowd was gone,
I turned away and wept.
II.
I could not bear the frown
Of one who thus could move,
And feel that all my fault,
Was only too much love.
III.
I ask not if thy heart
Hath aught for mine in store,
Yet, let me love thee still,
If thou canst yield no more.
IV.
Let me unchidden gaze,
Still, on the heaven I see,
Although its happy rays
Be all denied to me.
N 2
A broken line of the lay, murmured at intervals
for a few minutes after the entire piece was
concluded
,
as it were in soliloquy, indicated the sad
spirit of the minstrel. She did not remain long at
the windowin a little while the light was
withdrawn
from the apartment and the sash let down.
The musician had retired.
They say, Guy, that music can quiet the most
violent spirit, and it seems to have had its
influence
upon you. Does she not sing like a
mockingbird
is
she not a sweet, a true creature? Why,
man! so forward and furious but now, and now
so lifeless: bestir ye! The night wanes.
The person addressed started from his stupor,
and, as if utterly unconscious of what had been
going on,
ad interim
, actually replied to the speech
of his companion made a little while prior to the
appearance and music of the young girl, whose
presence at that moment had most probably
prevented
strife and possibly bloodshed. He spoke
as if the interruption had made only a momentary
break in the sentence which he now concluded:
He lies at the point of my knife, under my hands,
within my power, without chance of escape, and
I am to be held backkept from strikingkept
from my revengeand for what? There may be
little gain in the matterit may not bring money,
and there may be some risk! If it be with you,
Munro, to have neither love nor hate, but what
you do, to do only for the profit and spoil that
comes of it, it is not so with me. I can both love
and hate; though it be, as it has been, that I
entertain the one feeling in vain, and am restrained
from the enjoyment of the other.
You were born in a perverse time, and are
querulous, for the sake of the noise it makes,
rejoined
his cool companion. I do not desire to
restrain your hands from this young man, but take
your time for it. Let nothing be done to him while
in this house. I will run, if I can help it, no more
risk for your passions; and I must confess myself
anxious, if the devil will let me, of stopping right
short in the old life and beginning a new one. I
have been bad enough, and done enough to keep
me at my prayers all the rest of my days, were I
to live on to eternity.
This new spirit, I suppose, we owe to your
visit to the last camp-meeting. You will exhort,
doubtless, yourself, before long, if you keep this
track. Why, what a prophet you will make
among the crop-haired, Munro?what a brand
from the burning!
Look you, Guyyour sarcasm pleases me
quite as little as it did the young fellow, who paid
it back so much better than I can. Be wise, if you
please, while you are waryif your words
continue
to come from the same nest, they will beget
something more than words, my good fellow.
True, and like enough, Munro, and why do
you provoke me to say them? replied Rivers,
something more sedately; you see me in a
passion
you
know that I have causefor is not this
cause enoughthis vile scar on features, now
hideous
,
that were once surely not unpleasing. As
he spoke he dashed his fingers into the wound,
which he still seemed pleased to refer to, though
the reference evidently brought with it bitterness
and mortification. He proceededhis passion
again rising predominant
Shall I spare the wretch whose ministry
defaced
themshall I not have revenge on him who
first wrote villain therewho branded me as an
accursed thing, and among things bright and
beautiful gave me the badge, the blot, the
heel-stamp
due the serpent. Shall I not have my
atonement
my
sacrificeand shall you deny meyou,
Walter Munro, who owe it to me in justice?
I owe it to you, Guyhow? inquired the other,
with something like amazement in his countenance.
You taught me first to be the villain you now
find me. You first took me to the haunts of your
own accursed and hell-educated crew. You
taught me all their artstheir contrivancestheir
lawlessness and crime. You encouraged my own
deformities of soul till they became monsters, and
my own spirit such a monster that I knew it not
I could see it not. You put the weapon into
my hand, and taught me its use. You put me on
the scent of blood and bade me lap it. I will not
pretend that I was not ready and pliable enough
to your hands. There was, I feel, little difficulty
in moulding me to your own measure. I was an
apt scholar, and soon ceased to be the subordinate
villain. I was your companion, and too valuable
to you to be lost or left. When I acquired new
views of man, and began, in another sphere, that
new life to which you would now turn your own
eyeswhen I grew strong among men, and
famous
,
and public opinion grew enamoured with
the name which your destiny compelled me to
exchange
for another, you sought me outyou
thrust your enticements upon me; and, in an hour
of gloom and defeat and despondency, you seized
upon me with those claws of temptation which
are even now upon my shoulders, and I gave up
allI made the sacrificename, fame, honour,
troops of friendsfor what? Answer youYou
are richyou own slaves in abundancesecure
from your own fortunes, you have wealth hourly
increasing. What have I? This scar, this brand,
that sends me among men no longer the doubtful
villainthe words are written there in full!
The speaker paused, exhausted. His face was
pale and lividhis form trembled with convulsion
and his lips grew white and chalky, while
quivering
like a troubled water. The landlord, after
a gloomy pause, replied:
You have spoken but the truth, Guy, and any
thing that I can do
You will not do, responded the other,
passionately
,
and interrupting the speaker in his speech.
You will do nothing. You ruin me in the love
and esteem of those whom I love and esteemyou
drive me into exileyou lead me into crime, and
put me upon a pursuit which teaches me practices
that brand me with man's hate and fear, andif the
churchmen speak truth, which I believe notwith
heaven's eternal punishment. What have I left to
desire but hatebloodthe blood of manwho,
in driving me away from his dwelling, has made
me an unrelenting enemyhis hand against me,
and mine against him. While I had this pursuit,
I did not complainbut you now interpose to
deny me even this. The boy whom I hate, not
merely because of his species, but in addition, with
a hate incurred by himself, you protect from my
vengeance, though affecting to be utterly careless
of his fateand all this you conclude with a
profession
of willingness to do for me whatever you
can! What miserable mockery is this!
And have I done nothing, and am I seeking to
do nothing for you, Guy, by way of atonement.
Have I not pledged to you the person of my niece,
the sweet young innocent, who is not unworthy to
be the wife of the purest and proudest gentleman
of the southern country. Is this nothingis it
nothing to sacrifice such a creature to such a
creature! For well I know what must be her
fate when she becomes your wife. Well I know
you! Vindictive, jealous, merciless, wicked, and
fearless in wickednessGod help me, for it will be
the very worst crime I have ever yet committed.
These are all your attributes, and I know the sweet
child will have to suffer from the perpetual
exercise
of all of them.
Perhaps so! and as she will then be mine she
must suffer them if I so decree: but what avails
your promise so long as youin this matter a
child yourselfsuffer her to protract and put off
at her pleasure. Me she receives with scorn and
contempt, you with tears and entreaties, and you
allow their influencein the hope, doubtless, that
some lucky chancethe pistol shot or the
hangman's
collarwill rid you of my importunities. Is
it not so, Munro? said the ruffian, with a sneer of
contemptuous bitterness.
It would be, indeed, a lucky event for both of
us, Guy, were you safely in the arms of your
mother
;
though I have not delayed in this affair with
any such hope. God knows I should be glad, on
almost any terms, to be fairly free from your
eternal
croakingsnever at rest, never satisfied, until
at some new deviltry and ill deed. If I did give
you the first lessons in your education, Guy,
you have long since gone beyond your master;
and I'm something disposed to think, that Old Nick
himself must have taken up your tuition, where,
from want of corresponding capacity, I was
compelled
to leave it off.And the landlord laughed
at his own humour, in despite of the hyena glare
shot forth from the eye of the savage he addressed.
He continued
But, Guy, I'm not for you letting the youth off
that's as you please. You have a grudge against
him, and may settle it to your own liking and
in your own way. I have nothing to say to that.
But I am determined to do as little henceforth
towards
hanging myself as possible; and, therefore,
the thing must not take place here. Nor do I like
that it should be done at all without some reason.
When he blabs, there's a necessity for the thing,
and self-preservation, you know, is the first law of
nature. The case will then be as much mine as
yours, and I'll lend a helping hand willingly.
My object, Munro, is scarcely the same with
yours. It goes beyond it; and whether he knows
much or little, or speaks nothing or everything, it
is still the same thing to me. I must have my
revenge
.
But, for your own safetyare you bent
on running the risk?
I am, Guy, rather than spill any more blood
unnecessarily. I have already shed too much, and
my dreams begin to trouble me as I get older,
was the grave response of the landlord.
And how, if he speaks out, and you have no
chance either to stop his mouth or to run for it?
Who'll believe him, think you?where's the
proof? Do you mean to confess for both of us at
the first question?
True said Rivers, there would be a
difficulty
in conviction, but his oath would put us into
some trouble.
I think notour people know nothing about
him, and would scarcely lend much aid to have
either of us turned upon our backs, replied Munro,
without hesitation.
Well, be it then as you say. There is yet
another subject, Munro, on which I have just as
little reason to be satisfied as this. How long will
you permit this girl to trifle with us both? Why
should you care for her prayers and pleadings
her tears and entreaties? if you are determined
upon the matter, as I have your pledge, these are
childish and unavailing; and the delay can have
no good end, unless it be that you do in fact look,
as I have said and as I sometimes think, for some
chance to take me off and relieve you of my
importunities
and from your pledge.
Look you, Guy, the child is my own
twin-brother's
only one, and a sweet creature it is. I must
not be too hard with her; she begs time and I
must give it.
Why, how much time would she have?
heaven
knows what she considers reasonable, or what
you or I should call so; but to my mind she has had
time enough, and more by far than I was willing
for. You must bring her to her senses, or let me
do soto my thought, she is making fools of us
both.
It is enough, Guy, that you have my promise.
She shall consent, and I will hasten the matter as
fast as I can; but I will not drive her, nor will I
be driven myself. Your love is not such a
desperate
affair as to burn itself out for the want of
better fuel; and you can wait for the proper
season
.
If I thought for a moment that you did or
could have any regard for the child, and she could
be happy, or even comfortable with you, I might
push the thing something harder than I do; but as
it stands, you must be patient. The fruit drops
when it is ripe.
Rather when the frost is on it, and the worm
is in the core, and decay has progressed to
rottenness
.
Speak you in this way to the hungry boy,
whose eyes have long anticipated his appetite, and
he may listen to you and be patientI neither can
nor will. Look to it, Munro: I will not much
longer submit to be imposed upon.
Nor I, Guy Rivers. You forget yourself
greatly, and entirely mistake me, when you take
these airs upon you. You are feverish now, and
I will not suffer myself to grow angry; but be
prudent
in your speech. We shall see to all this
to-morrow
and the next daythere is quite time
enoughwhen we are both cooler and calmer than
at present. The night is something too warm for
deliberation; and it is well we say no more on one
subject till we learn the course of the other. The
hour is late, and we had best retire. In the
morning I shall ride to hear old Parson Witter, in
company with the old woman and Lucy. Ride
along with us, and we shall be able better to
understand
one another.
As he spoke, Munro emerged from the cover of
the tree under which their dialogue had chiefly
been carried on, and re-approached the dwelling,
from which they had considerably receded. His
companion lingered in the recess.
I will be there, said Rivers, as they parted
though I still propose a ride of a few miles
to-night
.
My blood is hot, and I must quiet it with a
gallop.
The landlord looked incredulous as he replied
Some more deviltryI will take a bet that the
cross-roads see you in an hour.
Not impossible, was the response, and the
parties were both lost to sightthe one in the
shelter of his dwelling, the other in the dim shadow
of the trees which girdled it round.
Vol. I.O
CHAPTER XI.
I worship'd in the desert, at his throne,
For, in the wilderness and o'er the waste,
Among the hills, and germin'd in the groves,
The old groves of past ages, he was there,
And awed me like a god.
At
an early hour of the ensuing morning, Ralph
was aroused from his slumbers, which had been
more than grateful from the extra degree of fatigue
he had the day before undergone, by the
appearance
of Forrester, who accounted and apologized
for the somewhat unseasonable nature of his visit,
by bringing tidings of a preacher and of a preaching
in the neighbourhood on that day. It was the
Sabbath
;
and though, generally speaking, very far from
being kept holy in that region, yet, as a day of
repose
from laboura holyday in factit was
observed
,
at all times, with more than religious
scrupulosity
.
Such an event among the people of this
quarter was always productive of a congregation.
The occurrence being unfrequent, its importance
was duly and necessarily increased in the
estimation
of those, the remote and insulated position of
whom rendered all the constituencies of society
primary and leading objects. No matter what the
character of the auspices under which it was
attained
,
they yearned for its associations, and
gathered
where they were to be enjoyed. A field
preaching
,
too, is a legitimate amusement, and though not
intended as such, formed a genuine excuse and
apology for those who desired it less for its
teaching
than its talkwho sought it less for the word
which it brought of God, than that which it
furnished
from the world of man. It was a happy
cover for those who, cultivating a human appetite,
and conscious of a human weakness, were
solicitous
,
in respecting and providing for these, not to
offend the Creator in the presence of his creature.
The woodman, as one of this class, was full of
glee, and promised Ralph an intellectual treat; for
Parson Witter, the preacher in reference, had more
than once, as he was pleased to acknowledge and
phrase it, won his ears, and softened and delighted
his heart. He was popular in the village and its
neighbourhood, and where regular pastor was none,
he might be considered to have made the strongest
impression upon his almost primitive, and,
certainly
,
only in part civilized, hearers. His merits
of mind were held of rather an elevated order, and
in standard far overtopping the current run of his
fellow-labourers in the same vineyard; while his
own example was admitted, on all hands, to keep
pace evenly with the precepts which he taught,
and to be not unworthy of the faith which he
professed
.
He was of the Methodist persuasiona
sect which, among those who have sojourned in our
southern and western forests, may confidently
claim to have done more, and with motives as
little questionable as any, towards the spread of
civilization, good habits, and a proper morality
among the great mass, than all other known sects
put together. In a word, where men are remotely
situated from one another, and cannot well afford
to provide for an established place of worship
and a regular pastor, their labours, valued at
the lowest standard of human want, are
inappreciable
.
We may add, that never did labourers
more deserve, yet less frequently receive, their
hire, than the preachers of this particular faith.
Humble in habit, moderate in desire, indefatigable
in well-doing, pure in practice and intention,
without
pretence or ostentation of any kind, they have
gone freely and fearlessly into places the most
remote
and perilous, with an empty scrip, but with
hearts filled to overflowing with love of God and
good-will to menpreaching their doctrines with a
simple and an unstudied eloquence, meetly
characteristic
of, and well adapted to, the old groves,
deep primitive forests, and rudely barren wilds, in
which it is their wont, most commonly, to give
it utterance. Day after day, week after week,
and month after month, finding them wayfarers
stillnever slumbering, never reposing from the
toil they have engaged in, until they have fallen,
almost literally, into the narrow grave by the
wayside
;
their resting-place unprotected by any other
mausoleum or shelter than those trees which have
witnessed their devotions, their names and worth
unmarked by any inscription; their memories,
however, closely treasured up and carefully noted
among human affections, and within the bosoms of
those for whom their labours have been taken;
while their reward, with a high ambition cherished
well in their lives, is found only in that better abode
where they are promised a cessation from their
labours
,
but where their good works still follow them.
This, without exaggeration applicable to the
profession
at large, was particularly due to the
individual
member in question; and among the
somewhat
savage and always wild people whom he
exhorted, Parson Witter was in some cases an
object of sincere affection, and in all commanded
their respect.
As might readily be expected, the whole village
and as much of the surrounding country as could
well be apprized of the affair, was on the go and
gather; and Colleton, now scarcely feeling his
late injuries, an early breakfast having been
discussed
,
mounted his horse, and under the guidance
of his quondam friend, Forrester, took the
meandering
path, or, as they phrase it in those parts, the
old
trace
, to the place of meeting and prayer.
The sight is something goodly, as well to the man
of the world as to the man of God, to behold the fairly
decked array of people, drawn from a circuit of
some ten or even fifteen miles in extent, on the
Sabbath
,
neatly dressed in their choicest apparel, men
and women alike well mounted, and forming
numerous
processions and parties, from three to five
or ten in each, bending from every direction to a
given point, and assembling for the purposes of
devotion
.
No chiming and chattering bells warn
them of the day or of the dutyno regularly
constituted
and well-salaried priestno time-honoured
fabric, around which the old forefathers of the
hamlet restreminding them regularly of the
recurring
Sabbath, and of the sweet assemblage
of their fellows. The teacher is from their own
impulsesand the heart calls them with a due
solemnity to the festival of prayer. The preacher
comes when the spirit prompts, or as
circumstances
may impel or permit. The news of his
arrival
passes from farm to farm, from house to house
placards announce it from the trees on the
road-side
,
parallel, it may be, with an advertisement for,
or of, strayed oxen, as we have seen it numberless
timesand a day does not well elapse before it is
in possession of everybody who might well avail
themselves of its promise for the ensuing Sunday.
The parson comes to the house of one of his
auditory
O 2
a night or two beforemessages and
messengers
are despatched to this and that neighbour,
who despatch in turnthe negroes delighting in a
service and occasion of the kind, in which,
by-the-way
,
they generally make the most conspicuous
figures, though somewhat sluggish, as couriers
usually
are now not merely ready but actually swift of
foot. The place of worship and the preacher are
duly designated, and by the time appointed; as if
the bell had tolled for their enlightenment, the
country assembles at the stated place, and though
the preacher may sometimes fail of attendance, the
people never do.
The spot appointed for the service of the day
was an old grove of gigantic oaks, at a distance of
some five or six miles from the village of
Chestatee
.
The village itself had not been chosen,
though having the convenience of a building,
because
of the liberal desire entertained by those
acting on the occasion to afford to others living at
an equal distance the same opportunities without
additional fatigue. Besides, five or ten miles to a
people to whom good horses were familiar things,
did not call for a second consideration. The
morning
was a fine one, all gayety and sunshinethe
road dry, elevated, and shaded luxuriantly with the
overhanging foliagethe woods having the air of
luxury and bloom which belonged to them at such a
season, and the prospect, varied throughout by the
wholesome undulations of valley and hill, which
strongly marked the face of the country, greatly
enlivened the ride to the eye of our young traveller.
Every thing contributed to impart a cheering
influence
to his senses; and with spirits and a frame
newly braced and invigorated, he felt the bounding
motion of the steed beneath him with an animal
exultation, which took from his countenance that
look of sullen melancholy which had hitherto
clouded and obscured it. As they proceeded on
their way, successive and frequent groups crossed
their route, or fell into it from other roadssome
capriciously taking the by-paths and Indian tracks
through the woods, but all having the same object
in view, and bending to the same point of
assemblage
.
Here gayly pranced on a small cluster of the
young of both sexes, laughing with unqualified glee
at the jest of some of their companionswhile in the
rear, the more staid, the antiques and those rapidly
becoming so, with more measured gait, paced
on in suite. On the road-side, striding on foot
with pace almost as rapid as that of the riders,
came at intervals, and one after the other, the now
trimly-dressed slaves of this or that plantation
all devoutly bent on the place of meeting. Some
of the whites carried their double-barrelled guns,
some their riflesit being deemed politic, at that
time, to prepare for all contingencies, for the
Indian
or for the buck, as well as for the more direct
object of the journey. At length, in a rapidly
approaching
group, a bright but timid glance met that
of the youth, and curbing in the impetuous animal
which he rode, in a few moments he found himself
side by side with Miss Munro, who answered his
prettiest introductory compliment with a smile
and speech, uttered with the grace so natural to
her, and, as the romancers tell us, so
characteristic
of a dame of chivalry.
We have a like object to-day, I presume,
was, after a few complimentary sentences, the
language
of Ralphyet, he continued, I fear
me, our several impulses at this time scarcely so
far resemble each other as to make it not
discreditable
to yours to permit of the comparison.
I know not what may be the motive which
impels you, sir, to the course you take; but I
will not pretend to urge that, even in my own
thoughts, my route is any more the result of a
settled conviction of its high necessity than it may
be in yoursand the confession which I shame to
make, is perhaps, of itself, a beginning of that very
kind of self-examination which we seek the church
to awaken.
Alas, Miss Lucy, even this was not in my
thought, so much are we men ignorant of, or
indifferent
to, those things which are thought of so
much real importance. We seldom regard
matters
which are not of present enjoyment. The
case is otherwise with you. There is far more
truth, my own experience tells me, in the
profession
of your sex, whether in love or in religion,
than in oursand believe me, I mean this as no
idle complimentI feel it to be true. The fact is,
society itself puts you into a sphere and condition,
which, taking from you much of your individuality,
makes you less exclusive in your affections, and
more single in their exercise. Your existence
being merged in that of the stronger sex, you lose
all that general selfishness which is the strict
result
of our pursuits. Your impulses are narrowed
to a single point or two, and there all your hopes,
fears, and desires become concentrated. You
acquire an intense susceptibility on a few
subjects
,
by the loss of those manifold influences
which belong to the out-door habit of mankind.
With us, we have so many resources to fly to
for reliefso many attractions to invite and
seduce
so
many resorts of luxury and life, that
the affections become broken up in smallthe
heart is divided among the thousand; and, if one
fragment suffers defeat or denial, why, the pang
scarcely touches, and is perhaps unfelt by all the
rest. You have but few aims, few hopes. With
these your very existence is bound up, and if you
lose these you are yourselves lost. Thus I find
that your sex, to a certain age, are creatures of love
disappointment invariably begets devotionand
either of these passions, for so they should be
called, once brought into exercise, forbids and
excludes
every other.
Really, Mr. Colleton, you seem to have looked
somewhat into the philosophy of this thing, and you
may be right in the inferences to which you have
come. On this point I may say nothing; but, do
you conceive it altogether fair in you thus to
compliment
us at our own expense? You give us the
credit of trutha high eulogium, I grantin
matters
which relate to the affections and the heart;
but this is done by robbing us entirely of mental
independence. You are a kind of generous
outlaw
a
moral Robin Hoodyou compel us to give
up every thing we possess, in order that you may
have the somewhat equivocal merit of restoring
back a small portion of what you take.
True, and this, I am afraid, Miss Lucy, however
by the admission I forfeit for my sex the reputation
for chivalry to which it universally lays so much
claim, is after all the precise relationship between
us. The very fact that the requisitions made
by our sex produce immediate concession from
yours, establishes the very dependence of which
you complain.
You mistake me, sir. I complain not of the
robberyfar from it; for, if we do lose the
possession
of a commodity so valuable, we are at
least freed from the responsibility of keeping it.
The gentlemen, now-a-days, seldom look to us for
intellectual gladiatorship; they are content that our
weakness should shield us from the war. But, I
conceive the reproach of our poverty to come
unkindly
from those who make us poor. It is of this,
sir, that I complain.
You are just, and justly severe, Miss Munro;
but the fact is, what else have you to expect?
Amazon-like
,
your sex, according to the quaint old story,
sought the combat, and were not unwilling to abide
the conditions of the warfare. The taunt is coupled
with the triumphthe spoil follows the victory
and the captive is chained to the chariot-wheel of
his conqueror, and must adorn the march of his
superior
by his own shame and sorrows. But, to be
just to myself, permit me to say, that what you have
considered a reproach was in truth designed as a
compliment. I must regret that my modes of
expression
are so clumsy, that, in the transfer of my
thought, the sentiment so changed its original shape
as entirely to lose its identity and name. It
certainly
deserved the graceful swordsmanship which
foiled it so completely.
Nay, sir, said the now highly animated girl,
you are now bloodily-minded towards yourself,
and it is matter of wonder to me how you survive
your own rebuke. So far from erring in clumsy
phrase, I am constrained to admit that I thought,
and think you, excessively adroit and happy in its
management. It was only with a degree of
perversity
,
intended solely to establish our
independence
of opinion, at least, that I chose to mistake and
misapprehend you. Your remark, clothed in any
other language, could scarcely put on a form more
consistent with your meaning.
Ralph bowed at a compliment which had
something
equivocal in it, and this branch of the
conversation
having reached its legitimate close, a pause of
some few moments succeeded, when they found
themselves joined by other parties, until they were
swollen in number to the goodly form of a
cavalcade
or caravan designed for a pilgrimage.
Report speaks favourably of the preacher we
are to hear to-day, Miss Munrohave you ever
heard him? was the inquiry of the youth.
I have, sir, frequently, and have at all times
been much pleased and sometimes affected by his
preaching. There are few persons I would more
desire to hear than himselfhe does not offend
your ears, nor assail your understanding by
unmeaning
thunders. His matter and manner, alike,
are distinguished by the proprieties of modest good
sense, a gentle and dignified ease and spirit, and
a pleasing earnestness in his object that is never
offensive. I think, sir, you will like him.
Your opinion of him will certainly not
diminish
my attention, I assure you, to what he says,
was the reply. At this moment the cavalcade was
overtaken and joined by Rivers and Munro,
together
with several other villagers. Ralph now
taking advantage of a suggestion of Forrester's
previously madewho proposed, as there would
be time enough, a circuitous and pleasant ride
through a neighbouring valleyavoided the
necessity
of being in the company of one with respect
to whom he had determined upon a course of the
most jealous precaution. Turning their horses'
heads, therefore, in the proposed direction, the two
left the procession, and saw no more of its
constituents
until their common arrival at the secluded
grovedruidically conceived for the present
purpose
in
which the teacher of a faith as simple as
it was pleasant was already preparing to address
them. The venerable oaksa goodly and thickly
clustering assemblageforming a circle around,
and midway upon a hill of gradual ascent, had
left an opening in the centre, concealed from the
eye except when fairly penetrated by the
spectator
.
Their branches, in most part meeting above,
afforded a roof, less regular and gaudy, indeed, but
far more grand, majestic, and we may add,
becoming
,
for purposes like the present, than the dim and
decorated cathedral, the workmanship of human
hands. Its application to this use, at this time,
recalled
forcibly to the mind of the youth the forms and
features of that primitive worship, when the trees
bent with gentle murmurs above the heads of the
rapt worshippers, and a visible Deity dwelt in
the shadowed valleys, and whispered an auspicious
acceptance of their devotions in every breeze.
He could not help acknowledging, as, indeed, must
all who have ever been under the influence of such
a scene, that in this, more properly and perfectly
than in any other temple, may the spirit of man
recognise and hold familiar and free converse with
the spirit of his Creator. There, indeed, without
much effort of the imagination, might be beheld the
present Godthe trees, hills and vales, the wild
flower and the murmuring water, all the work of
his hands, attesting his power, keeping their
purpose
,
and obeying, without scruple, the order of
those seasons, for the sphere and operation of which
he originally designed them. They were mute
lessoners
,
and the example which, in the progress of
their existence, year after year, they regularly
exhibited
,
might well persuade the more responsible
representative of the same power the propriety of
a like obedience.
A few fallen trees, trimmed of their branches
and touched here and there with the adze, ranging
at convenient distances under the boughs of those
along with which they had lately stood up in proud
equality, furnished seats for the now
rapidly-gathering
assembly. A rough stage, composed of logs,
rudely hewn and crossing each other at right
angles
,
covered, when at a height of sufficient
elevation
,
formed the pulpit from which the preacher
was to exhort. A chair, brought from some
cottage
in the neighbourhood, surmounted the stage.
This was all that art had done to accommodate
nature in this respect to the purposes of man. In
the body of the wood immediately adjacent,
fastened
by their respective bridles to the
overhanging
branches, were the goodly steeds of the
company
;
forming, in themselves, to the unaccustomed
and inexperienced eye, a grouping the most
curious
.
Some, more docile than the rest, were
permitted
to rove at large, cropping the young
herbage
and tender grass; occasionally, it is true,
during the service, overleaping their limits in a
literal sense; neighing, whickering and kicking up
their heels to the manifest confusion of the pious
and the discomfiture of the preacher.
The hour had at length arrived. The audience
was numerous if not select. All persuasionsfor
even in that remote region sectarianism had done
much towards banishing religionassembled
promiscuously
together and without show of discord,
excepting that here and there a high stickler for
church aristocracy, in a better coat than his
neighbour
,
thrust him aside; or, in another and not less
offensive form of pride, in the externals of
humility
and rotten with innate malignity, groaned
audibly through his clenched teeth; and with shut
eyes and crossed hands, as in prayer, sought to pass
a practical rebuke upon the less devout exhibitions
of those around him. The cant and the clatter, as
it prevails in the crowded mart, were here in
miniature
;
and Charity would have needed something
more than a Kamschatka covering to have shut
out from her eyes the enormous hypocrisy of many
Vol. I.P
among the clamorous professors of that faith, of
which they did not feel much and knew little. If
she shut her eyes to the sight, their groans were in
her ears; and if she turned away, they took her
by the elbow, and called her a backslider herself.
Forrester whispered in the ears of Ralph, as his
eye encountered the form of Miss Munro, who sat
primly amid a flock of venerables
Doesn't she talk like a book? Ah, she's a
smart, sweet girl; it's a pity there's no better
chance for her than Guy Rivers. But where's he
the rascal? Do you know I nearly got my fingers
on his throat last night. I felt deusedly like it, I
assure you.
Why, what did he to you?
Answered me with such impudence! I took
him for the pedler in the dark, and calculated I had
got a prize; it wasn't the pedler, but something
worsefor in my eyes he's no better than a
polecat
.
But, the preacher had risen in his place, and all
was silence and attention. We need scarcely seek
to describe him. His appearance was that of a
very common man; and the anticipations of
Colleton
,
as he was one of those persons apt to be taken
by appearances, suffered something like rebuke.
His figure was diminutive and insignificant; his
shoulders were round, and his movements
excessively
awkward; his face was thin and sallow;
his eyes dull and inexpressive, and too small,
seemingly
,
for command. A too frequent habit of closing
them in prayer, contributed, no doubt, greatly to
this appearance. A redeeming expression in the
high forehead, conically rising, and the strong
character exhibited in his nose, neutralized in some
sort the generally unattractive outline. His hair,
which was of a deep black, was extremely coarse,
and closely cropped; it gave to his look that
general
expression, which associated him at once in the
mind of Ralph, whose reading in those matters
was fresh, with the Commonwealth History of
England
with
the Puritans, and those diseased fanatics
of the Cromwell dynasty, not omitting that
profound
hypocrite himself. What then was the
surprise
of the youth, having such impressions, to hear
a discourse, unassuming in its dictates, mild in its
requisitionsand of a style and temper the most
soothing and persuasive.
The devotions commenced with a hymn, two
lines of which, at a time, having been read and
repeated
by the preacher, furnished a guide to the
congregation; the female portion of which
generally
uniting to sing, in a style the sweetness of
which was doubly effective from the utter absence
of all ornament in the music. The strains were just
such as the old shepherds, out among the hills,
tending
their charges, might have been heard to pour
forth, almost unconsciously, to that God who
sometimes
condescended to walk along with them. After
this was over, the preacher rose, and read, with a
voice as clear as unaffected, the twenty-third Psalm
of David, the images of which are borrowed chiefly
from the life in the wilderness, and were therefore
not unsuited to the ears of those to whom it was
now addressed. Without proposing any one
portion
of this performance as a text or subject of
commentary, and without seeking, as is quite too
frequently the case with small teachers, to explain
doubtful passages of little meaning and no
importance
,
he delivered a discourse, in which he simply
dilated upon and carried out, for the benefit of those
about him, and with a direct reference to the case
of all of them, those beautiful portraits of a good
shepherd and a guardian God, which the
production
which he read had furnished ready to his
hands. He spoke of the dependence of the
creature
,
instanced, as it is daily, by a thousand wants
and exigencies, for which, unless by the care and
under the countenance of Providence, he could
never of himself provide. He narrated the
dangers
of the forestimaging by this figure the
mazes and mysteries of lifethe difficulty, nay,
the almost utter impossibility, unless by his
sanction
,
of procuring sustenance, and of
counteracting
those innumerable incidents by fell and flood,
which in a single moment defeat the cares of the
hunter and the husbandmansetting at naught his
industry, destroying his fields and cattle, blighting
his crops, and tearing up with the wing of the
hurricane
even the cottage which gives shelter to his
little ones. He dwelt largely and long upon those
numberless and sudden events in the progress of
life and human circumstance, over which, as they
could neither be foreseen nor combated with by
man, he had no control; and appealed for him to
the Great Shepherd, who alone could do both.
Having shown the necessity of such an appeal and
reference, he next proceeded to describe the
gracious
willingness which had at all times been
manifested
by the Creator, to extend the required
protection
.
He adverted to the fortunes of all the
patriarchs in support of this position; and singling
out innumerable instances of this description,
confidently
assured them, in turn, from these examples,
that the same Shepherd was not unwilling to provide
for them in like manner. Under his protection, he
assured them, they should not want. He dilated
at length, and with a graceful dexterity, upon the
truthsthe simple and mere truths of God's
providence
,
and the history of his peoplewhich David
had embodied in the beautiful psalm which he had
read them. It was poetry, indeedsweet poetry
but it was the poetry of truth and not of fiction.
Did not history sustain its every particular? Had
not the Shepherd made them to lie down in green
pastureshad he not led them beside the still
watersrestored he not their soulsdid he not
lead them, for his name's sake, in the paths of
righteousness, and though at length they walked
through the valley where Death had cast his
never-departing
shadow, was he not with them still,
keeping them even from the fear of evil? He
furnished
them with the rod and staff; he prepared
the repast for them, even in the presence of their
enemieshe anointed their heads with oil, and
blessed them with quiet and abundance, until the
cup of their prosperity was running overuntil
they even ceased to doubt that goodness and mercy
should follow them al the days of their life; and,
with a proper consciousness of the source whence
this great good had arisen, they determined, with
the spirit not less of wise than of worthy men, to
follow his guidance, and thus dwell in the house of
the Lord for ever. Such did the old man describe
the fortunes of the old patriarchs to have been; and
such, having first entered into like obligations, and
pursuing them with the same fond fixedness of
purpose
,
did he promise should be the fortunes of all
who then listened to his voice. As he proceeded
to his peroration, he grew warmed with the broad
and boundless subject before him, and his
declamation
became alike bold and beautiful. All eyes
were fixed upon him, and not a whisper from the
still murmuring woods which girded them in was
perceptible to the senses of that pleased and
listening
assembly. The services of the morning were
closed by a paraphrase, in part, of the psalm from
which his discourse had been drawn; and as this
P 2
performance, in its present shape, is not to be found,
we believe, in any of the books devoted to such
purposes, it is but fair to conclude that the old man
not unwilling, in his profession, to employ every
engine for the removal of all stubbornness from the
hearts of those he addressedsometimes invoked
Poetry to smile upon his devotions, and wing his
aspirations for the desired flight. It was sung by
the congregation, in like manner with the former
the preacher reading two lines at a time, after
having first gone through the perusal, aloud, of the
piece entire. With the recognised privilege of the
romancer, who is supposed to have a wizard
control
over men, events, and things alike, we are
enabled
to preserve the paraphrase here.
SHEPHERD'S HYMN.
Oh, when I rove the desert waste, and 'neath the hot sun pant,
The Lord shall be my shepherd thenhe will not let me want
He'll lead me where the pastures are of soft and shady green,
And where the gentle waters rove, the quiet hills between.
And when the savage shall pursue, and in his grasp I sink,
He will prepare the feast for me, and bring the cooling drink
And save me harmless from his hands, and strengthen me in toil,
And bless my home and cottage lands, and crown my head with oil.
With such a Shepherd to protectto guide and guard me still,
And bless my heart with every good, and keep from every ill
Surely I shall not turn aside, and scorn his kindly care,
But keep the path he points me out, and dwell for ever there.
The service had not yet been concludedthe
last parting offices of prayer and benediction had
yet to be performed, when a sudden and singular
stir took place among certain of the audience,
which terminated in their hasty departure from the
main body of the assembly. A movement of the
kind was so very novel, so perfectly indecorous,
and in the face of all former usage, that it could
not fail to attract the attention of everybody.
Those, not the first to withdraw, followed in rapid
succession, to see after one another; until, under
the influence of that wild stimulant, curiosity,
the preacher soon found himself utterly unattended,
except by the female portion of his auditory.
These too, or rather the main body of them, at
least, were now only present in a purely physical
sense; for, with the true characteristic of the sex,
their minds were busily employed in the
wilderness
of reflection which this movement of the men
had necessarily inspired. Ralph Colleton,
however
,
with praiseworthy decorum, had lingered to
the lasthis companion Forrester, under the
influence
of a whisper from one over his shoulder, having
been among the first to retire. He too, could not, in
the end, avoid the general disposition, and at length
took his way to the animated and earnest knot,
which he saw assembled in the shade of the
adjoining thicket, busied in the discussion of some
concern of more than common interest. In his
departure from the one gathering to the other, he
caught a glance from the eye of Lucy Munro,
which had in it, to his mind, so much of warning,
mingled at the same time with an expression of
so much interest, that he half stopped in his
progress
,
and but for the seeming indecision and
awkwardness of such a proceeding, would have
returnedthe more particularly, indeed, when
encountering
her gaze with a corresponding
fixedness
,
though her cheek grew to crimson with the
blush that overspread it, her glance was yet not
withdrawn. He felt that her intention was that
of advice and caution, and inwardly determined
upon a due degree of circumspection. The cause
of interruption may as well be reserved for the
next chapter.
CHAPTER XII.
Ye have made a fine hand, fellows
There's a trim rabble let in. Are all these
Your faithful friends of the suburbs?
Shakspeare
,
Henry VIII
.
Ralph
now made his way into the thick of
the crowd, curious to ascertain the source of so
much disquiet and tumult as now began to
manifest
itself among them. The words of peace
which they had just heard, seemed to have availed
them but little, for every brow was blackened,
and every tongue was tipped with oaths and
execrations
.
His appearance attracted no attention,
if, indeed, it was not entirely unobserved. The
topic in hand was of an interest quite too fresh
and all-absorbing to permit of a single glance or
thought towards any other object of more
doubtful
importance, and it was only after much delay
and difficulty that he was enabled at length to get
the least insight into the mystery. All were
speakers, counsellors, oratorsold and young, big
and little, illustrious and obscure,all but the
legitimate
and legal counsellor, Pippin, who, to the
surprise of the youth, was to be seen, galloping at
the uttermost stretch of his horse's legs towards
the quiet of his own abode. The lawyer was
known to have a particular care of number one,
and such a movement excited no remark in any
of the rest of the assembly. There was danger
at hand, and he knew his valuebesides, there
might be business for the sessions, and he valued
too highly the advantages, in a jury case, of a clean
conscience, not to be solicitous to keep his honour
clear of any art or part in criminal matters, saving
only such connexion as might come
professionally
.
That the lawyer was not without reason
for his precaution, Ralph had soon abundant
testimony
himself. Arms and the munitions of war,
as if by magic, had been rapidly collected. Some
of the party, it is true, had made their appearance
at the place of prayer originally with rifles and
fowling-pieces
;
but this, in those regions, was a
practice
of large extent and occasioned no surprise.
But the managers of the present movement had
seemingly furnished all hands with weapons,
offensive
and defensive, of one kind or another. Some
were caparisoned with pistols, cutlasses, and knives;
and, not to speak of pick-axes and clubs, the array
was sufficiently formidable. The attitude of all
parties was warlike in the extreme, and the
speeches of those who, from time to time,
condescended
to please themselves by haranguing their
neighbours, teemed with nothing but strife and
wounds, fight and furious circumstance.
The matter, as we have already remarked, was
not made out by the youth without considerable
difficulty. He obtained, however, some particulars
from the various speakers, which, taken in
connexion
with the broken and incoherent sentences of
Forrester, who dashed into speech at intervals
with something like the fury of a wounded
panther
in a cane-brake, contributed at length to his
full enlightenment.
Matter enoughmatter enough; and you will
think so tooto be robbed of our finding by a
parcel
of blasted coons, that haven't soul enough for
themselves to keep them from freezing. Why,
this is the matter, you must know; only last week,
we miners of Tracy's diggings struck upon a fine
heap of the good stuff, and have been gathering
gold pretty freely ever since. All the boys have
been doing well at it; better than they ever did
beforeand even Munro there, and Rivers, who
have never been very fond of work, neither of
them, have been pretty busy ever since then; for,
as I tell you, we were making a sight of money all
of us. Well now, somehow or other, our good
luck got to the ears of George Dexter and his
men, who have been at work for some time past
upon old Johnson's diggings about fourteen miles
up on the Sokee river. They could never make
much out of the place, I know; for what it had
good in it was pretty much cleaned out of it when
I was there, and I know it can't get better, seeing
that gold is not like trees, to grow out every year.
Well, as I say, George Dexter, who would just
as leave do wrong as right, and a great deal rather,
got tired, as well as all his boys, of working for the
fun of the thing merely; and so, hearing as I say
of our good luck, what did they do but last night
come quietly down upon our trace, and when Jones,
the old man we kept there as a kind of safeguard,
tried to stop 'em, they shot him through the body as if
he had been a pig. His son got away when his
father was shot, though they did try to shoot him
too, and come post-haste to tell us of the
transaction
.
There stands the lad, his clothes all bloody
and ragged. He's had a good run of it through
the bushes, I reckon.
And they are now in possession of your lands?
Every fellow of 'em, holding on with gun in
hand, and swearing to be the death of us if we try
for our own. But we'll show them what's what,
or I can't fling a hatchet or take aim with a rifle.
This, now, Master Colleton, is the long and short of
the matter.
And what do you now propose to do? asked
our hero of his informant.
Why, what should we do, do you think, but
find out who the best men are, and put them in
possession. There's not a two legged creature
among us that won't be willing to try that
question
,
any how, and at any time, but more
particularly
now, when every thing depends upon it.
And when do you move, Forrester?
Now, directlythis very minute. The boys
have just sent for some extra powder, and are
putting
things in readiness for a brush.
The resolution of Ralph was at once adopted.
He had nothing, it is true, to do in the matterno
interest at stake, and certainly no sympathy with
the lawless men who went forth to fight for a
property
and possession to which they had not a jot
more of right than had those who usurped its
use from them. But here was a scenehere was
incident, excitementand with all the enthusiasm
of the southern temper, and with that
uncalculating
warmth which so much distinguishes it, he
determined
,
without much regard to the merits of the
question, to go along with the party.
I'll ride with you, Forrester, and see what's
going on.
And stand up with us, 'squire, and join in the
scuffle? inquired his companion.
I say not that, Forrester. I have no interest,
no concern in this matter, and so long as I am let
alone myself, I see no reason for taking part in an
affair, the merits of which I am almost entirely
ignorant of.
You will take your arms with you, I suppose.
You can lend them to those who fight, though you
make no use of them yourself.
YesI never go without arms in travelling,
but I shall not lend them. A man should no more
lend his arms than he should lend his coat. Every
man should have his own weapons.
Yes, but, 'squire, if you go along with us, you
may be brought into the scrape. The other party
may choose to consider you one of us.
It is for this reason, not less than others, that I
would carry and not lend my arms.
Well, 'squire, you might lend them to some of
us, and I would answer for them. It's true, as you
say, that every man should have his own weapons;
but some among us, you see, ha'n't got 'em,and its
for that we're waiting. But come, it's time to start;
the boys are beginning to be in motionand here
comes Munro, and that skunk RiversI reckon
Munro will have the command, for he's thought to
be the most cunning man among us.
The party was now ready for departure, when
a new interruption was experienced. The duties
of the pastor were yet to begin, and accordingly,
sallying forth at the head of his remaining
congregation
,
Parson Witter joined the formidable array
of seceders. It is unnecessary that we should
state his purpose; it is as little necessary that we
should say that it was unavailing. Men of the
kind of whom we speak, though perhaps not
insensible
to some of the bolder virtues, have no
sympathy or love for a faith which teaches
forbearance
under wrong and insult, and meekness
under blows. If they did not utterly laugh in his
face, therefore, at the nature of his exhortations, it
was because, at the very first overture, they had,
to a man, turned their backs upon him and were now
generally mounted. Following the common lead,
Ralph approached the group where stood his
fair friend of the morning; and acknowledged, in
an under tone, to herself, the correctness of her
opinion in regard to the merits of the sermon. She
did not reply to the observation, but seeing his hand
upon the bridle, asked hurriedly
Do you, sirdoes Mr. Colleton go with this
party?
I dothe circumstances are all so novel, and
I am curious to see as much of manners and events
foreign to those to which I have been accustomed,
as may be practicable.
I fear me, sir, that those which you may behold
on occasions such as these, and in this country,
though they may enlighten you, will do little
towards
your gratification. You have friends, sir,
who might not be willing that you should indulge
in unnecessary exposure, for the satisfaction of a
curiosity so unpromising.
Her manner was dignified, and though as she spoke
a something of rebuke came mingled with the
caution which her language conveyed, yet there
was evidently such an interest in his fortunes
embodied
in what she said, that the listener whom she
addressed could not feel hurt at the words
themselves
,
or the accompanying expression.
I shall be a mere looker-on, Miss Munro, and
dare to disregard the caution which you bestow,
though duly sensible of the kindness which gives
it utterance. Perhaps, too, I may be of service
in the way of peace-making. I have neither
interest
nor wish which could prompt me to any
other course.
There is every need for caution among young
travellers, sir; and though no astrologer, it seems
to me your planet is full of unfavourable
auguries
.
If you will be headstong, see that you have
Vol. I.Q
your eyes about you. You have need of them
both.
This was all in by-play. The group had passed
on, and a single nod of the head and a doubtful
smile, on her part, concluded the brief dialogue
we have just narrated. The youth was puzzled
to understand the significant warnings, which, from
time to time, she had given him. He felt
unconscious
of any foe in particular, and though at that
time sojourning with a people in whom he could
repose but little confidence, he saw no reason to
apprehend any danger to himself at least. If her
manner and words had reference simply to the
general lawlessness of the settlement, the
precaution
evidently conveyed no compliment to his own
capacities for observation. Whatever might have
been her motive, the youth felt its kindness; and
she rose not a little in his esteem, when he reflected
with how much dignity and lady-like loftiness she
had given, to a comparative stranger, the
counsel
which she evidently thought necessary to his
well-being. With a free rein he soon overtook
his friend Forrester, and with him took his place,
and kept, with a due sense of propriety, in the
rear of the now rapidly-advancing cavalcade.
As Forrester had conjectured, the command of
the party, such as it was, was assigned to the
landlord. There might have been something like
forty or fifty men in all, the better portion of them
mounted and well armedsome few on foot
struggling
to keep pace with the ridersall in high
spirits
,
and indignant at the invasion of what they
considered
their own. These, however, were not all
hunters of the precious metal, and many of them,
indeed, as the reader has by this time readily
conjectured
,
carried on a business of a very mixed
complexion. The whole villageblacksmith,
grocer
,
baker, and clothier included, turned out
en
masse
, upon the occasion; for, with an indisputable
position in the elements of political economy,
deriving
their gains directly or indirectly from this
pursuit, the cause was, literally and in fact, a cause
in common.
The scene of operations, in view of which they
had now come, had to the eye all the appearance
of a moderate encampment. The intruding force
had done the business completely. They had made
a final and full transfer, from their old to their
new quarters, of bag and baggage; and had
possessed
themselves of all the log-houses in and
about the disputed region. Their fires were in full
heat, to use the frontier phrase, and the water was
hissing in their kettles, and the dry thorns
crackling
under the pot. Never had usurpers made
themselves more perfectly at home; and the rage
of the old incumbents was, of course, duly
heightened
at a prospect of so much ease and felicity
enjoyed at their expense. The enemy were about
equal in point of number with those whom they
had so rudely dispossessed. They had, however,
in addition to their disposable force, their entire
assemblage of wives, children, slaves, and
dependents
,
cattle and horses, enough, as Forrester bitterly
remarked, to breed a famine in the land. They
had evidently settled themselves
for life
, and the
ousted party, conscious of the fact, prepared for
the
dernier
resort. Every thing on the part of the
usurpers indicated a full and perfect state of
preparedness
for an issue which they never doubted
would be made; and all the useless baggage,
interspersed
freely with rocks and fallen trees, had
been well employed in increasing the strength of a
position for which, such an object considered,
nature had already done much. The defences, as
they now stood, precluded all chance of success
from an attack by mounted men, unless the force
so employed was overwhelming. The defenders
stood ready at their posts, partly under cover, and
so arrayed as easily to put themselves so, and
were armed in very nearly the same manner with
the assailing party. In this guise of formidable
defence
,
they waited patiently the onset.
There was a brief pause after their arrival at
the spot, on the part of the invading force, which
was employed principally in a consultation as to
the proper mode of procedure, and in an
examination
of the ground. Their plan of attack,
depending
altogether upon the nature of circumstances
which were yet to be seen, had not at all been
deliberated
upon before. The consultation lasted not
over-long, and no man's patience was too severely
tried. Having deputed the command to the
landlord
,
they left the matter pretty much to that
person
;
nor was their choice unhappy. Munro had
been a partisan well-taught in Indian warfare; and
it was said of him that he knew quite as well how
to practise all their subtleties as themselves. The
first object with him, therefore, in accordance with
his reputation, was to fix upon some snare, to devise
some plot, by which not only to destroy the
inequality
of chances between the party assailing
and that defending a post now almost
impregnable
,
but to draw the latter entirely out of their
defences
.
Still it was deemed but courteous, or
prudent
at least, to see what could be done in the way
of negotiation; and their leader, with a white
handkerchief attached to a young sapling, hewn
down for the purpose, by way of apology for a
flag, approached the besieged, and in front of his
men demanded a conference with the usurping
chief. The demand was readily and at once
answered
by the appearance of the already named
George Dexter; a man who, with little sagacity
and but moderate cunning, had yet acquired a lead
and notoriety among his fellows, even in that wild
region, simply from the reckless boldness and fierce
impetuosity of his character. It is useless to
describe
such a person. He was a ruffianin look
and manner, ruffianlyhuge of frame, strong and
agile of muscle, and steeled against all fear, simply
from a brute unconsciousness of all danger. There
was little of preliminary matter in this conference.
Each knew his man, and the business in hand. All
was direct, therefore, and to the point. Words
were not to be wasted without corresponding
fruits, though the colloquy began, on the part of
Munro, in terms of the most accredited courtesy.
Well, George Dexter, a pleasant morning to
you in your new accommodations. I see you have
learned to make yourself perfectly at home when
you visit your neighbours.
Why, thank you, WatI generally do, I
reckon, as you know of old. It's not now, I'm
inclined
to think, that you're to learn the ways of
George Dexter. He's a man, you see, Wat, that
never has two ways about him.
That's true, friend George, I must say that for
you, were I to have to put it on your tombstone.
It's a long ride to the Atlantic, Wat; and
the time is something off yet, I reckon, when my
friends will be after measuring me for a six-foot
accommodation. But, look you, Wat, why are all
your family here?I did think, when I first saw them
on the trail, some with their twisted and some with
smooth bores, tomahawks, and scalping-knives, that
they took us for Indians. If you hadn't come
forward
now, civilly, I should have been for giving
Q 2
your boys some mutton-chops, not to speak of a
cold cut.
Well, George, you may do that yet, old fellow,
for here we have all come to take our Sunday
dinner. You are not in the notion that we shall
let you take possession here so easily, without even
sending us word, and paying us no rentno
compensation
?
Why, no, WatI knew you and your boys too
well for that. I did look, you see, to have a bit of
a brush, and have made some few preparations to
receive you with warmth and open arms, was
the response of Dexter, pointing as he spoke to
the well-guarded condition of his entrenchments,
and to his armed men, who were now thickly
clustering
about him. Munro saw too plainly, as he
had been directed, that this was no idle boast, and
that the disposition of his enemy's force, without
some stratagem, set at defiance, and rendered liable
to certain overthrow, any attack under present
circumstances. Still he did not despair, and
taught in Indian warfare, such a position was the
very one to bring out his energies and abilities.
Falling back for a moment, he uttered a few words
in the ear of one of his party, who withdrew
unobserved
from his companions, while Munro
returned
to the parley.
Well, George, I see, as you have said, that you
have made some preparations to receive us, but
they are not the preparations that I like exactly,
nor such as I think we altogether deserve.
That may be, Watand I can't help it. If
you will invite yourselves to dinner, you must be
content with what I put before you.
It is not a smart speech, Dexter, that will give
you free walk on the high road; and something is
to be said about this proceeding of yours, which,
you must allow, is clearly in the teeth of all the
practices prevailing among the people of the
frontier
.
At the beginning, and before any of us knew
the value of this or that spot, you chose your
ground, and we chose ours. If you leave yours or
we ours, then either of us may take possession
not without. Is not this the custom?
I tell you what, Munro, I have not lived so
long in the woods to listen to wind-guns, and if
such is the kind of argument you bring us, I take
it, your dumpy lawyer,what do you call him?
little Pippin, ought to have been prime head of your
party. He will do it all day longI've heard him
myself, at the sessions, from midday till clean dark,
and after all the said nothing.
If you mean to persuade yourself, George, that
we shall do no more than
talk
for our lands and
improvements
,
you are likely to suffer something for
your mistake.
Your `lands and improvements!'Well, now,
I like thatthat's very good, and just like you.
Now, Wat, not to put you to too much trouble,
I'd like to look a little into your title to the lands
as to the improvements, they're at your
service
whenever you think proper to send for them.
There's the old lumber housethere's the
squatter's
housethere's where the cow keeps, and
there's the hog-stye, and half a dozen more, all of
which you're quite welcome to. I'm sure none of
you want 'em, boys,do you?
A hearty laugh, and cries in the negative,
followed
this somewhat technical retort and reply of
the speakersince, in trespass, according to the
received forms of law, the first duty of the
plaintiff
is to establish his own title.
Then, George, you are absolutely bent on
having
us show our title? You won't deliver up
peaceably, and do justice?
Can't think of such a thingwe find the
quarters
here quite too comfortable, and have come too
far to be in a hurry to return. We are tired, too,
Wat; and it's not civil in you to make such a
request
.
When you can say `must' to us, we shall
hear you, but not till then; so, my old fellow, if you
be not satisfied, why the sooner we come to short
sixes the better, was the response of the
desperado
,
for such, in every essential particular, he
was. The indifferent composure with which he
uttered a response, which was in fact the signal for
bloodshed, not less than the savage ferocity of his
preparations generally, amply sustained his
pretension
to this appellative. Munro knew his man
too well not to perceive that to this fashion must
they come at last; and simply assuring Dexter
that he would submit his decision to his followers,
he retired back upon the anxious and indignant
party, who had heard a portion, and now eagerly
and angrily listened to the rest, of the detail.
Having
gone over the matter, he proceeded to his
arrangements
for the attack with all the coolness, and
certainly much of the conduct of a veteran. In
many respects he truly deserved the character of
onehis courage was unquestionable, and any
individual
deficiency of this quality is very readily
discovered
in the southern country. When aroused,
he still preserved his coolness, even when coupled
with the vindictive ferocity of the savage. His
experience in all the modes of warfare, commonly
known to the white man and Indian alike, in the
woods, was completeevery thing, indeed,
eminently
fitted and prepared him for the duties
which, by common consent, had been devolved upon
him. He now called them around him, under a
clump of trees and brushwood which concealed
them from sight, and thus addressed them in a style
and language graduated to their pursuits and
understandings
.
And now, my fine fellowsyou see it is just as
I told you all along. You will have to fight for it,
and with no half spirit. You must just use all your
strength and skill in it, and a little cunning beside.
We have to deal with a man who would just as
leave fight as eat; indeed, he prefers it. As he
says himself, there's no two ways about him. He
will come to the scratch himself, and make
everybody
else do so. So, then, you see what's before
you. It's no child's play. They count more men
than wenot to speak of their intrenchments and
shelter. We must dislodge them if we can; and to
begin, I have a small contrivance in my head which
may do some good. I want two from among you
to go upon a nice business. I must have men
quick of foot, keen of sight, and cunning as a black
snake; and they mustn't be afraid of a knock on
the head either. Shall I have my men?
There was no difficulty in this, and the leader
was soon provided. He selected two from among
the applicants for the distinction, upon whose
capacities
,
as he himself had described them, he
thought he could best rely, and led them away from
the party into the recess of the wood, where he
gave them their directions, and returned to the
main body. He now proceeded to the division,
into smaller parts, of his forceplacing them under
guides rather than leaders, and reserving to
himself
the instruction and command of the whole.
There was still something to be done, and
conceiving
this to be a good opportunity for employing a
test, already determined upon, he approached
Ralph Colleton, who surveyed the whole affair with
intense curiosity.
And now, young 'squireyou see what we're
driving at, and as our present business won't
permit
of neutrality, let us hear on which side you
stand. Are you for us or against us? The
question
was one rather of command than solicitation,
but the manner of the speaker was sufficiently
deferential.
I see not why you should ask the question, sir.
I have no concern in your controversyI know
not its merits, and propose simply to content
myself
with the position of a spectator. I presume
there is nothing offensive in such a station.
There may be, young sir; and you know that
when people's blood's up, they don't stand on
trifles. They are not apt to discriminate between
foes and neutrals; and, to speak the truth, we are
apt, in this part of the country, to look upon the
two, at such moments, as the same. You will
judge, therefore, for yourself, of the risk you run.
I always do, Mr. Munro, said the youth. I
cannot see that the risk is very considerable at this
moment, for I am at a loss to perceive the policy
of your making an enemy of me, when you have
already a sufficient number to contend with in
yonder barricade. Should your men, in their folly,
determine to do so, I am not unprepared, and I
think not unwilling, to defend myself.
Ay, ayI forgot, sir, you were from Carolina,
where they make nothing of swallowing Uncle
Sam for a lunch. It is very well, siryou take
your risk, and will abide the consequences; though
I look not to find you when the fray begins.
You shall not provoke me, sir, by your sneer;
and may assure yourself, if it will satisfy you, that
though I will not fight for you, I shall have no
scruple of putting a bullet through the scull of the
first ruffian who gives me the least necessity.
The youth spoke indignantly, but the landlord
appeared not to regard or listen to the retort.
Turning to the troop, which had been decorously
attentive, he bade them follow, saying
Come on, boyswe shall have to do without
the strangerhe does not fight, it seems, for the fun
of the thing. If Pippin was here, doubtless, we
should have arguments enough from the pair, to
keep them in whole bones, at least, if nobody
else.
To understand the full force of this sarcasm, it
is necessary that the reader should have some
knowledge of the modes of thinking on the subject
of the duello, and individual readiness for the
ultima
ratio
, prevailing in the southern and western
country. There is no imputation upon a man so
formidable and destructive to his character and
pretensions as any backwardness in this respect,
and it is by no means unfrequent to hear the lawyer
of the interior defending his client, in a
prosecution
for assault and battery, by alleging the
pusillanimity
of the person who suffered and
submitted
to it. A laugh of bitter scorn and
contumelious
emphasis followed the remark of Munro, as
the party went on its way. Though inwardly
assured of the propriety of his course, Ralph could
not help biting his lip with the mortification he
felt from this circumstance, and which he was
compelled to suppress; and we hazard nothing in
the assertion when we say, that had his sympathies
been at all enlisted with the assailing party, the
sarcasm of its leader would have hurried him into
the very first rank of attack. As it was, such was
its influence upon him, that, giving a free rein and
close spur to his steed, he advanced to a position
and eminence which, while it afforded him a clear
survey of the whole field, exposed his person not
a little to the shot of either party, as well from
without as from within the beleaguered district.
The invading force soon commenced the affair.
They came to the attack in the manner of the
Indians
.
The nature of forest life, and its
necessities
,
of itself teaches this mode of warfare. Each
man took his tree, his bush, or stump, approaching
from cover to cover until within rifle reach, then
patiently awaiting until an exposed head, a side or
shoulder, leg or arm, gave an opportunity for the
exercise of his skill in marksmanship. To the
keen sighted and quick, rather than to the strong,
is the victory; and it will not be wondered at, if,
educated thus in daily adventure, the hunter is
enabled to detect the slightest and most transient
exhibition, and by a shot, which in most cases is
fatal, to avail himself of the indiscretion of his
enemy. If, however, this habit of life begets skill
in attack and destruction, it has not the less
beneficial
effect in creating a like skill and ingenuity in
the matter of defence. In this way we shall
account
for the limited amount of injury done in the
Indian wars, in proportion to the noise and
excitement
which they make, and the many terrors they
occasion. The fight had now begun in this
manner
,
and both parties being at the outset studiously
well sheltered and secured, with little or no injury
the shot doing no more harm to the enemy on
either side than barking the branch of the tree or
splintering the rock behind which they happened
individually to be sheltered. In this fruitless
manner
the affray had for a little time been carried on,
without satisfaction to any concerned, when Munro
was beheld advancing, with the apology for a flag
which he had used before, towards the beleagured
fortress. The parley he called for was acceded
to, and his ancient comrade, Dexter, again made
his appearance.
What, tired already, Wat?The game is, to
be sure, a shy one; but have patience, old fellow
we shall be at close quarters directly.
It was now the time for Munro to practise the
subtlety which he had designed, and a reasonable
prospect of success he promised himself from the
bull-headed stupidity of his opponent. He had
planned a stratagem, upon which, parties, as we
have seen, were despatched; and he now calculated
his own movement in concert with theirs. It was
his object to protract the parley which he had
begun, by making propositions for an arrangement
which, from a perfect knowledge of the men he had
to deal with, he felt assured would not be acceded
to. In the mean time, pending the negotiation,
each party left its cover, and, while they severally
preserved their original relationships, and were so
situated as, at a given signal, to regain their
positions
,
they drew nearer to one another, and in some
instances began a conversation. Munro was
cautious
yet quick in the discussion, and while his
opponent with rough sarcasms taunted him upon
the strength of his own position, and the utter
inadequacy
of his strength to force it, he contented
himself
with sundry exhortations to a peaceable
arrangement
to
a giving up of the possessions they
had usurped, and many other suggestions of a like
nature, which Munro well knew would be laughed
at and rejected. Still, the object was in part
attained
.
The invaders, becoming more confident
of their strength from this almost virtual
abandonment
of their first resort by their opponents,
grew momently less and less cautious. The rifle
was rested against the rockthe sentinel took out
Vol. I.R
his tobacco, and the two parties were almost
intermingled
.
At length the hour had come. A wild
and sudden shriek from that part of the beleaguered
district in which the women and children were
congregated together, drew all eyes in that
direction
,
where the whole line of tents and dwellings
were in a bright conflagration. The emissaries
had done their work ably and well, and the
devastation
was complete; while the women and
children, driven from their various sheltering places,
ran howling and shrieking in every direction.
Nor did Munro, at this time, forget his division of
the labour: the opportunity was in his grasp,
and it was not suffered to escape him. As the
glance of Dexter was turned in the direction of
the flames, he forgot his precaution, and the
moment
was not lost. Availing himself of the
occasion
,
Munro dashed his flag of truce into the face of
the man with whom he had parleyed, and, in the
confusion which followed, seizing him around the
body with a strength equal to his own, he dragged
him, along with himself, over the low table of rock
on which they had both stood, upon the soft earth
below. Here they grappled with each other,
neither
having arms, and relying solely upon skill
and muscle. The movement was too sudden, the
surprise too complete, not to give an ascendency
to the invaders, of which they readily availed
themselves, more than equal to all the advantages
previously possessed by their opponents. The
possession of the fortress was now in fact divided
between them; and a mutual consciousness of
their relative equality determined the two parties,
as if by common consent, quietly to behold the result
of the affair between their leaders. They had
recovered
their feet, both of them, but were both of them
again down; Munro being still uppermost. Every
artifice known to the lusty wrestlers of this region
was put in exercise, and the contest was variously
contested. At one time the ascendency was
clearly with the one, at another moment it was
transferred to his opponent; victory, like some shy
arbiter, seeming unwilling to fix the palm, from an
equal regard for both the claimants. Munro still
had the advantagebut, a momentary pause of
action, and a sudden evolution of his antagonist,
now materially altered their position, and Dexter,
with the sinuous agility of the snake, winding
himself
completely around his opponent, now whirled
him suddenly over and brought himself upon him.
Extricating his arms with admirable skill, he was
enabled to regain his knee, which was now closely
pressed upon the bosom of the prostrate man, who
struggled, but in vain, to free himself from the
position
.
The face of the ruffian, if we may so call
the one in contradistinction to the other, was black
with fury; and Munro felt that his violation
of the flag of truce was not likely to have any
good effect upon his destiny. Hitherto, beyond
the weapons of nature's furnishing, they had been
unarmed; the case was no longer so, for Dexter,
having a momentary use of his hand, provided
himself
with a huge dirk-knife, guarded by a string
which hung around his neck, and was usually worn
in his bosoma sudden jerk threw it wide, and
fixed the blade with a spring. It was a perilous
moment for the fallen man, for the glance of the
victor
,
apart from the action, indicated well the
vindictive
spirit within him; and the landlord averted
his eyes, though he did not speak, and upraised his
hands as if to ward off the blow. The friends of
Munro now hurried to his relief, but the stroke
was already descendingwhen, on a sudden, to
the surprise of all, the look of Dexter was turned
from the foe beneath him, and fixed upon the
hills in the distancehis blow was arrestedhis
grasp relaxedhe released his enemy, and rose
sullenly to his feet, leaving his antagonist
unharmed
.
CHAPTER XIII.
Clubs, bills, and partisans! strike, beat them down;
Down with the Capuletsdown with the Montagues.
Rebellious subjects, enemies to peace,
Profaners of this neighbour stained steel,
Will they not hear? what ho, you men, you beasts,
That quench the fire of your pernicious rage,
With purple fountains, issuing from your veins,
On pain of torture, from those bloody hands,
Throw your mistemper'd weapons to the ground.
Romeo and Juliet
.
This
sudden and unlooked for escape of Munro,
from a fate held so inevitable as well by himself
as all around him, was not more a matter of
satisfaction
than surprise with that experienced
personage. He did not deliberate long upon his
release, however, before recovering his feet, and
resuming his former belligerent attitude. The
circumstance
to which he owed the unlooked-for and
most unwonted forbearance of his enemy was
quickly revealed. Following the now common
direction of all eyes, he discerned a body of
mounted and well-armed men, winding on their
way in the direction of the encampment, in whose
well known uniform he recognised a detachment
of the Georgia Guard, a troop kept, as they all
well knew, in the service of the state, for the
purpose
not merely of breaking up the illegal and
unadvised
settlements of the squatters upon the
frontiers
,
upon lands now known to be valuable, but
also of repressing and punishing their now frequent
outlawries. Such a course had become essential
to the repose and protection of the more quiet and
more honest adventurer; whose possessions they
not only entered upon and despoiled, but whose
lives, in numerous instances, had been made to pay
the penalty of their enterprise. Such a force
could alone meet the exigency, in a country where
the sheriff dared not often show himself; and, thus
accoutred, and with full authority, the guard, either
en masse
, or in small divisions like the present,
was employed, at all times, in scouring, though
without any great success, the infested districts.
The body now approaching was readily
distinguishable
,
though yet at a considerable distance
the road over which it came lying upon a long
ridge of bald and elevated rocks. Its number was
not large, comprising not more than forty persons;
but, as the squatters were most commonly
distrustful
of one another, not living together or in much
harmony, and having but seldom, as in the present
instance, a community of interest or unity of
purpose, such a force was considered by the proper
authorities adequate to all the duties assigned it.
There was but little of the pomp or circumstance
of military array in their appearance or approach.
Though dressed uniformly, the gray and plain
stuffs which they wore were more in unison with
the habit of the hunter than the warrior; and, as
in that country, the rifle is familiar as a household
thing, the encounter with an individual of the troop
would perhaps call for no remark. The plaintive
note of a single bugle, at intervals reverberating
R 2
wildly among the hills over which the party wound
its way, more than any thing beside, indicated its
character; and even this accompaniment is so
familiar
as an appendage with the southronso
common, particularly to the negroes, who acquire
a singular and sweet mastery over it, while driving
their wagons through the woods, or poling their
boats down the streams, that one might fairly doubt,
with all these symbols, whether the advancing
array was in fact more military than civil in its
character. They rode on briskly in the direction
of our contending partiesthe sound of the bugle
seeming not only to enliven, but to shape their
course, since the stout negro who gave it breath
rode considerably ahead of the troop.
Among the squatters there was but little time
for deliberation, yet never were their leaders more
seriously in doubt or more certainly in difficulty
than now, as to the course most proper for their
adoption in the common danger. They well
knew the assigned duties of the guard, and felt the
peril in its full. It was necessary for the common
safetyor we should say, rather, the common
spoilthat something should be done and
determined
upon immediately. They were now actually
in arms, and could no longer, appearing
individually
and at privileged occupations, claim to be
un-obnoxious to the laws; and it need occasion no
surprise in the reader, if, among a people of the
kind and class we have described, the measures
chosen in the present exigency were of a
character
the most desperate and reckless. Dexter,
whose recent triumph gave him something in the
way of a title to speak first, thus delivered
himself
:
Well, Munroyou may thank the devil and
the Georgia Guard for getting you out of that
scrape. You owe both of them more now than
you ever calculated to owe them. Had they not
come in sight just at the lucky moment, my knife
would have made mighty small work with your
windpipe, I tell youit did lie so tempting beneath
it.
YesI thought myself a gone chick under
that spur, George, and so I believe thought all
about us; and when you put off the finishing stroke
so suddenly, I took it for granted that you had
seen the devil, or some other matter equally
frightful
,
was the reply of Munro, in a spirit and style
equally unique and philosophical with that which
preceded it.
Why, it was something, though not the devil,
bad enough for us in all conscience, as you know
just as well as I. The Georgia Guard won't give
much time for a move.
Bad enough, indeed, Dexterthough I
certainly
ought not to complain of their appearance,
was the reply of Munro, whose recent escape
seemed to run more in his mind than any other
subject. He proceeded
But this isn't the first time I've had a chance
so narrow for my neck; and more than once it
has been said to me, that the man born for one fate
can't be killed by another; but when you had me
down and your knife over me, I began to despair
of my charm.
You should have double security for it now,
Wat, and so keep your prayers till you see the
cross timbers, and the twisted trouble. There's
something more like business in hand now, and
seeing that we shan't be able to fight one another,
as we intended, all that we can do now is to make
friends as fast as possible, and prepare to fight
somebody else.
You think just as I should in this matter, and
that certainly is the wisest policy left us. It's a
common cause we have to take care of, for I
happen
to know that Captain Fullamand this I take
to be his troophas orders from the governor to
see to us all, and clear the lands in no time. The
state, it appears, thinks the land quite too good for
such as we, and takes this mode of telling us so.
Now, as I care very little about the stateit has
never done me any good, and I have always been
able to take care of myself without itI feel just
in the humour, if all parties are willing, to have a
tug in the matter before I draw stakes.
That's just my notion, Wat; and dn 'em, if
the boys are only true to the hub, we can row this
guard up salt river in no time and less. Look you,
nowlet's put the thing on a good footing, and
have no further disturbance. Put all the boys on
sharesequal sharesin the diggings, and we'll
club strength, and can easily manage these chaps.
There's no reason, indeed, why we shouldn't; for
if we don't fix them, we are done up, every man of
us. We have, as you see and have tried, a pretty
strong fence around us, and, if our men stand to
it, and I see not why they shouldn't, Fullam can't
touch us with his squad of fifty, ay, and a hundred
to the back of 'em.
The plan was feasible enough in the eyes of men
to whom ulterior consequences were as nothing in
comparison with the excitement of the strife; and
even the most scrupulous among them were
satisfied
,
in a little time, and with few arguments, that
they had nothing to gain and every thing to lose by
retiring from the possessions in which they had
toiled so long. There was nothing popular in the
idea of a state expelling them from a soil of which
it made no use itself; and few among the persons
composing the array had ever given themselves
much if any trouble, in ascertaining the nice, and
with them entirely metaphysical distinction,
between
the
mine
and
thine
of the matter. The
proposition, therefore, startled none, and prudence
having long since withdrawn from their counsels,
not a dissenting voice was heard to the suggestion
of a union between the two parties for the purposes
of common defence. The terms, recognising all of
both sides, as upon an equal footing in the profits
of the soil, were soon arranged and completed;
and in the space of a few moments, and before the
arrival of the new comers, the hostile forces were
arrayed under one banner, and side by side, stood
up for the new contest as if there had never been
any other than a community of interest and feeling
between them. A few words of encouragement
and cheer, given to their several commands by the
two joint leaders, Munro and Dexter, were scarcely
necessary, for what risk had their adherents to run
what to fearwhat to lose? The courage of
the desperado invariably increases in proportion to
his irresponsibility. In fortune, as utterly destitute
and desperate as in character, they had, in most
respects, already forfeited the shelter, as in
numberless
instances they had not merely gone beyond
the sanction, but had violated and defied the
express
interdict of the laws: and now, looking, as
such men are apt most usually to do, only to the
immediate issue, and to nothing beyond it, the
banditti
for
such they now werewith due
deliberation
and decision, and such a calm of disposition as
might well comport with a life of continued
excitement
,
proceeded again, most desperately, to set
them at defiance.
The military came on in handsome style. They
were all fine-looking men; natives generally of a
state, the great body of whose population are
well-formed
,
and distinguished by features of clear, open
intelligence. They were well-mounted, and each
man carried a short rifle, a sword, and pair of
pistols
.
They rode in single file, following their
commander
;
a gentlemanin person, of great
manliness
of frame, possessed of much grace and ease
of action. They formed at command, readily, in
front of the post, which may be now said to have
assumed the guise of a regular military station;
and Fullam, the captain, advancing with much
seeming surprise in his countenance and manner,
addressed the squatters generally, without
reference
to the two leaders, who, both, at that moment,
stood forth as representatives of their several
divisions.
How is this, my good fellows? what is meant
by your present military attitude. Why are you,
on the Sabbath, mustering in this guise
surrounded
by barricades, arms in your hands, and
placing sentinels on duty. What does all this
mean?
We carry arms, replied Dexter, without pause,
because it suits us to do so; we fix barricades to
keep out intruders; our sentinels have a like
object
;
and if by attitude you mean our standing
here and standing therewhy, I don't see in what
the thing concerns anybody but ourselves!
Indeed! said the Georgian; you bear it
bravely, sir. But it is not to you I speak. Am I
to understand you, good people, as assembled here
for the purpose of resisting the laws of the land?
We don't know, captain, what you mean
exactly
by the laws of the land, was the reply of
Munro; but, I must say, we are here, as you see
us now, to defend our property, which the laws
have no right to take from usnone that I can
see.
Soand is that your way of thinking, sir; and
pray who are you that answer so freely for your
neighbours.
One, sir, whom my neighbours, it seems, have
appointed to answer for them.
I am then to understand, sir, that you have
expressed
their determination on this subject, and that
your purpose is resistance to any process of the
state compelling you to leave these possessions?
You have stated their resolution precisely,
was the reply. They had notice that
unauthorized
persons, hearing of our prosperity, were
making preparations to take them from us by force;
and we prepared for resistance. When we know
the proper authorities, we shall answer fairlybut
not till then.
Truly, a very manful determination; and, as
you have so expressed yourself, permit me to
exhibit
my authority, which I doubt not you will
readily recognise. This instrument requires you,
at once, to remove from these lands,entirely to
forego their use and possession, and within
forty-eight
hours to yield them up to the authority which
now claims them at your hands. Here the officer
proceeded to read all those portions of his
commission
to which he had referred, with a considerable
show of patience.
All that's very well in your hands, and from
your mouth, good sir; but how know we that the
document you bear is not forged and falseand
that you, with your people there, have not got up
this fetch to trick us out of those possessions which
you have not the heart to fight for. We're up to
trap, you see. With this insolent speech, Dexter
continued to show his natural impatience for parley,
and that brutal thirst which invariably prompted
him to provoke and seek for extremities. The eye
of the Georgian flashed out indignant fires, and his
fingers instinctively grasped the pistol at his holster,
while the strongly aroused expression of his
features
indicated the rising wrath within. With a
strong and successful effort, however, though
inwardly
chafed at the necessity of his forbearance,
he contrived, for a while longer, to suppress any
more decided evidence of the rising emotion, while
he replied as follows:
Your language, sirrah, whatever you may be,
is ruffianly and insolentyet, as I represent the
country rather than myself in this business, and as
I would perform my duties mildly and without
harshness, I pass it by. I am not bound to satisfy
you, or any of your company, of the truth of the
commission under which I act. It is quite enough
if I myself am satisfied. Still, however, for the
same reason which keeps me from punishing your
insolence, and to keep you from any treasonable
opposition to the laws, you too shall be satisfied.
Look here, for yourselves, good peopleyou all
know the great seal of the state!
He now held up on high the document from
which he had read, and which contained his
authority
;
the broad seal of the state dangling from
the parchment, distinctly in the sight of the whole
gang. Dexter approached somewhat nearer, as if
to obtain a more perfect view; and, while the
Georgian
,
without suspicion, seeing his advance, and
supposing that to be its object, held it more towards
him, the ruffian, with an active and sudden bound,
tore it from his hands, and leaping, followed by all
his group, over his defences, was in a moment close
under cover, and out of all danger. Rising from
his concealment, however, in the presence of the
officer, he tore the instrument into atoms, and
dashing
them towards their proprietor, exclaimed
Now, captain, what's the worth of your
authority
?
Be off now in a hurry, or I shall fire upon
you in short order.
We may not describe the furious anger of the
Georgian. Irritated beyond the control of a proper
caution, he precipitately, and without that due
degree
of deliberation which must have taught him
the madness and inefficacy of any assault by his
present force upon an enemy so admirably disposed
of and protected, he gave the command to his men
to fire; and after the ineffectual discharge, which
had no other result than to call forth a shout of
derision
from the besieged, he proceeded to charge the
barrier, himself fearlessly leading the way. The
first effort to break through and overcome the
barricades
was sufficient to teach him the folly of the
design; and the discharge from the defences
bringing
down two of his men, warned him, with sufficient
emphasis, of the necessity of duly retrieving his
error. He saw the odds, and retreated with order
and in good conduct, until he sheltered the whole
troop under a long hill, within rifle-shot of the
enemy, from whence, suddenly filing a detachment
obliquely to the left, he made his arrangements for
the passage of a narrow gorge, having something
of the character of a road, and though excessively
broken and uneven, having been frequently used as
such. It wound its way to the summit of a large
hill, which stood parallel with the defences, and
fully commanded them; and the descent of the
gorge, on the opposite side, afforded him as good an
opportunity, in a charge, of riding them down, as the
summit for picking them off singly with his riflemen.
He found the necessity of great circumspection,
however, in the brief sample of controversy already
Vol. I.S
given him; and with a movement in front, therefore,
of a number of his force, sufficient, by employing
the attention of the squatters in that quarter, to
cover and disguise his present endeavour, he
marshalled
fifteen of his force apart from the rest,
leading
them himself, as the most difficult enterprise,
boldly up the narrow pass. The skirmishing was
still suffered, therefore, to continue on the ground
where it had begun, whenever a momentary
exposure
of the person of besieged or besieger
afforded
any chance for a successful shot. Nor was
this game very hazardous to either party. The
beleaguered force, as we have seen, were
well-protected
the
assailants, having generally dismounted,
their horses being placed out of reach of danger,
had, in the manner of their opponents, taken the
cover of the rising ground, or the fallen tree, and
in this way, awaiting the progress of events,
were shielded from unnecessary exposure. It was
only when a position became awkward or irksome
that the shoulder or the leg of the unquiet man
thrust itself too pertinaciously above its shelter, and
got barked or battered by a bullet; and as all
parties
knew too well the skill of their adversaries, it
was not often that a shoulder or leg became so
indiscreetly
prominent. As it was, however, the
squatters, from a choice of ground, and a perfect
knowledge of it, together with the additional guards
and defences which they had been enabled to place
upon it, had evidently the advantage. Still, no
event calculated to impress either party with any
decisive notion of the result, had yet taken place;
and beyond the injury doen to the assailants in their
first ill-advised assault, they had suffered no serious
harm. They were confident in themselves and
their leaderdespised the squatters heartily; and,
indeed, did not suffer themselves for a moment to
think of the possibility of their defeat. Thus the
play proceeded in front of the defences, while
Fullam
silently and industriously plied his way up the
narrow gorge, covered entirely from sight of the
enemy by the elevated ridges of rock, which rising
up boldly on either side of the pass, had indeed
been the cause of its formation. But his enemy
was on the alert, and the cunning of Munro, whom
his companions, with an Indian taste and emphasis,
had happily entitled the Black Snakehad
already prepared for the reception of the gallant
Georgian. With a quick eye he had observed the
diminished numbers of the force in front, and
readily concluded, from the sluggishness of the
affair in that quarter, that a finesse was in course
of preparation. Conscious, too, from a knowledge
of the post, that there was but a single mode of
enfilading his defences, he had made his provisions
for the guardianship of the all-important point.
Nothing was more easy than the defence of this
pass, the ascent being considerable, rising into a
narrow peak, and as suddenly and in like manner
descending on the point opposite that on which
Fullam was toiling up his way. In addition to this,
the gulley was winding and brokenly circuitous
now making a broad sweep of the circlethen
terminating
in a zigzag and cross direction, which,
until the road was actually gained, seemed to have
no outlet; and at no time was the advancing force
enabled to survey the pass for any distance ahead.
Every thing in the approach of the Georgian was
conducted with the profoundest silencenot the
slightest whisper indicated to the assailants the
presence or prospect of any interruption; and from
the field of strife below, nothing but an occasional
shot or shout gave token of the business in which
at that moment all parties were engaged. This
quiet was not destined to continue long. The forlorn
hope had now reached midway of the summitbut
not, as their leader had fondly anticipated, without
observation from the foewhen the sound of a
human
voice directly above him warned him of the
error; and looking up, he beheld, perched upon a
fragment of the cliff, which hung directly over
the gorge, the figure of a single man. For the first
time led to anticipate resistance in this quarter, he
bade his men prepare for the event as well as they
might; and calling out imperatively to the
individual
,
who still maintained his place on the
projection
of the rock as if in defiance, he bade him
throw down his arms and submit!
Throw down my arms! and for what? was
the reply. I'd like to know by what right you
require us to throw down our arms. It may do in
England, or any other barbarous country where
the people don't know their rights yet, to make
them throw down their arms; but I reckon there's
no law for it in these parts, that you can show us,
captain.
Pick that insolent fellow off, one of you, was
the order, and in an instant a dozen rifles were
lifted, but the man was gone. A hat appearing
above the cliff, was bored with several bullets;
and the speaker, who laughed heartily at the
success
of his trick, now resumed his position on the
cliff, with the luckless hat perched upon the staff on
which it had given them the provocation to fire.
He laughed and shouted heartily at the contrivance,
and hurled the victim of their wasted powder
down among them. Much chagrined, and burning
with indignation, Fullam briefly cried out to his
men to advance quickly. The person who had
hitherto addressed him was our old acquaintance
Forrester, to whom, in the division of the duties,
this post had been assigned. He now spoke again.
You'd better not, captain, now, I advise you.
It will be dangerous if you come farther. Don't
trouble us now, and be off, as soon as you can, out
of harms way. Your bones will be all the better
for it; and I declare I don't like to hurt such a
fine-looking
chap, if I can possibly avoid it. Now take
a friend's advice;'twill be all the better for you,
I assure you.
The speaker evidently meant well, so far as it
was possible for one to mean well who was
commissioned
to do, and was, in fact, doing ill. The
Georgian, however, only the more indignant at the
impertinence of the address, took the following
notice of it, uttered in the same breath with an
imperative command to his own men to hasten their
advance.
Disperse yourselves, scoundrels, and throw
down your arms. On the instant disperse. Lift
a hand, or pull a trigger upon us, and every man
shall dangle upon the branches of the first tree.
As he spoke, leading the way, he drove his
rowels repeatedly and with earnest force into the
sides of his animal; and, followed by his troop,
bounded fearlessly up the bank.
S 2
CHAPTER XIV.
Blood hath been shed 'ere now, i' the olden time,
Ere human statute purged the gentle weal;
Ay, and since, too, murders have been performed
Too terrible for the ear.
Macbeth
.
It
is now high time to return to Ralph Colleton,
who has quite too long escaped our consideration.
The reader will doubtless remember, with little
difficulty, where and under what circumstances
we left him. Provoked by the sneer and sarcasm
of the man whom at the same moment he most
cordially despised, we have seen him taking a
position
in the controversy, in which his person,
though not actually within the immediate sphere of
action, was nevertheless not a little exposed to
some of its risks. This position, with fearless
indifference
,
he continued to maintain, unshrinkingly
and without interruption, throughout the whole
period and amid all the circumstances of the
conflict
.
There was something of a boyish
determination
in this way to assert his courage, which
his own sense inwardly rebuked; yet such is the
nature of those peculiarities in southern habits and
opinions, to which we have already referred, on all
matters which relate to personal prowess and a
masculine
defiance of danger, that, even while
entertaining
the most profound contempt for those in
whose eye the exhibition was made, he was not
sufficiently independent of popular opinion to brave
its current when he himself was its subject. He
may have had an additional motive for this
proceeding
,
which most probably enforced its
necessity
.
He well knew that fearless courage, among
this people, was that quality which most certainly
won and secured their respect; and the policy
was not unwise, perhaps, which represented this
as a good opportunity for a display, which might
have the effect of protecting him from wanton
insult
or aggression hereafter. To a certain extent
he was at their mercy, and conscious, from what he
had seen, of the unscrupulous character of their
minds, every exhibition of the kind had some
weight in his favour.
It was with a lively and excited spirit that he
surveyed, from the moderate eminence on which
he stood, the events going on around him. Though
not sufficiently near the parties (and scrupulous not
to expose himself to the chance of being for a
moment
supposed to be connected with either of them)
to ascertain their various arrangements, from what
had met his observation, he had been enabled to
form a very correct inference as to the general
progress
of affairs. He had beheld the proceedings
of each array while under cover, and contending
with one another, to much the same advantage as
the spectator who surveys the game in which two
persons are at play. He could have pointed out
the mistakes of both in the encounter he had
witnessed
,
and felt assured that he could have ably and
easily amended them. His frame quivered with
the rapture of the strife, as Attila is said to have
called the excitation of battle; and his blood, with
a genuine southern fervour, rushed to and from his
heart with a bounding impulse, as some new
achievement of either side added a fresh interest
to, and in some measure altered the face of, the
affair. But when he beheld the new array, so
unexpectedly
,
yet auspiciously for Munro, make its
appearance
upon the field, the excitement of his spirit
underwent proportionate increase; and with deep
anxiety, and a sympathy now legitimate with the
assailants, he surveyed the progress of an affray
for which his judgment prepared him to anticipate
a most unhappy termination. As the strife
proceeded
,
he forgot half of his precaution, and
unconsciously
continued, at every moment, to approach
more nearly to the scene of strife. His heart was
now all impulse, his spirit all enthusiasm; and with
an unquiet eye and restless frame, he beheld the
silent passage of the little detachment under the
gallant Georgian, up into the narrow gorge. At
some distance from the hill, and on an eminence,
his position enabled him to perceive, when the
party had made good their advance nearly to
the summit, the impending danger. He saw the
threatening cliff hanging as it were in mid air
above them; and all his sympathies, warmly
excited
and roused at length by the fearfulness of the
peril into a degree of active partisanship which, at
the beginning, a proper prudence had
well-counselled
and determined him to avoid, he put spurs
to his steed, and rushing forward to the foot of the
hill, shouted out to the advancing party the nature
of the danger which awaited them. He shouted
strenuously, but in vainand with a feeling almost
amounting to agony, he beheld the little troop
resolutely
advance beneath the ponderous rock, which,
held in its place by the slightest purchases, needed
but the most moderate effort to upheave and unfix
it for ever.
It was fortunate for the youth that the situation
in which he was now placed was concealed
entirely
from the view of those in the encampment.
It had been no object with him to place himself in
safety, for the consideration of his own chance of
exposure had never been looked to in his mind;
when, under the noble impulse of humanity, he had
rushed forward, if possible to recall the little party,
who either did not or were unwilling to hear his
voice of warning and prevention. Had he been
beheld, there would have been few of the squatters
unable, and still fewer unwilling, to pick him off
with their rifles; and, as the event will show,
the good providence alone which had hitherto
kept with him, rather than the forbearance of his
quondam acquaintance, continued to preserve his
life.
Apprized of the ascent of the pass, and not
disposed
to permit of the escape of those whom the
defenders of it above might spare, unobserved by
his assailants in front, Dexter, with a small
detachment
,
sallying through a loop-hole of his
fortress
,
took an oblique course towards the foot of the
gorge, by which to arrest the flight of the fugitives.
This course brought him directly upon and in
contact with Ralph, who stood immediately at its
entrance, with uplifted eye, and busily engaged in
shouting, at intervals, to the yet advancing
assailants
.
The squatters approached cautiously and
unperceived; for so deeply was the youth
interested
in the fate of those for whom his voice and
hands were alike uplifted, that he was conscious
of nothing else at that moment of despair and doubt.
The very silence which at that time hung over
all things, seemed of itself to cloud and obstruct,
while they lulled the senses into a corresponding
slumber. It was well for the youth, and unlucky
for the assassin, that, as Dexter, with his uplifted
hatchetfor firearms in that place and at that
period he dared not use for fear of attracting the
attention of his foesstruck at his head, his
advanced
foot became entangled in the root of a tree
which ran above the surface, and the impetus of
his action occurring at the very instant in which
he encountered the obstruction, the stroke fell
short of his victim, and grazed the side of his horse;
while the ruffian himself, stumbling forward and
at length, fell headlong upon the ground. The
youth was awakened to consciousness. His mind
was one of that cast with which to know, to think,
and to act, are simultaneous. Of ready decision,
he was never at a loss, and seldom surprised into
even momentary incertitude. With the first
intimation
of the attack upon himself, his pistol had
been drawn, and while the prostrate ruffian was
endeavouring to rise, and before he had well
regained
his feet, the unerring ball was driven
through his head, and without word or effort he fell
back among his fellows, the blood gushing from his
mouth and nostrils in unrestrained torrents. The
whole transaction was the work of a single instant;
and before the squatters who came with their slain
leader could sufficiently recover from the panic
produced by the event to revenge his death, the
youth was beyond their reach; and the assailing
party of the guard, in front of the post, apprized of
the sally by the discharge of the pistol, made
fearful
work among them by a general fire, while
obliquing
to the entrance of the pass just in time to
behold the catastrophe, now somewhat precipitated
by the event which had occurred below. Ralph,
greatly excited, regained his original stand of
survey
,
and with feelings of unrepressed horror
beheld
the event. The Georgian had now almost
reached the top of the hillanother turn of the
road gave him a glimpse of the table upon which
rested the hanging and disjointed cliff of which
we have spoken, when a voice was hearda
single
voicein inquiry:
All ready?
The reply was immediate
Ay, ay, now prize away, boys, and let go.
The advancing troop looked up, and were
permitted
a momentary glance of the terrible fate which
awaited them before it fell. That moment was
enough for horror. A general cry burst from the
lips of those in front, the only notice which those in
the rear ever received of the terror before it was
upon them. An effort, half paralyzed by the awful
emotion which came over them, was made to avoid
the down-coming ruin; but with only partial success,
for in an instant after the uttered response which
called their attention, the ponderous mass, which
hung for a moment like a cloud above them,
upheaved
from its bed of ages, and now freed from all
stays, with a sudden, hurricane-like and whirling
impetus
,
making the solid rock tremble over which it
rushed, came thundering down, swinging over one
half of the narrow trace, bounding from one side to
the other along the gorge, and with the headlong fury
of a cataract sweeping every thing from before its
path until it reached the dead level of the plain
below
.
The instinctive shriek from those who beheld
the mass (when, for an instant impended above them,
it seemed to hesitate in its progress down) was
more full of human terror and trial than any
utterance which followed the event. With the
exception
of a groan, wrung forth here and there
from the half crushed victim, in nature's agony,
the deep silence which ensued was painful and
appalling; and even when the dust had dissipated,
and the eye was enabled to take in the entire
amount of the evil deed, the prospect failed in
impressing the senses of the survivors with so
distinct
a sentiment of horror, as when the doubt and
death, suspended in air, were yet only threatening
and impending. Though prepared for the event,
in one sense of the word, the great body of the
squatters were not prepared for the unusual
emotions
which succeeded it in their bosoms. The arms
dropped from the hands of many of thema
speechless horror was the prevailing feature of all,
and all fight was over, while the scene of bloody
execution was now one of indiscriminate
examination
and remark with friend and foe. Ralph
was the first to rush up the fatal pass, and to
survey
the horrible prospect. One half of the brave
little corps had been swept to instant death by
the unpitying rock, without having afforded the
slightest obstacle to its fearful progress. In one
place lay a disembowelled steed panting its last;
mangled in a confused and unintelligible mass lay
beside him another, the limbs of his rider in many
places undistinguishable from his own. One poor
wretch, whom he assisted to extricate from
beneath
the body of his dying and struggling horse,
cried to him for water, and died in the prayer.
Fortunately for the few who survived the
catastrophe
,
among whom was their gallant but
unfortunate
young leader, they had, at the first glimpse
of the danger, urged on their horses with
redoubled
effort and animation, and by a close
approach
to the surface of the rock, and taking an
oblique direction wide of its probable course, had,
at the time of its precipitation, reached a line
almost
parallel with the place upon which it stood,
and in this way achieved their escape without
serious injury. Their number was few, however;
and not one half of the fifteen who commenced
the ascent ever reached or survived its attainment.
Ralph gained the summit just in time to prevent
the completion of the foul tragedy by its most
appropriate climax. As if enough had not yet
been done in the way of crime, the malignant and
merciless Rivers, of whom we have seen little in
this affair, but to whose black and devilish spirit
the mean of destruction had been hit upon, which
had so well succeeded, now stood over the body
of the groaning and struggling Georgian, with
uplifted
hand, about to complete the deed already
begun. There was not a moment for delay, and
the youth sprung forward in time to seize and to
wrest the weapon from his grasp. With a feeling
of horror and undisguised indignation, he
exclaimed
,
as the outlaw turned furiously upon him,
Wretchwhat would you? Have you not done
enough? would you strike the unresisting man?
Rivers sprang to his feet, and with undisguised
effort, now turned his rage upon the intruder. His
words, choked by passion, could scarce find
utterance
but
he spoke with furious effort at length, as
he directed a wild blow with a battle axe at his
new opponent,
You come for your death, and you shall have
it!
Not yet, replied Ralph, adroitly avoiding the
stroke and closing with the ruffianyou will
find that I am not unequal to the struggle, though
it be with such a monstrous enormity as
yourself
.
What might have been the event of this combat
may not be said. The parties were separated in
a moment by the interposition of Forrester, but
not till our hero, tearing off in the scuffle the
handkerchief
which, as we have seen, had hitherto
encircled
the cheeks of his opponent, had discovered
the friendly outlaw who collected toll for the
Pony Club, and upon whose face the hoof of his
horse, in part, was most visibly engravenwho
had so boldly avowed his design upon his life and
Vol. I.T
purse, and whom he had so fortunately and
successfully
foiled on his first approach to the village.
The fight, as the reader may readily imagine,
was over after this catastrophe; the survivors
of the guard, those who were unhurt, had fled
and the parties with little stir were all now
assembled
around the scene of it. There was little said
upon the occasion. The wounded were taken
such care of as the nature of the circumstances
would permit; and wagons having been provided,
were all removed to the village. Begun with too
much impulse, and conducted with too little
consideration
or reflection, the struggle between the
military and the outlaws had now terminated in a
manner that left perhaps but little quiet or
satisfaction
in the minds of either party. The latter,
though generally an unlicensed tribean
Ishmaelitish
racewhose hands were against all men, and
the hands of all men, in return, being against them
were not so sure that they had not been guilty
of a crime, not merely against the laws of man
and human society, but against the self-evident
decrees and dictates of God; and with this doubt,
at least, if not its conviction, upon their minds
and in their thoughts, their victory, such as it was,
afforded a source of very qualified rejoicing.
CHAPTER XV.
'Tis he! I know him now;
I know him by his pallid brow;
I know him by the evil eye
That aids his envious treachery.
Byron's Giaour
.
Colleton
was by no means slow in the
recognition
of the ruffian, and only wondered at his own
dulness of vision in not having made the discovery
before. Nor did Rivers, with all his habitual
villany
,
seem so well satisfied with his detection.
Perceiving
himself fully known, a momentary feeling
of disquietude came over him; and though he did
not fear, he began to entertain in his mind that
kind of agitation and doubt which made him, for
the time, despair his charm. He was not the
cool villain like Munro,never to be taken by
surprise
,
or at a disadvantage; and his eye was now
withdrawn, though but for a moment, beneath the
stern and searching glance which read him through.
That tacit animal confession and
acknowledgement
was alone sufficient to madden a temper such
as that of Rivers. Easily aroused, his ferocity was
fearless and atrocious, but not measured or
methodical
.
His mind was not marked,we had
almost said temperedby that wholesome and
wholesale indifference of mood which, in all
matters
of prime villany, is probably the most desirable
constituent. He was, as we have seen, a creature
of strong passions, morbid ambition, quick and
even habitual excitement; though at times,
endeavouring
to put on that air of sarcastic superiority
to all emotion which marked the character of the
ascetic philosophera character to which he had
not the slightest claim or feature of resemblance,
and the very affectation of which, whenever he
became
aroused or irritated, was soon and completely
lost sight of and forgotten. Without referring
as Munro would have done, and indeed as he
subsequently didto the precise events which had
already just taken place and were still in
progress
about him, and which made all parties
equally obnoxious with himself to human
punishment
,
and for an offence far more criminal in its
dye to that which the youth laid to his chargehe
could not avoid the momentary apprehension,
which, succeeding with the quickness of thought
the intelligent and conscious glance of Colleton,
immediately came over him. His eye, seldom
distinguished
by such a habit, quailed before it; and
the deep malignity and festering hatred of his soul
towards the youth, which it so unaccountably
entertained
before, underwent, by this mortification
of his pride, a due degree of exaggeration.
Ralph, though wise beyond his years, and one
who, in a thought borrowed in part from Ovid, we
may say, could rather compute them by events than
ordinary time, wanted yet considerably in that
wholesome, though rather dowdyish virtue, which
men call prudence. He acted on the present
occasion
precisely as he might have done in the
College
Campus, with all the benefits of a fair field
and a plentiful crowd of backers. Without duly
reflecting whether an accusation of the kind he
preferred, at such a time, to such men, and against
one of their own accomplices, would avail much,
if any thing, towards the punishment of the
criminal
not
to speak of his own risk, necessarily in
train, as an almost certain consequence from such
an implied determination not to be
particeps
criminis
with any of them, he at once spoke forth the
wrong, with stentorian lungs and suitable action,
and in language accommodated aptly to the bold
spirit which called it into utterance. He
approached
,
and boldly denounced Rivers as a
murderous
villain; and urgently called upon those
around him to aid in his arrest. But he was
unheard
he
had no auditors; nor did this fact result
from any unwillingness on their part to hear and
listen to the charge against one so detested as the
accused. They could see and hear but of one
subject
they
could comprehend no other. The events
of such fresh and recent occurrence were in all
minds and before all eyes; and few, if any but
Forrester, either heard to understand, or listened
for a moment to the recital. Nor did the latter
and now unhappy personage appear to give it
much more consideration than any of the rest.
Hurried on by the force of associating
circumstances
,
and by promptings not of himself or his,
he had been an active getter-up, and performer in,
the terrible drama, the enactment of which we have
already witnessed; and the catastrophe of which
he could now only, and in vain, deplore. Leaning
with a vacant stare and lack-lustre vision against
the neighbouring rock, he seemed indifferent to, and
perhaps ignorant of, the new occurrences taking
place around him. He had interfered when the
youth and Rivers were in contact, but that was so
soon after the event narrated that time for
reflection
had not then been allowed. The dreadful
process of thinking himself into an examination of
his own deeds was going on in his bosom; and
remorse, with its severe but salutary stings, was
doing, without limitation or restraint, her rigorous
T 2
duties. Though either actually congregated or
congregating around him, and within free and easy
hearing of his voice, now stretched to its utmost,
the party were quite too busily employed in the
discussion of the eventstoo much immersed in
the sudden stupor which followed, in nearly all
minds, their terminationto know or care much
what were the hard words, and what the
difficulties
,
between the youth and the outlaw. They had
all of them (their immediate leaders excepted)
been hurried on, as is perfectly natural and not
unfrequently
the case, by the rapid succession of
incidents
(which in their progress of excitement gave
them no time for reflection), from one act to
another
;
without perceiving, in a single pause, the
several
gradations by which they insensibly passed on
from crime to crime;and it was only now, and
in a survey of the several foot-prints in their
progress
,
that they were enabled to perceive the vast
and perilous leaps which they had taken. As in the
ascent, step by step, of the elevation, we can judge
imperfectly of its height, until from the very
summit
we look down upon our place of starting, so
with the wretched outcasts of society of whom we
speak. Flushed with varying excitements, they
had deputed the task of reflection to another and a
calmer time; and with the reins of sober reason
relaxed, whirled on by their passions, they lost all
control over their own impetuous progress, until
brought up and checked, as we have seen, by a
catastrophe the most ruinouswhich, by producing
an utter revulsion of the spirits' temper, again,
if it does not for ever overthrow her, restores
reason
to her empire, though now coupled in its sway
with the attendant terrors of deep remorse, and
many and maddening regrets. From little to large
events, we experience or behold this every day.
It is a history, and all read it. It belongs to human
nature and to society; and until some process shall
be discovered by which men shall be compelled to
think by rule and under regulation, as in a
penitentiary
their bodies are required to work, we despair
of having much improvement in the general
condition
of human affairs. The ignorant and
uneducated
man is quite too willing to depute and defer
to others the task of thinking for him and
furnishing
his opinions. The great mass are gregarious,
and whether a lion or a log is chosen for their
guidance
,
it is still the samethey will follow the
leader, if regularly recognised as such, even though
he be an ass. As if conscious of their own
incapacities
,
whether these arise from deficiencies of
education or denials of birth, they forego the only
habitthat of self-examinationwhich can supply
the deficiency; and with a blind determination, are
willing, on any terms, to divest themselves of the
difficulties and responsibilities of their own
government
.
They crown others with all command,
and binding their hands with cords, place
themselves
at the disposal of those, who, in many cases,
not satisfied with thus much, must have them
hoodwinked
also. To this they also consent, taking
care, in their great desire to be slaves, to be
foremost
themselves in tying on the bandage which
keeps them in darkness and in chains for ever.
Thus will they be content to live, however wronged,
if not absolutely bruised and beaten; happy to
escape
from the cares of an independent mastery of
their own conduct, if, in this way, they can also
escape from the noble responsibilities of
independence
.
The unhappy men, thus led on, as we have seen,
from the commission of misdemeanor to that of
crime, in reality, never for a moment thought upon
the matter. The landlord, Dexter, and Rivers,
had, time out of mind, been their oracles; and
without referring to the distinct condition of those
persons, they reasoned in a manner not uncommon
with the ignorant. Like children at play, they did
not perceive the narrow boundaries which
separate
indulgence from licentiousness; and in the
hurried excitement of the mood, inspired by the
one habit, they had passed at once, unthinkingly
and unconsciously, into the excesses of the other.
They now beheld the event in its true colours, and
there were but few among the squatters not sadly
doubtful upon the course taken, and suffering
corresponding
dismay from its probable consequences.
To a few, such as Munro and Rivers, the aspect of
the thing was unchangedthey had beheld its true
features from the outset, and knew the course, and
defied the consequences. They had already made
up their minds upon ithad regarded the matter
in all its phases, and suffered no surprise
accordingly
.
Not so with the restwith Forrester in
particular, whose mental distress, though borne
with manliness, was yet most distressing. He
stood apart, saying nothing, yet lamenting
inwardly
,
with the self-upbraidings of an agonized
spirit, the progress of that wild game which had
been played; and the easy facility with which he
had been won, by the cunning of others, against
his own promptings, into the perpetration of a
crime so foul. He either for a time heard not or
understood not the charges made by Ralph against
his late coadjutor, until brought to his
consciousness
by the increased stir among the confederates,
who now rapidly crowded about the spot, in time
to hear the denial of the latter to the accusation, in
language and a manner alike fierce and unqualified.
Hear me! was the exclamation of the youth
his voice rising in due effect, and illustrating well
the words he uttered, and the purpose of his
speech:I charge this born and branded villain
with an attempt upon my life. He sought to rob
and murder me at the Catcheta Pass but a few days
ago. Thrown between my horse's feet in the
struggle
,
he received the brand of his hoof, which he
now wears upon his cheek. There he stands, with
the well-deserved mark upon him, and which, but
for the appearance of his accomplices, I should
have made of a yet deeper character. Let him
deny it if he can or dare.
The face of Rivers grew alternately pale and
purple with passion, and he struggled in vain, for
several minutes, to speak. The words came from
him hoarsely and gratingly. Fortunately for him,
Munro, whose cool villany nothing might well
discompose
,
perceiving the necessity of speech for him
who had none, interfered with the following inquiry,
uttered in something like a tone of surprise.
And what say you to this accusation, Guy
Rivers? Can you not find an answer?
It is false; false as hell! and you know it,
Munro, as well as myself. I never saw the boy
until at your house.
That I know, and why you should take so long
to say it I know not. It appears to me, young
gentleman
,
said Munro, with a most cool and
delightful
effrontery, that I can set all these matters
right. I can show you to be under a mistake; for
I happen to know, that at the very time of which
you speak, we were both of us up in the Chestatee
Fork looking for a runaway slaveyou know the
fellow, boys,Black Tom,who has been
out
for
six months and more, and of whom I only got
information
a few weeks ago. Well, as everybody
knows, the Chestatee Fork is at least twenty miles
from the Catcheta Pass, and if we were in one
place, we could not, I am disposed to think, very
well be in another.
An alibi, clearly established, was the remark
of Counsellor Pippin, who now, peering over the
shoulders of the youth, exhibited his face for the
first time during the controversies of the day.
Pippin
was universally known to be possessed of an
admirable scent for finding out a danger when it is
well over, and when the spoils, and not the toils, of
the field are to be reaped. His appearance at
this moment, had the effect of arousing, in some
sort, the depressed spirits of those around him, by
recalling to memory and into exercise the jests
upon his infirmities, which long use had made
legitimate
and habitual. Calculating the probable
effect of such a joke, Munro, without seeming to
observe the interruption, looking significantly round
among the assembly, went on to say:
If you have been thus assaulted, young man,
and I am not disposed to say it is not as you assert,
it cannot have been by any of our village, unless it
be that Counsellor Pippin and his fellow Hob were
the persons; they were down, now I recollect, at
the Catcheta Pass, somewhere about the time; and
I've long suspected Pippin to be more dangerous
and deadly by far than people think him.
I deny it allI deny it. It's not true, young
man. It's not true, my friendsdon't believe a
word of it. Now, Munro, how can you speak so?
HobHobHobI saywhere the devil are
you? Hobsay, you rascal, was I within five miles
of the Catcheta Pass to-day? The negroa
black of the sootiest complexionnow advanced
No, mosser.
Was I yesterday?
The negro put his finger to his forehead, and the
lawyer began to fret at this indication of thought,
and, as it promised to continue, exclaimed
Speak, you rascal, speak outyou know well
enough, without reflecting. The slave cautiously
responded
If mosser want to be deremosser dereno
'casion for ax Hob.
You black rascal, you know well enough I was
not therethat I was not within five miles of the
spot, either to-day, yesterday, or for ten days
back.
Berry true, mosserif you no dere, you no
dere. Hob nebber say one ting when mosser say
'noder.
The unfortunate counsellor, desperate with the
deference of his body servant, now absolutely
perspired
with rage; while, to the infinite amusement
of all, in an endeavour to strike the pliable
witness
,
who adroitly dodged the blow, the lawyer, not
over-active of frame, plunged incontinently
forward
,
and paused not in his headlong
determination
until he measured himself at length upon the
ground. The laugh which succeeded was one of
effectual discomfiture, and the helpless barrister
made good his retreat from a field so unpromising,
by a pursuit of the swift-footed negro, taking care
not to return from the chase. Colleton, who had
regarded this interlude with a stern brow and a
wrathful spirit, now spoke, addressing Munro
You affirm most strongly for this villain, but
your speech is all in vain if its object be to satisfy
my doubts. What effect it may have upon our
hearers is quite another matter. You cannot swear
me out of my conviction and the integrity of my
senses. I am resolute in the one belief, and do not
hesitate here, and in the presence of himself and
all of you, to pronounce him again all the
scoundrel
I declared him to be at first; in the teeth of
all your denials not less than of his. But
perhaps
,
as you answer for him so readily and so well,
let us know, for doubtless you can, by what chance
he came by that brand, that fine impress which he
wears so happily upon his cheek. Can you not
inform him where he got iton what road he met
with itand whether the devil or my horse's heel
gave it him!
If your object be merely to insult me, young
man, I forgive it. You are quite too young for
me to punish, and I have only pity for the
indiscretion
that moves you to unprofitable violence at
this time and in this place, where you see but little
respect is shown to those who invade us with
harsh words or actions. As for your charge
against Rivers, I happen to know that it is
unfounded
,
and my evidence alone would be
sufficient
for the purpose of his defence. If however,
he were guilty of the attempt, as you allege, of
what avail is it for you to make it. Look around
you, young man? taking the youth aside as he
spoke in moderated termsyou have eyes and
understanding
,
and can answer the question for
yourself
.
Who is here to arrest him? Who would
desire, who would dare to make the endeavour?
We are all here equally interested in his escape,
were he a criminal in this respect, because we are
all hereand his voice fell in such a manner as to
be accommodated to the senses of the youth alone
equally guilty of violating the same laws,
and by an offence, in comparison with which
that against you would be entirely lost sight of.
There is the court-house, it is trueand there the
jailbut we seldom see sheriff, judge, or jailer.
When they do make their appearance, which is not
often, they are glad enough to get away again.
If we here suffer injury from one another, we make
out to take justice into our own handsas you
allege yourself partly to have done in this case
and there the matter generally ends. Rivers you
think assaulted you and got the worst of it. You
got off with but little harm yourself, and a
reasonable
man ought to be satisfied. Nothing more
need be said of it. This is the wisest course, let
me advise you. Be quiet about the matter, go on
your way, and leave us to ourselves. Better
suffer a little wrong, and seem to know nothing of
it, than risk a quarrel with those, who, having once
put themselves out of the shelter of the laws, take
every opportunity of putting them at defiance.
And what if you were to push the matter, where
will the sheriff or the military find us? In a week
and the judge will arrive, and the court will be in
session. For that week we shall be out of the
way. Nobody shall knownobody can find us.
This day's work will most probably give us all
a great itch for travel.
Munro had, in truth, made out a very plain case;
and his representations, in the main, were all
correct. The youth felt their force, and his reason
readily assented to the plain sense course which
they pointed out. Contenting himself therefore
with reiterating the charge, he concluded with
saying
that, for the present, he would let the affair rest.
Until the ruffianthus he phrased it, had
answered
the penalties of the laws for his
subsequent
and more heinous offence against them, he
should be silent.
But I have not done with you, young sir, was
the immediate speech of Rivers; his self-confidence
and much of his composure returned, as with a
fierce and malignant look, and a quick stride, he
approached the youth. You have thought proper
Vol. I.U
to make a foul charge against me which I have
denied. It has been shown that your assertion
is unfounded, yet you persist in it, and offer no
atonement. I now demand redressthe redress
of a gentleman. You know the custom of the
country, and regard your own character, I should
think, too highly to refuse me satisfaction. You
have pistols, and here are rifles and dirks. Take
your choice.
The youth looked upon him with ineffable scorn
as he replied:
You mistake me, sirrah, if you think I can
notice your call with any thing but contempt.
What! will you not fightnot fight? not back
your words?
Not with you! was the calm reply.
You refuse me satisfaction, after insulting me!
I always took him for a poor chicken, from
the first time I set eyes on him, said one of
the spectators.
Yes, I didn't think much of him, when he
refused
to join us at first, was the remark of
another.
This comes of so much crowingBrag is a good
dog, but Holdfast is better, went on a third, and
each man had his remark upon Colleton's seeming
timidity. Scorn and indignation were in all faces
around him, and Forrester, at length, awakened
from his stupor by the tide of fierce comment
setting
in upon his friend from all quarters, now
thought it time to interfere.
Come, 'squire, how's this? Don't give way
give him satisfaction, as he calls it, and send the
lead into his gizzard. It will be no harm done, in
putting it to such a creature as that. Don't let him
crow over old Carolinadon't now, 'squire? You
can hit him as easy as a barn door, for I saw your
shot to-dayDon't be afraid, nowstand up, and
I'll back you against the whole of them.
Ay, bring him forward, Forrester. Let him
be a man, if he can, was the speech of one of the
party.
Come, 'squirelet me say that you are ready.
I'll mark off the ground, and you shall have fair
play, was the earnest speech of the woodman
in tones of entreaty.
You mistake me greatly, Forrester, if you
suppose
for a moment that I will contend on equal
terms with such a wretch. He is a common
robber
and an outlaw, whom I have denounced as such,
and whom I cannot therefore fight with. Were
he a gentleman, or had he any pretensions to the
character, you should have no need to urge me on,
I assure you.
I know that, 'squire, and therefore it provokes
me to think that the skunk should get off. Can't
you, now, lay aside the gentleman just long enough
to wing himnow, do try!
The youth smiled as he shook his head
negatively
.
Forrester, with great anxiety, proceeded
But, squire, they won't know your reason for
refusing, and they will set you down as afear'd.
They will call you a coward!
And what if they do, Forrester? They are
not exactly the people about whose opinion I
give myself any concern. I am not solicitous to
gain credit for courage among them. If any of
them doubt it, let them try me. Let one of them
raise a hand or lift a finger upon me, and make the
experiment. They will then find me ready and
willing enough to defend myself from any outrage,
come from what quarter it may.
I'm afraid, squire, they can't be made to
understand
the difference between a gentleman and a
squatter. Indeed, it isn't reasonable that they
should, seeing that such a difference puts them out
of any chance of dressing a proud fellow who
carries his head too high. If you don't fight, 'squire,
I must, if it's only for the honour of old Carolina.
So here goes.
The woodman threw off his coat, and taking up
his rifle, substituted a new for the old flint, and
furnishing the pan with fresh priming, before our
hero could well understand the proposed and novel
arrangement so as to interpose in its arrest, he
advanced
to the spot where Rivers stood, apparently
awaiting the youth's decision, and slapping him
upon the shoulder, thus addressed him
I say, Guy Riversthe 'squire thinks you too
great a blackguard for him to handle, and leaves
all the matter to me. Now you see, as I've done
that
to-day which I take it makes me just as great
a blackguard as yourself, I stand up in his place.
So here's for you. You needn't make any excuse,
and say you have no quarrel with me, for as I am
to handle you in his place, you will consider me to
say every thing that he has saidevery word of
it; and, in addition to that, if more be necessary,
you must know, I think you a mere skunk, and
I've been wanting to have a fair lick at you for a
monstrous long season.
You shall not interfere, Forrester, now, and in
this manner, on any pretence, for the shelter of the
coward, who, having insulted me, now refuses to
give me satisfaction. If you have any thing to ask
at my hands, when I have done with him I shall
be ready for you, was the reply of Rivers.
You hear that, 'squire. I told you so. He has
called you a coward, and you will have to fight
him at last.
I do not see the necessity for that, Forrester,
and beg that you will undertake no fighting on
my account. When my person or honour is in
danger, I am man enough to take care of myself;
and, when I am not, my neighbour or friend can
do me no service by taking my place. As for this
felon, the hangman for himnobody else.
Maddened, not less by the cool determination
of Colleton than by the contemptuous conclusion
of his speech, Rivers, without a word, sprang
fiercely upon him with a dirk, drawn from his bosom
with concerted motion as he made the leap
striking, as he approached, a blow at the unguarded
breast of the youth, which, from the fell and
fiendish
aim and effort, must have resulted fatally had
he not been properly prepared for some such
attempt. Ralph was in his prime, however, of
vigorous make and muscle, and well practised in
the agile sports and athletic exercises of woodland
life. He saw the intent in the mischievous glance
of his enemy's eye, in time to guard himself against
it; and, suddenly changing his position, as the
body of his antagonist was nearly upon him, he
eluded the blow, and the force and impetus
employed
in the effort bore the assassin forward.
Before he could arrest his own progress, the youth
had closed in upon him, and by a dexterous use of
his foot, in a manner well known to the American
woodman, Rivers, without being able to interpose
the slightest obstacle to the new direction thus
given him, was forcibly hurled to the ground.
Before he could recover, the youth was upon him.
His blood was now at fever heat, for he had not
heard the taunts upon his courage from all around
him with indifference, though he had borne them
with a laudable degree of patience throughout.
His eye shot forth fires almost as malignant as
U 2
those of his opponent. One of his hands was
wreathed in the neckcloth of his prostrate foe, while
the other was employed in freeing his own dirk
from the incumbrances of his vest. This took
little time, and he would not have hesitated in the
blow, when the interposition of those present bore
him off, and permitted the fallen and stunned man
to recover his feet. It was at this moment that
the honest friendship of Forrester was to be tried
and tested. The sympathies of those around were
most generally with the ruffian; and the aspect of
affairs was something unlucky, when the latter
was not only permitted to recommence the attack,
but when the youth was pinioned to the ground by
others of the gang, and disarmed of all defence.
The moment was perilous; and, whooping like a
savage, Forrester leapt in between, dealing at the
same time his powerful blows from one to the other,
right and left, and making a clear field around the
youth.
Fair play is all I ask, boysfair play, and we
can lick the whole of you. Hurra for old Carolina.
Who's he says a word against her? Let him stand
up, and be knocked down. How's it, squireyou
an't hurt, I reckon. I hope not; if you are, I'll have
a shot with Rivers myself on the spot.
But Munro interposed.
We have had enough outcry, Forrester. Let us
have no more. Take this young man along with
you, or it will be worse for him.
Well, Wat Munro, all the 'squire wants is fair
playfair play for both of us, and we'll take the
field, man after man. I tell you what, Munro, in
our parts the chickens are always hatched with
spurs, and the children born with their eye teeth.
We know something too about whipping our
weight in wild cats; and until the last governor of
our state had all the bears killed, because they
were getting civilized, we could wrestle with 'em
man for man, and throw seven out of ten.
CHAPTER XVI.
Her heart is full of many fears,
Her eye is dim with many tears,
And in her cheek and on her brow,
The white has grown to marble now.
Ralph
was not permitted to return to the village
that nighthis sturdy friend Forrester insisting
upon his occupying with him the little lodge of his
own, resting on the borders of the settlement, and
almost embowelled in the forest. Here they
conversed
until a late hour previous to their retiring;
the woodman entering more largely into his own
history than he had done before. He suffered
painfully
from the occurrences of the day: detailed
the manner in which he had been worked upon by
Munro to take part in the more fearful transaction
with the guardhow the excitement of the
approaching
conflict had defeated his capacities of
thought, and led him on to the commission of so
great a part of the general offence. Touching the
initial affair with the squatters, he had no
compunctious
scruples. That was all fair game in his
mode of thinking, and even had blood been spilled
more freely than among them it was, he seemed
to think he should have had no remorse. But on
the subject of the murder of the guard, for so he
himself called his crime, his feeling was so intensely
agonizing that Ralph, though as much shocked as
himself at the events, found it necessary to employ
sedative language, and to forbear all manner of
rebuke
.
At an early hour of the morning, they
proceeded
in company to the villageForrester
having
to complete certain arrangements prior to his
flight; which, by the advice of Colleton, he had at
once determined upon. Such, no doubt, was the
determination of many among them not having
those resources, in a familiarity with crime and
criminal associations, which were common to such
as Munro and Rivers.
The aspect of the village was somewhat varied
from its wont. Its people were not so far gone in
familiarity with occurrences like those of the
preceding day, as to be utterly insensible to
their consequences; and a chill inertness pervaded
all faces, and set at defiance every endeavour on the
part of the few who had led, to put the greater
number
in better spirits, either with themselves or those
around them. They were men habituated, it may
be, to villanies; but of a petty description, and far
beneath that which we have just recorded. It is not
therefore to be wondered at, if, when the momentary
impulse had passed away, they felt numerous
misgivings
.
They were all assembled, as on the day
beforetheir new allies with themarms in their
hands, but seemingly without much disposition for
their use. They sauntered unconsciously about
the village, in little groups or individually, without
concert or combination, and with suspicious or
hesitating
eye. Occasionally, the accents of a single
voice broke the general silence among them, though
but for a single moment; and then, with a startling
and painful influence, which imparted a still deeper
sense of gloom to the spirits of all. It appeared to
come laden with a mysterious and strange terror,
and the speaker, aptly personifying the Fear in
Collins's fine Ode on the Passions, shrunk from
the sounds himself had made. Ralph, in
company
with Forrester, made his appearance among
the squatters while thus situated. Seeing them
armed as on the previous day, he was apprehensive
of some new evil; and as he approached the
several stray groups, made known his
apprehensions
to his companion in strong language. He
was not altogether assured of Forrester's own
compunction, and the appearance of those around
almost persuaded him to doubt his sincerity. Why
are these people assembled, Forresteris there
any thing newis there more to be donemore
blood-lettingmore crime and violenceare they
still unsatisfied?
The earnestness of the inquirer was coupled with
a sternness of eye and a warmth of accent which
had in them much, that, under other circumstances
and at other times, would have been sorely offensive
to the sturdy woodman; whose spirit, any thing
in the guise of rebuke would have been calculated
to vex. But he was burdened with thoughts at
the moment, which, in a sufficiently monitorial
character, humbled him with a scourge that
lacerated
at every stroke.
God forbid, 'squire, that more harm should be
done. There has been more done already than
any of us shall well get rid of. I wish to
heaven
I had taken caution from you. But I was
mad, 'squiremad to the heart, and became the
willing tool of men not so mad, but more evil than
I! God forbid, sir, that there should be more harm
done.
Then why this assembly? Why do the
villagers
,
and these ragged and savage fellows whom
you have incorporated among youwhy do they
lounge about idly, with arms in their hands, and
faces that still seem bent on mischief?
Because, 'squire, it's impossible to do otherwise.
We can't go to work, for the life of us, if we wished
to; we all feel that we have gone too far, and those,
whose own consciences do not trouble them, are
yet too much troubled by fear of the consequences
to be in any hurry to take up handspike or
hammer
again in this quarter of the world.
The too guilty man had indeed spoken his own
and the condition of the people among whom he
lived. They could now see and feel the fruits of
that rash error which had led them on; but their
consciousness came too late for retrieval, and they
now wondered, with a simplicity truly surprising
to those who know with what facility an
uneducated
and warm people may be led to their own
ruin, that this consciousness had not come to them
before. Ralph, attended by Forrester, advanced
among the crowd; as he did so, all eyes were turned
upon him, and a sullen conference took place,
having
a reference to himself, between Munro and a
few other of the ringleaders. This conference
was brief, and as soon as it was concluded, the
landlord turned to the youth, and spoke as follows:
You were a witness, Mr. Colleton, of this
whole transaction; and can say whether the
soldiers
were not guilty of the most unprovoked
assault
upon us, without reason or right.
I can say no such thing, sir, was his reply.
On the contrary, I am compelled to say, that a
more horrible and unjustifiable transaction I never
witnessed. I must say that they were not the
aggressors.
How unjustifiable, young sir, quickly and
sternly retorted the landlord. Did you not
behold
us ridden down by the soldierydid they not
attack us in our trenchesin our castle, as it were;
and have we not a right to defend our castle from
assailants. They took the adventure at their peril,
and suffered accordingly.
I know not what your title may be to the
grounds you have defended so successfully, and
which you have styled your castlenor shall I
stop to inquire. I do not believe that your right
either gave you possession or authorized your
defence
of them in this cruel manner. The matter,
however, is between you and your country. My
own impressions are decidedly against you; and
were I called upon for an opinion as to your mode
of asserting your pretended right, I should describe
it as brutal and barbarous, and wholly without
excuse
or justification, whether examined by divine
or human laws.
A sermona sermon from the young preacher
come, boys, let's give him Old Hundred. Really,
sir, you promise almost as well as the parson you
heard yesterday; and will take lessons from him, if
advised by me. But go oncome to a finish
mount upon the stump, where you can be better
seen and heard.
The cheek of the youth glowed with indignation
at the speech of the ruffian, but he replied with a
concentrated clamness that was full of significance:
You mistake me greatly, sir, if you imagine I
am to be provoked into an indiscreet contest with
you by any taunt which you can utter. I pride
myself somewhat in the tact with which I discover
a ruffian, and having, at an early period of your
acquaintance, seen what you were, I cannot regard
you in any other than a single point of view.
Were you not what I know you to be, whatever
might have been the difference of force between us,
I should ere this have driven my dirk into your
throat.
Why, that's something like, nowthat's what
I call manly. You do seem to have some pluck in
you, young sir, though you might make more use
of it. I like a fellow that can feel when he's
touched; and don't think a bit the worse of you
that you think ill of me, and tell me so. But that's
not the thing now. We must talk of other matters.
You must answer a civil question or two for the
satisfaction of the company. We want to know,
sir, if you are disposed to tell tales out of school
if we may apprehend any interference on your
part between us and the state. Will you tell the
authorities what you saw?
The youth made no answer to this question, but
turning contemptuously upon his heel, was about
to leave the circle, around which the assembly, in
visible anxiety for his reply, was now beginning to
crowd.
Stay, young master, not so fast. You must
give us some answer before you are off. Let us
know what we are to expect. Whether, if called
upon by any authority, you would reveal what you
know of this business? was the further inquiry of
Munro.
I certainly shouldevery word of it. I should
at once say that you were all criminal, and describe
you as the chief actor and instigator in this
unhappy
affair.
The response of Colleton had been unhesitating
and immediate; and having given it, he passed
through the throng and left the crowd, which,
sullenly
parting, made way for him in front. Guy
Rivers, in an under-tone, muttered in the ear of
Munro as he left the circleThat, by the eternal
God, he shall never do. Are you satisfied now of
the necessity of silencing him. Munro simply
made a sign of silence, and took no seeming note
of his departure; but his determination was made,
and there was now no obstacle in that quarter to
the long-contemplated vengeance of his
confederate
.
While this matter was in progress among
the villagers, Counsellor Pippin vexed himself and
his man Hob not a little with inquiries as to the
manner in which he should contrive to make some
professional business grow out of it. He could not
well expect any of the persons concerned
voluntarily
to convict themselves; and his thoughts
turned necessarily upon our hero, as the only one
on whom he could rest his desire in this particular.
We have seen with what indifferent success his
own adventure on the field of action, and when the
danger was all well over, was attended; but he
had heard and seen enough to persuade himself
that but little was wanting, without appearing in
the matter himself, to induce Ralph to prosecute
Rivers for the attempt upon his life, a charge which,
in his presence, he had heard him make. He
calculated
in this way to secure himself in two jobs
as magistrate, to institute the initial proceedings by
which Rivers was to be brought to trial, and the
expense of which Ralph was required to pay
and, as an attorney at law, and the only one of
which the village might boast, to have the
satisfaction
of defending and clearing the criminal. Such
being the result of his deliberations, he despatched
Hob with a note to Ralph, requesting to see him at
the earliest possible moment, upon business of the
last importance. Hob arrived at the inn just at
the time when, in the court in front, Ralph, in
company
with the woodman, had joined the villagers
there assembled. Hob, who from long familiarity
Vol. I.X
with the habits of his master, had acquired
something
of a like disposition, felt exceedingly anxious
to hear what was going on; but knowing his
situation
,
and duly valuing his own importance as the
servant of so great a man as the village lawyer, he
conceived it necessary to proceed with due and
proper caution. It is more than probable that his
presence would have been unregarded had he made
his approaches freely and with confidence; but
Hob was outrageously ambitious, and mystery was
delightful. He went to work in the Indian
manner
,
and what with occasionally taking the cover,
now of a bush, now of a pine-tree, and now of a
convenient hillock, Hob had got himself very
comfortably
lodged in the recess of an old ditch,
originally
cut to carry off a body of water which rested
on what was now in part the public mall.
Becoming
interested in the proceedings, and hearing of
the departure of Ralph, to whom he had been
despatched
,
his head gradually assumed a more
elevated
positionhe soon forgot his precaution, and
the shoulders of the spy, neither the most
diminutive
nor graceful, becoming rather too protuberant,
were saluted with a smart assault, vigorously kept
up by the assailant, to whom the use of the hickory
appeared a familiar matter. Hob roared lustily,
and was dragged from his cover. The note was
found upon him, and still further tended to
exaggerate
the hostile feeling which the party now
entertained
for the youth. Under the terrors of the
lash, Hob confessed a great deal more than was
true, and roused into a part forgetfulness of their
offence by the increased prospect of its
punishment
,
which the negro had unhesitatingly
represented
as near at hand, they proceeded to the office
of the lawyer. It was in vain that Pippin denied
all the statements of his negrohis note was thrust
into his face; and without scruple, seizing upon
his papers, they consigned to the flames, deed,
process
,
and documentall the fair and unfair
proceedings
alike, of the lawyer, collected carefully
through a busy period of thirty years' litigation.
They would have proceeded in like manner to the
treatment of Ralph, but that Guy Rivers himself
interposed to allay, and otherwise direct their fury.
The cunning ruffian well knew that Forrester
would stand by the youth, and unwilling to incur
any risk, where the game in another way seemed
so secure, he succeeded in quieting the party, by
claiming to himself the privilege, on the part of his
wounded honour, of a fair field with one who had
so grievously assailed it. Taking the landlord aside,
therefore, they discussed various propositions for
taking the life of one hateful to the one person and
dangerous to them all. Munro was now not
unwilling
to recognise the necessity of taking him off; and
without entering into the feelings of Rivers, which
were almost entirely personal, he gave his assent to
the deed, the mode of performing which was
somewhat
to depend upon circumstances. These will
find their due development as we proceed, and it is
not necessary that we should speak further of them
now.
In the mean while, Ralph had returned to the
village
inn, encountering, at the first step, upon
entering
the threshold, the person of the very
interesting
girl, almost the only redeeming spirit of that
establishment. She had heard of the occurrence,
as who, indeed, had notand the first expression of
her face as her eyes met those of Ralph, though with
a smile, had in it something of a rebuke for not
having
taken the counsel which she had given him on
his departure from the place of prayer. With a
gentleness strictly in character, he conversed with
her for some time on indifferent topicssurprised
at every uttered word from her lipsso musical, so
true to the modest weaknesses of her own, yet so
full of the wisdom and energy which is the more
legitimate characteristic of the other sex. At
length she brought him back to the subject of the
recent strife.
You must go from this place, Mr. Colletonyou
are not safe in this housein this country. You
can travel now without inconvenience from your
late injuries, which do not appear to affect you;
and the sooner you are gone the better for your
safety. There are those hereand she looked
around with a studious caution as she spoke, while
her voice sunk into a whisperwho only wait the
hour and the opportunity to and here her voice
faltered as if she felt the imagined prospectto
put you to a merciless death. Believe me, and in
your confident strength do not despise my
warnings
.
Nothing but prudence and flight can save
you.
Why, said the youth, smiling, and taking her
hand in reply, why should I fear to linger in a
region, where one so much more alive to its
sternnesses
than myself may yet dare to abide. Think
you, fair Lucy, that I am less hardyless fearless
of the dangers and the difficulties of this region
than yourself. You little know how much at this
moment my spirit is willing to encounterand
as he spoke, though his lips wore a smile, there was
a stern sadness in his look, and a gloomy
contraction
of his brow, which made the expression one of
the fullest melancholy.
The girl looked upon him with an eye full of a
deep, though unconscious interest. She seemed
desirous of searching into that spirit which he had
described as so reckless. Withdrawing her hand
suddenly, however, as if now for the first time
aware of its position, she replied hastily:
Yet, I pray you, Mr. Colleton, let not any
sorrow
make you indifferent to the warning I have
given you. There is dangermore danger here
to you than to methough to me the tears
filled in her eyes as she spoke, and her head sunk
down on her breast with an air of the deepest
mental
abandonmentthere is more than death.
The youth again took her hand warmly. He
understood too well the signification of her speech,
and the sad sacrifice which it referred to; and an
interest in her fate was awakened in his bosom,
which made him for a moment forget himself and
the gentle Edith of his own dreams.
Command me, Miss Munro, though I peril my
life in your behalf; say that I can serve you in any
thing, and trust me to obey.
She shook her head mournfully, but without
reply. Again he pressed his services, which were
still refused. A little more firmly, however, she
again urged his departure.
My solicitations have no idle origin. Believe
me, you are in danger, and have but little time for
delay. I would not thus hurry you, but that I
would not have you perish. No, no! you have
been gentle and kind, as few others have been, to
the poor orphan. And, though I would still see
and hear you, I would not that you should suffer.
I should rather suffer myself.
Much of this was evidently uttered with the
most childish unconsciousness. Her mind was
obviously deeply excited with her fears, and when
the youth assured her, in answer to her inquiries,
that he should proceed in the morning on his
journey
,
she interrupted him quickly
To-dayto-daynowdo not delay, I pray
X 2
you. You know not the perils which a night may
bring forth.
When assured that he himself could perceive
no cause of peril, and when, with a manner
sufficiently
lofty, he gave her to understand that a
feeling
of pride alone, if there were no other cause,
would prevent a procedure savouring so much of
flight, she shook her head mournfully, though
saying
nothing. In reply to his offer of service, she
returned him her thanks, but assuring him he could
do her none, she retired from the apartment.
CHAPTER XVII.
Love's prayer is urged in vain, when narrow souls
Judge of its wants and longings. Wealth is stern,
And the idolatrous love of gold will bide
No homage but its own.
During
the progress of the dialogue narrated in
the conclusion of our last chapter, Forrester had
absented himself, as much probably with a delicate
sense of courtesy, which anticipated some further
results than came from it, as with the view to the
consummation of some private matters of his own.
He now returned, and signifying his readiness to
Ralph, they mounted their horses and proceeded on
a proposed ride out of the village, in which
Forrester
had promised to show the youth a pleasanter
region and neighbourhood. This ride, however,
was rather of a gloomy tendency, as its influences
were lost in the utterance and free exhibition to
Ralph of the mental sufferings of his companion.
Naturally of a good spirit and temper, his heart,
though strong of endurance and fearless of trial,
had not yet been greatly hardened by the world's
circumstance. The cold droppings of the bitter
waters, however they might have worn into, had
not altogether petrified it; and his feelings, coupled
with and at all times acted upon by a southern
fancy, did not fail to depict to his own sense, and in
the most lively colours, the offence of which he had
been guilty. It was with a reproachful and
troublesome
consciousness, therefore, that he now
addressed
his more youthful companion on the
subject
so fearfully presented to his thought. He had
already, in their brief acquaintance, found in Ralph
a firm and friendly adviser, and acknowledging in
his person all the understood superiorities of
polished
manners and correct education, he did not
scruple to come to him for advice in his present
difficulties. Ralph, fully comprehending his
distress
,
and conscious how little of his fault had
been premeditated,estimating, too, the many good
qualities apparent in his characterdid not
withhold
his counsel.
I can say little to you now, Forrester, in the
way of advice, so long as you continue to herd
with the men who have already led you into so
much mischief. You appear to me, and must
appear
to all men, while coupled with such
associations
,
as voluntarily choosing your ground, and
taking all the consequences of its position. As
there would seem no necessity for your dwelling
longer among them, you certainly do make your
choice in thus continuing their associate.
Not so much a matter of choice, now, 'squire,
as you imagine. It was, to be sure, choice at first,
but then I did not know the people I had to deal
with; and when I did, you see, the circumstances
were altered.
How, and by what means?
Why, then, 'squire, you must know, and I see
no reason to keep the thing from you, I took a
liking
,
a short time after I came here, to a young
woman
,
the daughter of one of our diggers, and she
to meat least so she says, and I must confess I'm
not unwilling to believe her; though it is difficult
to saythese women you know and as he left
the unfinished sentence, he glanced significantly to
the youth's face with an expression which the latter
thus interpreted
Are not, you would say, at all times to be
relied on.
Why, no, 'squireI would not exactly say
thatthat might be something too much of a speech.
I did mean to say, from what we see daily, that it
isn't always they know their own minds.
There is some truth, Forrester, in the
distinction
,
and I have thought so before. I am persuaded
that the gentler sex is far less given to deceit than
our own; but their opinions and feelings on the
other hand, are formed with infinitely more
frequency
and facility, and more readily acted upon
by passing and occasional influences. Their very
susceptibility to the most light and casual
impressions
,
is, of itself, calculated to render vacillating
their estimate of things and characters. They are
creatures of such delicate construction, and their
affections are of such like character, that, like all
fine machinery, they are perpetually operated on
by the atmosphere, the winds, the dew, and the
sunshine. The frost blights and the sun blisters;
and a kind or stern accent elevates or depresses,
where, with us, they might pass unheeded or
unheard
.
We are more cunningmore shy and
cautious; and seldom, after a certain age, let our
affections out of our own custody. We learn
very soon in lifeindeed, we are compelled to learn,
in our own defence, at a very early periodto go
into the world as if we were going into battle. We
send out spies, keep sentinels on duty, man our
defences
,
carry arms in our bosoms, which we cover
with a buckler, though, with the policy of a court,
we conceal that in turn with a silken and
embroidered
vestment. We watch every erring thought
we learn to be equivocal of speech; and our
very hearts, as the Indians phrase it, are taught to
speak their desires with a double tongue. We are
perpetually on the look-out for enemies and attack;
we dread pitfalls and circumventions, and we feel
that every face which we encounter is a smiling
deceitevery honeyed word a blandishment meant
to betray us. These are lessons which society, as
at present constituted, teaches of itself. With
women
the case is essentially different. They have
few of these influences to pervert and mislead.
They have nothing to do in the market-place
they are not candidates for place or powerthey
have not the ambition which is always struggling
for state and for self; but with a wisdom in this,
that might avail us wonderfully in all other respects,
they are kept apart, as things for love and worship
domestic divinities, whose true altar-place is the
fireside; whose true sway is over fond hearts,
generous
sensibilities, and immaculate honour. Where
should they learn to contend with guileto acquire
cunning and circumspectionto guard the heart
to keep sweet affections locked up coldly, like
mountain
waters? Shall we wonder that they sometimes
deceive themselves rather than their neighbours
that they sometimes misapprehend their own
feelings
,
and mistake for love some less absorbing
intruder
,
who, but lights upon the heart for a single
instant, as a bird upon his spray, to rest or to plume
his pinions, and be off with the very next zephyr.
But all this is wide of the mark, Forrester, and keeps
you from your story.
My story isn't much, Master Colleton, and is
easily told. I love Kate, and as I said before, I
believe Kate loves me; and though it be scarcely
a sign of manliness to confess so much, yet I must
say to you, 'squire, that I love her so very much
that I cannot do without her.
I honour your avowal, Forrester, and see
nothing
unmanly or unbecoming in the sentiment you
profess. On the contrary, such a feeling, in my
mind, more truly than any other, indicates the
presence
and possession of those very qualities out of
which true manhood is made. The creature who
prides himself chiefly upon his insensibilities, has
no more claim to be considered a human being
than the trees that gather around us, or the rocks
over which we travel.
Well, 'squire, I believe you are right, and I am
glad that such is your opinion, for now I shall be
able to speak to you more freely upon this subject,
Indeed, you talk about the thing so knowingly, that
I should not be surprised, 'squire, to find out that
you too had something of the same sort troubling
your heart, though here you be travelling far from
home and among strangers.
The remark of Forrester was put knowingly,
and with an air of arch inquiry. A slight shadow
passed over and clouded the face of the youth, and
for a moment his brow was wrinkled into
sternness
;
but hastily suppressing the awakened
emotion
,
whatever its origin might have been, he
simply
replied, in an indirect rebuke, which his
companion
very readily comprehended
You were speaking of your own heart, I
believe
,
Forrester, and not of mine. If you please,
we will confine ourselves to the one territory,
particularly
as it promises to find us sufficient
employment
of itself, without rendering it necessary that
we should cross over to any other.
It's a true word, 'squirethe business of the
one territory is sufficient for me, at this time, and
more than I shall well get through with; but
though I know this, somehow or other, I want to
forget it all, if possible; and sometimes I close my
eyes in the hope to shut out ugly thoughts.
The feeling is melancholy enough, but it is just
the one which should test your manhood. It is
not for one who has been all his life buffeting with
the world and ill-fortune, to despond at every
mischance
or misdeed. Proceed with your narrative;
and in providing for the future, you will be able to
forget not a little of the past.
You are right, 'squire, I will be a man, and
stand my chance, whether good or ill, like a man,
as I have always been. Well, as I was saying,
Kate is neither unkind nor unwilling, and the only
difficulty is with her father. He is now mighty
fond of the needful, and won't hear to our marriage
until I have a good foundation, and something to
go upon. It is this, you see, which keeps me here,
shoulder to shoulder with these men, whom I like
and love just as little perhaps as yourself; and it was
because the soldiers came upon us just as I was
beginning
to lay up a little from my earnings, that
made me desperate. I dreaded to lose what I had
so long been working for, and whenever the thought
of Kate came through my brain, I grew rash and
ready for any mischief; and this is just the way in
which I ran headlong into this difficulty.
It is melancholy, Forrester, to think, that with
such a feeling as that you profess for this young
woman, you should be so little regardful of her
peace or your ownthat you should plunge so
madly into strife and crime, and proceed to the
commission of acts which not only embitter your
life, but must defeat the very hopes and
expectations
for which you live.
It's the nature of the beast, replied the
woodman
,
with a melancholy shake of the head, in a
phrase which has become a proverb of familiar use
in the south. `It's the nature of the beast,' 'squire
I never seem to think about a thing until it's all
over, and too late to mend it. It's a sad
misfortune
to have such a temper, and yesterday's work
tells me so much more forcibly than I can ever tell
myself. But what am I to do, 'squire? that's what
I want to know. Can you say nothing to me
which will put me in better humour with myself
can you give me no advice, no consolation. Say
any thingany thing which will make me think less
about this matter.
The conscience of the unhappy criminal was
indeed
busy, and he spoke in tones of deep, though
suppressed emotion and energy. The youth did
not pretend to consolehe well knew that the
mental
nature would have its course, and to withstand
or arrest it would only have the effect of further
provoking its morbidity. He replied calmly, but
feelingly
Your situation is unhappy, Forrester, and calls
for serious reflection. It is not for me to offer
much, if any advice, to one so much more
experienced
than myself. Yet my thoughts are at your
service for what they are worth. You cannot, of
course, hope to remain in the country after this;
yet, in flying from that justice to which you will
have made no atonement, you will not necessarily
escape the consequences of such a crime, which, I
feel satisfied, will, for a long season, rest heavily
upon a spirit such as yours. Your confederates
have greatly the advantage of you in this
particular
.
The fear of human penalties is with them the
only fear. Your severest judge will be your own
heart, and from that you may not fly. With regard
to your affections I can say little. I know not
what may be your resourcesyour means of life,
and the nature of those enterprises which, in
another
region, you might pursue. In the west, you
would be secure from punishmentthe wants of
life in the wilderness are few, and of easy
attainment
why
not marry the young woman, and let
her fly with you to happiness and safety.
And wouldn't I do so, 'squire?I would be a
happy fellow if I could. But her father will never
consent. He had no hand in yesterday's business,
and I wonder at that too, for he's mighty apt at all
such scrapes; and he will not therefore be so very
ready to perceive the necessity of my flight
certainly
not of hers, she being his only child; and
though a tough old sort of chap, he's main fond of
her.
See him about it at once, then, and if he does
not consent, the only difficulty is in the delay
and further protraction of your union. It would
be very easy, when you are once well-settled, to
claim her as your wife.
That's all very true and very reasonable, 'squire
but it's rather hard, this waiting. Here, for five
years, have I been playing this sort of game, and
it goes greatly against the grain to have to begin
anew and in a new place. But here's where the
old buck lives. It's quite a snug farm, as you may
see. He's pretty well off, and by one little end or
the other, contrives to make it look smarter and
smarter every yearbut then he's just as close as a
corkscrew, and quite mean in his ways. And
Vol. I.Y
there's Kate, 'squire, looking from the window.
Now, an't she a sweet creature? Come, 'light
you shall see her close. Make yourself quite at
home, as I do. I make free, for you see the old
people have all along looked upon me as a son,
seeing that I am to be one at some time or other.
They were now at the entrance of as smiling
a cottage and settlement as a lover of romance
might well desire to look upon. Every thing had
a cheery, sunshiny aspect, looking life, comfort, and
the all in all contentand with a feeling of
pleasure
kindled anew in his bosom by the prospect,
Ralph complied readily with the frank and
somewhat
informal invitation of his companion, and was
soon made perfectly at home by the freedom and
ease which characterized the manners of the young
girl who descended to receive them. A slight
suffusion
of the cheek and a downcast eye, upon the
entrance of her lover, indicated a gratified
consciousness
on the part of the maiden which did not
look amiss. She was seemingly a gentle, playful
creature, extremely young, apparently without a
thought of guile, and altogether untouched with a
solitary presentiment of the unhappy fortunes in
store for her. Her mother having now made her
appearance, soon employed the youth in occasional
discourse, which furnished sufficient opportunity to
the betrothed to pursue their own conversation, in
a quiet corner of the same room, in that under-tone
which, where lovers are concerned, is of all others
the most delightful and emphatic. True love is
always timid; he too, as well as fear, is apt to
shrink back at the sound himself has made. His
words are few and the tones feeble. He throws
his thoughts into his eyes, and they speak enough
for all his purposes. On the present occasion,
however
,
he was dumb from other influences, and the
hesitating voice, the guilty look, the unquiet
manner
,
sufficiently spoke on the part of her lover
what his own tongue refused to whisper in the ears
of the maiden. He strove, but vainly, to relate
the melancholy event to which we have already
sufficiently alluded. His words were broken and
confused, but she gathered enough, in part, to
comprehend
the affair, though still ignorant of the
precise
actors and sufferers. The heart of Katharine
was one of deep-seated tenderness, and it may
not be easy to describe the shock which the
intelligence
gave her. She did not hear him through
without ejaculations of horror, sufficiently fervent
and loud to provoke the glance of her mother, who
did not, however, though turning her looks
inquiringly
and frequently upon the two, venture upon
any inquiry, or offer any remark. The girl heard
her lover patiently, but when he narrated the
catastrophe
,
and told of the murder of the guard, she
no longer struggled to restrain the feeling, now too
strong for suppression. Her words broke through
her lips quickly, as she exclaimed
But you, Markyou had no part in this matter
you lent no aidyou gave no hand. You
interfered
,
I am sure you did, to prevent the murder of
the innocent men. Speak out, Mark, and tell me
the truth, and relieve me from these horrible
apprehensions
.
As she spoke, her small hand rested upon his
wrist with a passionate energy, in full accordance
with the spirit of her language. The head of the
unhappy man sunk upon his breasthis eyes,
dewily
suffused, were cast upon the floor, and he spoke
nothing, or inarticulately, in reply.
What means this silencewhat am I to
believe
what
am I to think, Mark Forrester? You
cannot have given aid to those bad men, whom you
yourself despise. You have not so far forgotten
yourself and me as to go on with that wicked man,
Rivers, following his direction, to take away life
to spill blood as if it were water. You have not
done this, Mark. Tell me at once that I am
foolish
to fear it for an instantthat it is not so.
The person addressed strove, but in vain, to
reply. The inarticulate sounds came forth
chokingly
from his lips without feature or substance.
He strode impatiently up and down the apartment,
followed by the young and excited maiden, who
unconsciously pursued him with repeated inquiries;
while her mother, awakened to the necessity of
interference
,
vainly strove to find a solution of the
mystery, and to quiet both of the parties.
Will you not speak to me, Mark. Can you not
will you not answer?
The unhappy man shook his head, in a
perplexed
and irritated manner, indicating his inability
to replybut concluding with pointing his finger
impatiently to Ralph, who stood up, a surprised
and anxious spectator of the scene. The maiden
seemed to comprehend the intimation, and with an
energy and boldness that would not well describe
the accustomed habit of the young girl, with a
hurried
but firm step, she crossed the apartment to
where stood the youth. Her eye was quick and
searchingher words broken, but with an
impetuous
flow, indicating the anxiety and excitement
which, while it accounted for, sufficiently excused
the abruptness of her address, she spoke
Do, sirsay for this man that he had no hand
in the matterthat he is free from the stain of
blood. Speak for him, sir, I pray youtell me
that which he will not tell himself.
The old lady now sought to interpose, and to
apologize for her daughter.
Why, Kate, Katharineforgive her, sirKate
Katharine, my dearyou forget. You ask
questions of the stranger without any
consideration
.
But she spoke to unconscious auditors, and
Forrester
,
though still almost speechless, now
interposed
Let her ask, motherlet her asklet her know
it all. He can say what I cannot. He can tell all.
Speak out, 'squirespeak outdon't fear for me.
It must come, and who can better tell of it than
you who know it all.
Thus urged, Ralph, in few words, related the
occurrence. Though carefully avoiding the use
of epithet or phrase which might colour with an
increased odium the connexion and conduct of
Forrester with the affair, the offence admitted of
so little apology or extenuation, that the delicacy
with which the details were narrated availed but
little in its mitigation; and an involuntary cry
burst from mother and daughter alike, to which the
hollow groan that came from the lips of Forrester
furnished a fitting echo.
And this is all true, Markmust I believe all
this? was the inquiry of the young girl, after a
brief interval. There was a desperate
precipitance
in the reply of Forrester
TrueKatharinetrue, every word of it is
true. Do you not see it written in my face. Am
I not chokeddo not my knees trembleand my
handslook for yourselfare they not covered
with blood?
The youth interposed, and for a moment doubted
the sanity of his companion. He had spoken
in figurea mode of speech, which, it is a mistake
in rhetoricians to ascribe only to an artificial origin,
during a state of mental quiet. Deep passion and
Y 2
strong excitements, we are bold to say, employ
metaphor largely; and, upon an inspection of the
criminal records of any country, it will be found
that the most common narrations from persons
deeply wrought upon by strong circumstances are
abundantly stored with the evidence of what we
assert.
And how came it, Mark?was the inquiry
of the maidenand why did you this thing?
Ay, you may well ask, and wonder. I cannot
tell you. I was a foolI was mad! I knew not
what I did. From one thing I went on to another,
and I knew nothing of what had been done until
all was done. Some devil was at my elbow
some devil at my heart. I feel it there stillI am
not yet free. I could do moreI could go yet
farther
.
I could finish the damned work by
another
crime; and no crime eithersince I should
be myself the only victim, and well deserving a
worse punishment.
The offender was deeply excited, and felt
poignantly
.
For some time it tasked all the powers of
Ralph's mind, and the seductive blandishments of
the maiden herself, to allay the fever of his spirit;
when at length he was something restored, the
dialogue was renewed by an inquiry of the old
lady as to the future destination of her
anticipated
son-in-law, for whom indeed she entertained
a genuine affection.
And what is to be the end of all this, Mark?
What is it you propose to dowhere will you
fly?
To the nation, motherwhere else? I must
fly somewheregive myself up to justice, or
and he paused in the sentence so unpromisingly
begun, while his eyes rolled with unaccustomed
terrors, and his voice grew thick in his throat.
Or, whatwhat mean you by that word, that
look, Mark? I do not understand youwhy speak
you in this way, and to me?exclaimed the
maiden, passionately interrupting him in a speech,
which, though strictly the creature of his morbid
spirit and present excitement was perhaps
unnecessarily
and something too wantonly indulged in.
Forgive me, Katharinedear Katharinebut
you little know the madness and the misery at my
heart.
And have you no thought of mine, Mark? this
deed of yours has brought misery, if not madness
to it tooand speech like this might well be spared
us now!
It is this very thought, Kate, which now
increases
my anguish. It is the thought that I have
made you miserable, when I should have striven
only to make you happy. The thought, too, that I
must leave youto see you perhaps never again
these unmanthese madden me, Katharine;
and I feel desperate like the man striving with
his brother upon the plank in the broad ocean.
And why part, Mark?I see not this
necessity
!
Would you have me stay and perish? would
you behold me, dragged perhaps from your own
arms before the stern judge, and to a dreadful death?
It will be so if I stay much longer. The State will
not suffer this thing to pass over. The crime is
too largetoo fearful. Besides this, the Pony
Club have lately committed several desperate
offences, which have already attracted the notice
of the Legislature. This very guard had been
ordered to disperse them; and this affair will
bring down a sufficient force to overrun all our
settlements, and they may even penetrate the
nation
itself, where we might otherwise find shelter.
There will be no safety for me.
The despondence of the woodman increased as
he spoke; and the young girl, as if unconscious of
all spectators, in the confiding innocence of her
heart, exclaimed, while her head sunk upon his
shoulder
And why, Mark, may we not all fly together?
There will be no reason now to remain here, since
the miners are all to be dispersed.
Well said, Katewell said responded a
voice at the entrance of the apartment, at the
sound of which, the person addressed started with
a visible trepidation, which destroyed all her
previous
energy of mannerIt is well thought on,
Katethere will, sure enough, be very little
reason
now for any of us to remain, since this ugly
business; and the only question is as to what
quarter we shall go. There is, however, just as
little reason for our flight in company with Mark
Forrester.
It was the father of the maiden who spoke
one who was the arbiter of her destinies, and so
much the dictator in his household and over his
family, that from his decision and authority there
was suffered no appeal. Without pausing for a
reply, he proceeded:
Our course, Mark, must now lie separate.
You will take your route and I minewe cannot
take them together. As for my daughter, she
cannot take up with you, seeing your present
condition
.
Your affairs are not as they were when I
consented to your engagement; therefore, the
least said and thought about past matters, the
better.
But was the beginning of a reply from the
sad and discarded lover, in which he was not
suffered to proceed. The old man was firm, and
settled further controversy in short order.
No talk, Markseeing that it's no use, and
there's no occasion for it. It must be as I say.
I cannot permit of Kate's connexion with a man
in your situation, who the very next moment may
be brought to the halter and bring shame upon
her. Take your parting, and try to forget old
times, my good fellow. I think well of and am
sorry for you, Mark, but I can do nothing. The
girl is my only child, and I must keep her from
harm, if I can.
Mark battled the point with considerable warmth
and vigour, and the scene was something further
protracted, but need not here be prolonged. The
father was obdurate, and too much dreaded by the
members of his family to admit of much prayer or
pleading on their part. Apart from this, his reason,
though a stern, was a wise and a strong one. The
intercession of Colleton warmly made, proved
equally unavailing, and after a brief but painful
parting with the maiden, Forrester remounted his
horse, and in company with the youth departed
for the village, distant some few miles. But the
adieus of the lovers, in this instance, were not
destined
to be the last. In the narrow passage in
which, removed from all sight or scrutiny, she
hung droopingly like a storm-beaten flower upon
his bosom, he solicited, and not unsuccessfully, a
private and a parting interview.
To-night, then, at the old sycamore, as the
moon rises,he whispered in her ear, as sadly
and silently she withdrew from his embrace.
CHAPTER XVIII.
I loved thee in so strained a purity,
That the blest gods, as angry with my fancy,
More bright in zeal than the devotion which
Cold lips blow to their deities, take thee from me.
Troilus and Cressida
.
With
Ralph, the unhappy woodman, thus even
denied to hope, returned, more miserable than
before
,
to the village of Chestatee. The crowd there
had been largely diminished. The more obnoxious
among the offenders, those who, having taken the
most prominent parts, apprehended recognition
had taken themselves as much out of sight as
possible
.
Even Munro and Rivers, with all their
hardihood, were no longer to be seen, and those
still lingering in the village were such as under no
circumstances might well provoke suspicion of
`subtle deed and counter enterprise.' They were
the fat men, the beef of societyloving long
speeches and goodly cheer. The two friends, for
so we may call them, were left almost in the
exclusive
possession of the public, and without
observation
discussed their several plans of departure.
Forrester had determined to commence his
journey
that very night; while Ralph, with what might
seem headstrong rashness, chose the ensuing day
for a like purpose. But the youth was not without
his reasons for this determination. He knew
perfectly
well that he was in peril, but felt also that
this peril would be met with much more difficulty
by night than by day. Deeming himself secure,
comparatively speaking, while actually in the
village
,
he felt that it would be safer to remain there
another night, than by setting off at midday,
encounter
the unavoidable risk of either pursuing
his course through the night in that dangerous
neighbourhood, where every step which he took
might be watched, or be compelled to stop at some
more insulated position, in which there must be
far less safety. He concluded, therefore, to set off
at early dawn on the ensuing morning, and
calculated
,
with the advantage of daylight all the way,
through brisk riding, to put himself by evening
beyond
the reach of his enemies. That he was not
altogether permitted to pursue this course, was
certainly not through any neglect of preparatory
arrangement.
The public table at the inn on that day was
thinly attended; and the repast was partaken by
all parties in comparative silence. A few words
were addressed by Colleton to Lucy Munro, but
they were answered, not coldly, but sparingly, and
her replies were entirely wanting in their usual
spirit. Still, her looks signified for him the
deepest
interest, and a significant motion of the finger,
which might have been held to convey a warning,
was all that he noted of that earnest manner which
had pleased him in her habit heretofore. The day
was got through with difficulty by all parties; and
as evening approached, Forrester, having effected
all his arrangements without provoking
observation
,
in the quiet and privacy of the youth's
chamber
,
bade him farewell, cautioning him at the same
time against all voluntary risk, and reminding
him of the necessity, while in that neighbourhood,
of keeping up a good look-out. Their courses lay
not so far asunder but that they might, for a time,
have proceeded together, and with more mutual
advantage; but the suggestions and solicitations
of Forrester on this subject were alike disregarded
by Ralph, with what reason we may not positively
say, but it is possible that it arose from a
prudential
reference to the fact that the association of one
flying from justice was not exactly such as the
innocent should desire. And this was reason
enough. They separated, and the youth proceeded
to the preparations for his own contemplated
departure
.
His pistols were prepared and in
readiness
,
with his dirk, on the small table by the side
of his bed; his portmanteau lay alike contiguous;
and before seeking his couch, which he did at an
early hour, he himself had seen that his good steed
had been well provided with corn and fodder.
The sable groom too, whose attentions to the noble
animal from the first, stimulated by an occasional
bit of silver, had been unremitted, was now further
rewarded, and promised faithfully to be in
readiness
at any hour in his equipment. Thus, all
things arranged, Ralph returned to his chamber,
and without removing his dress, wrapping his cloak
around him, he threw himself upon his couch, and
addressed himself to those slumbers which were
destined to be of no very long continuance.
Forrester, in the meanwhile, had proceeded
with all the impatience of a lover to the designated
place of
tryst
, under the giant sycamore, the
sheltering
limbs and leaves of which, on sundry previous
occasions, had ministered to a like purpose. The
place was not remote, or at least would not be
so considered in country estimation, from the
dwelling of the maiden, and was to be reached
from the latter spot by a circuitous passage through
a thick wood, which covered the distance between
entirely. The spot chosen for the meeting was
well known to all parties, and we shall not
pretend
,
at this time of day, to limit the knowledge of
its sweet fitness for the purposes of love, to them
alone. They had tasted of its sweets a thousand
times, and could well understand and appreciate
that air of romantic and fairy-like seclusion which
so much distinguished it, and which served
admirably
in concert with the uses to which it was now
appropriated. The tree grew within and
surmounted
a little hollow, formed by the even and
combined natural descents, to that common centre,
of four hills, beautifully grouped, which surrounded
and completely fenced it in. Their descents were
smooth and even, without a single abruptness, to
the bottom, in the centre of which rose the
sycamore
,
which, from its own situation, conferred the
name of Sycamore Hollow to the sweet spot upon
which it stood. A spring, trickling from beneath
its roots, shaded and surmounted by its folding
branches from the thirsty heats of the summer sun,
kept up a low and continuous prattle with the
pebbles
over which it made its way, that consorted
sweetly with the secluded harmonies that
overmantled
,
as with a mighty wing, the sheltered place.
Scenes like these are abundant enough in the
southern
country; and by their quiet, unobtrusive, and
softer beauties, would seem, and not inefficiently
or feebly, to supply in most respects the wants of
those bolder characteristics, in which nature in
those regions is confessedly deficient. Whatever
may be the want of southern scenery in
stupendousness
or sublimity, it is, we are inclined to
believe
,
more than made up in those thousand quiet
and wooing charms of location, which seem
designed
expressly for the hamlet and the cottage
the evening dancethe midday repose and rural
banquetand all those numberless practices of a
small and well-intentioned society, which win
Vol. I.Z
the affections into limpid and ever-living currents,
touched for ever, here and there, by the sunshine,
and sheltered in their repose by overhanging leaves
and flowers, for ever fertile and for ever fresh.
They may not occasion a feeling of solemn awe,
but they enkindle one of admiring affection; and
where the mountain and the bald rock would be
productive only of strength and sternness, their
softer featurings of brawling brook, bending and
variegated shrubbery, wild flower, gadding vine,
and undulating hillock, mould the contemplative
spirit into gentleness and love. The scenery of the
south seldom impresses at first, but it grows upon
acquaintance; and in a little while, where once all
things looked monotonous and unattractive, we
learn to discover sweet influences that ravish us
from ourselves at every step we take, into worlds
and wilds, where all is fairy-like, wooing, and
unchangingly sweet.
The night, though yet without a moon, was
beautifully
clear and cloudless. The stars had come
out with all their brightnessa soft zephyr played
drowsily and fitfully among the tops of the
shrubbery
,
that lay, as it were, asleep on the circling
hilltops
around; while the odours of complicated
charm from a thousand floral knots, which had
caught blooms from the rainbows, and dyed
themselves
in their stolen splendours, thickly studding
the wild and matted grass which sustained them,
brought along with them even a stronger influence
than the rest of the scene, and might have taught
a ready lesson of love to much sterner spirits
than the two, now so unhappy, who were there to
take their parting and last embrace.
The swift motion of a galloping steed was heard,
and Forrester was at the place and hour of
appointment
.
In mournful mood, he threw himself at
the foot of one of the hills, upon one of the tufted
roots of the huge tree which sheltered the little
hollow, and resigned himself to a somewhat bitter
survey of his own condition, and of the privations
and probable straits into which his own rash
thoughtlessness had so unhappily involved him.
His horse, docile and well trained, stood
unfastened
in the thicket, cropping the young and tender
herbage at some little distance; but so habituated
to rule that no other security than his own will
was considered by his master necessary for his
continued presence. The lover waited not long.
Descending with slow but even steps, the hill,
through a narrow pathway on one side of the
wood, well known and frequently trodden by both,
he beheld the approach of the maiden, and hurried
forward to receive her. The terms upon which
they had so long stood forbade constraint, and put
at defiance all those formalities which under other
circumstances might have grown out of the
meeting
.
She advanced without pause or hesitancy,
and the hand of her lover grasped that which she
extended, his arm passed about her, his lip was
fastened to her own, without let or hinderance, and,
in that one sweet embrace, in that one moment of
blissful forgetfulness, all other of life's
circumstances
had ceased to afflict. But they were not
happy even at that moment of delight and illusion.
The gentler spirit of the maiden's sex was
uppermost
,
and the sad story of his crime, which at
their last meeting had been told her, lay with heavy
and foreboding influence at her heart. She was a
gentle creature, and though dwelling in a
wilderness
,
such is the prevailing influence upon female
character, of the kind of education acquirable in
the southern,or, we may add, and thus perhaps
furnish the reason for any peculiarity in this
respectthe slave-holding states, she partook in a
large degree of that excessive delicacy, as well of
spirit as of person, which, while a marked
characteristic
of that entire region, is apt to become of
itself a disease, exhibiting itself too frequently in a
nervousness and timidity that unfits its owner for
the ruder necessities of life, and enables it to abide
only under its more serene and summer aspects.
The tale of blood, and its awful consequences, was
perpetually recurring to her imagination. Her
fancy described and dwelt upon its details, her
thoughts wove it into a thousand startling tissues,
until, though believing his crime unpremeditated,
she almost shrank from the embrace of her lover,
because of the blood so recently upon his hands.
Placing her beside him upon the seat he had
occupied
before her coming, he tenderly rebuked her
gloomy look and manner, while an inward and
painful consciousness of its cause gave to his voice
a hesitating tremor, and his eye, heretofore
unquailing
at any glance, no longer bold, now shrank
downcast before the tearful emphasis of hers.
You have come,Katecome, according to your
promise, yet you wear not the old looks. Your
eye is vacant and sternyour heart, it beats sadly
and hurriedly beneath my hand, as if there were
gloomy and vexatious thoughts within.
And should I not be sad, Mark, and should
you not be sad? Gloom and sorrow befit our
situations alike; though for you I feel more than
for myself. I think not so much of our parting, as
of your misfortune in having partaken of this
crime. There is to me but little occasion for grief
in the temporary separation which I am sure will
precede our final and inseparable union. But this
dreadful deed, Markit is this that makes me sad.
The knowledge that you, whom I thought too
gentle wantonly to crush the crawling insect,should
have become without need the slayer of menof
innocent
men, too, makes my heart bleed within, and
my eyes fill; and when I think of it, as indeed I now
think of little else, and feel that its remorse and all
its consequences must haunt you for many years
of gloomy self-rebuke, I almost think, with my
father, that it would be better we should now
separate
,
to see each other no more. I think I could
see you depart, knowing that it was final and for
ever, with gladness and without a tear, were this
sin not upon your head.
Your words are cruel, Kate; but you cannot
speak to my spirit in language more severe than
it speaks momentarily to itself. I never knew any
thing of punishment before; and the first lesson is
a bitter one. Your words touch me but little now,
as the tree, when the axe has once girdled it, has
no feeling for any further stroke. Forbear then,
dear Kate, as you love yourself. Brood not upon
a subject that brings pain with it to your own spirit,
and has almost ceased, except in its consequences,
to operate upon mine. Let us now speak of those
things which concern you nearly, and me not a
littleof the only thing, which, beside this deed of
death, troubles my thought at this moment. Let
us speak of our future hopeif hope there may be
for me, after the stern sentence which your lips
uttered in part even now.
It was for youfor your safety, believe me,
Mark, that I spoke; my own heart was wrung
with the language of my lipsthe language of my
cooler thought. I spoke only for your safety and
not for myself. CouldI again repeatcould this
deed be undonecould you be free from the
reproach
and the punishment, I would be content,
though the strings of my heart cracked with its own
Z 2
doom, to forego all claim upon youto give you
to give up my own hope of happiness for ever.
Her words were passionate, and at their close
her head sank upon his shoulder, while her tears
gushed forth without restraint, and in defiance of
all her efforts. The heart of the woodman was
deeply and painfully affected, and the words
refused
to leave his lips, while a kindred anguish
shook his manly frame, and rendered it almost a
difficulty with him to sustain the slight fabric of
hers. With a stern effort, however, he recovered
himself, and reseating her upon the bank from
which, in the agitation of the moment, they had
both arisen, he endeavoured to sooth her spirit, by
unfolding his plan of future life.
My present aim is the nationI shall cross the
Chestatee river to-morrow, and shall push at once
for the forest of Etowee, and beyond the Etowee
river. I know the place well, and have been through
it once before. There I shall linger until I hear
all the particulars of this affair in its progress, and
determine upon my route accordingly. If the stir
is great, as I reckon it will be, I shall push into
Tennessee, and perhaps go for the Mississippi.
Could I hope that your father would consent to
remove
,
I should at once do this and make a
settlement
,
where, secure from interruption and all
together
,
we might live happily and honourably for
the future.
And why not do so nowwhy stop at all
among the Cherokees? Why not go at once into
Mississippi, and begin the world, as you propose in
the end to do?
What! and leave you for evernow Kate, you
are indeed cruel. I had not thought to have
listened
to such a recommendation from one who
loved me as you profess.
As I do, MarkI say nothing which I do not
feel. It does not follow that you will be any nigher
your object, if my father continues firm in his
refusal
,
though nigher to me, by lingering about in
the nation. On the contrary, will he not, hearing
of you in the neighbourhood, be more close in his
restraints upon me. Will not your chance of
exposure
,
too, be so much the greater, as to make it
incumbent upon him to pursue his determination
with rigour; while, on the other hand, if you
remove
yourself out of all reach of Georgia, in the
Mississippi, and there begin a settlement, I am sure
that he will look upon the affair with different
notions
.
It cannot be, Kateit cannot be. You know
I have had but a single motive for living so long
among this people and in these parts. I disliked
both, and only lingered with a single hope, that I
might be blessed with your presence always, and
in the event of my sufficient success that I might
win you altogether for myself. I have not done
much for this object, and this unhappy affair forbids
me for the present to do more. Is not this enough,
Katharine, and must I bury myself from you
a thousand miles in the forest, ignorant of what
may be going on, and without any hope, such as I
have lived for before. Is the labour I have
undergone
the
life I have led, to have no fruits? Will
you too be the first to recommend forgetfulness;
to overthrow my chance of happiness. Noit
must not be. Hear me, Katharine Waltonhear
me, and say I have not worked altogether in vain.
I have acquired some little by my toils, and can
acquire more. There is one thing now, one
blessing
which you may afford, and the possession of
which will enable me to go with a light heart and
a strong hand into any forests, winning comforts
for both of ushappiness, if the world have itand
nothing to make us afraid.
He spoke with deep energy, and for a moment
she looked inquiringly into his face. The
expression
was satisfactory, and she replied without
hesitation
.
I understand you, Mark ForresterI
understand
you, but it must not be. I must regard and
live for affections beside my own? would you have
me fly for ever from those who have been all to me
from those to whom I am allfrom my father
from my dear, my old mother! Fie, Mark.
And are you not all to me, Katharine,the sole,
the singularthe one thing for which I would live,
and wanting which I care not to live? Ay,
Katharine
,
fly with me from all,and yet not for ever.
They will follow you, and our end will then be
answered
.
Unless you do this, they would linger on
in this place without an object, even if permitted,
which is very doubtful, to hold their ground
enjoying
life as a vegetable, and dead before life
itself
is extinct.
Spare your speech, Markon this point you
urge me in vain, was the firm response of the
maiden. Though I feel for you as I feel for none
other, I also feel that I have other ties and other
obligations, all inconsistent with the step which you
would have me take. I will not have you speak
of it furtheron this particular I am immovable.
A shade of mortification clouded the face of
Forrester as she uttered these words, and, for a
moment he was silent. Resuming, at length, with
something of regulation in his manner, he continued
the conversation.
Well, Kate, since you will have it so, I forbear;
though, what course is left for you and what
hope for me, if your father continues in his present
humour, I am at a loss to see. There is one thing,
howeverthere is one pledge that I would exact
from you before we part.
He took her hand tenderly as he spoke, and his
eyes glistening with tearful expectation, were fixed
upon her own; but she did not immediately reply.
She seemed rather to await the naming of the
pledge of which he spoke. There was a struggle
going on between her mind and her affections, and
though, in the end, the latter seemed to obtain the
mastery, the sense of propriety, the moral
guardianship
of her own spirit battled sternly and
fearlessly
against their suggestions. She would make
no promise which might, by any possibility, bind her
to any engagement inconsistent with other and
primary
obligations.
I know not, Mark, what may be the pledge
which you would have from me, to which I could
consent with propriety. When I hear your desires,
plainly expressed to my understanding, I shall
better
know how to reply. You heard the language
of my fatherI must obey his wishes as far as I
know them. Though sometimes rough, and always
irregular in his habits, to me he has been at all
times tender and kindhe has never treated me
roughly, and I would not now disobey his
commands
.
Still, in this matter, my heart inclines too
much in your favour not to make me less
scrupulous
on the subject than I should otherwise desire
to be. Besides, I have so long held myself yours,
and with his sanction yours only, that I can the
more easily listen to your entreaties. If, then, you
truly love me, you will, I am sure, ask nothing that
I should not grant. Speakwhat is the pledge?
It shall come with no risk, Kate, believe me,
none. Heaven forbid that I should bring a solitary
grief to your bosom; yet it may adventure in
some respects both mind and person, if you be not
wary. Knowing your father, as you know him too,
I would have from you a pledgea promise, here,
solemnly uttered in the eye of heaven, and in the
holy stillness of this place, which has witnessed
other of our vows no less sacred and solemn, that,
should he sanction the prayer of another who seeks
your love, and command your obedience, that you
will not obeythat you will not go quietly a
victim
to the altarthat you will not pledge to another
the same vow which has been long since pledged
to me.
He paused a moment for a reply, but she spoke
notand with something like impetuosity he
proceeded
:
You make no reply, Katharine? You hear my
entreatymy prayer. It involves no impropriety
it stands in the way of no other duty, since, I
trust, the relationship between us is to the full as
binding and dear as that of any other which may
call for your regard. All that I ask is, that you
will not dispose of yourself to another, your heart
not going with your hand, whatever may be the
authority which may require it; at least, not until
you are fully assured that it is beyond my power
to claim you, or I become unworthy to press the
claim.
It is strange, Mark, that you should speak in a
manner of which there is so little need. The pledge
long since uttered as solemnly as you now require,
under these very boughs, should satisfy you on
this particular.
So it should, Kate,and so it would, perhaps,
could I now reason on any subject. But my doubts
are not now of your love, but of your firmness in
resisting a control at variance with your duty to
yourself. Your words reassure me, however, and
now, though with no glad heart, I shall pass over
the border, and hope for the better days which are
to make us happy.
Not so fast, Master Forrester, exclaimed the
voice of old Walton, emerging from the cover of
the sycamore, to the shelter of which he had
advanced
unobserved, and had been the unsuspected
auditor of the dialogue from first to last. The
couple
,
with an awkward consciousness, started up at
the speech, taken by surprise, and neither uttering
a word in reply to this sudden address.
You must first answer, young man, to the
charge of advising my daughter to disobedience,
as I have heard you for the last half hour; and to
elopement, which she had the good sense to refuse.
I thought, Master Forrester, that you were better
bred than to be guilty of such offences.
I know them not as such, Mr. Walton. I had
your own sanction to my engagement with
Katharine
,
and do not see that after that you had any
right to break it off.
You do noteh! Well, perhaps you are right,
and I have thought better of the matter myself;
and between us, Kate has behaved so well and
spoken so prettily to you, and obeyed my orders,
as she should have done, that I'm thinking to look
more kindly on the whole affair.
Are you, dear fatherI am so delighted!
Hush, minxthe business is mine and none of
yours. Hark you, Mark. You must flythere's
no two ways about that; and, between us, there
will be a devil of a stir in this matter. I have it
from good authority, that the governor will riddle
the whole nation but he'll have every man, woman,
and child concerned in this difficulty; so that'll be
no place for you. You must go right on to the
Massassippi
, and enter lands enough for us all.
Enter them in Kate's name, and they'll be secure.
As soon as you've fixed that business, write on,
say where you are, and we'll be down upon you,
bag and baggage, in no time and less.
Oh, dear fatherthis is so good of you.
Pshaw, get away, minx; I don't like kisses
jest
after supper; it takes the taste all out of my
mouth of what I've been eating.
Forrester was loud in his acknowledgments,
and sought by eulogistic professions to do away the
effect of all that stuff, on the reverse of the picture,
which he might have uttered in the previous
conversation
;
but the old man cut him short with his
wonted querulousness
Oh, done with your blarney, boy. `It's all my
eye and Betty Martin!' Won't you go in and take
supper. There's something left, I reckon.
But Forrester had now no idea of eating, and
declined accordingly, alleging his determination to
set off immediately upon his route; a
determination
which the old man highly approved of.
You are right, Markmove's the word, and
the sooner you go about it the better. Here's my
hand on your bargain, and good-byI reckon
you'll have something more to say to Kate; and,
I suppose you don't want me to help you in saying
itso I leave you. She's used to the wayand
if she's at all afraid, you can easily see her
home.
With a few more words the old man took his
departure, leaving the young people as happy now
as he had before found them sad and sorrowful.
They did not doubt that the reason of this change
was as he alleged it, and gave themselves no
thought as to causes, satisfied as they were with
effects. But old Walton had not proceeded
without
his hosthe had been advised of the
contemplated
turn-out of all the squatters from the gold
region; and having no better tenure than any of
his neighbours, he very prudently made a merit of
necessity, and took his measures as we have seen.
The lovers were satisfied, and their interview now
wore, though at parting, a more sunshiny and genial
complexion. But why prolong a scene which
admits
of so little variety, as that which describes the
sweets and the strifes and the sorrows of mortal
love? We take it, there is no reader of novels so
little conversant with matters of this nature, as
not to know how they begin and how they end;
and contenting ourselves with separating the parties
an act hard-hearted enough, in all conscience
we shall not with idle and questionable sympathy
dwell upon the sorrows of their separation. We
may utter a remark, however, which the particular
instance before us occasions, in relation to the
singular
influence of true love upon the mental and
moral character of the man. There is no
influence
in the world's circumstance so truly purifying,
elevating, and refining, as love. It instils high and
generous sentimentsit ennobles human
endeavour
it
sanctifies defeat and denialit polishes
mannersit gives to morals a tincture of devotion,
and, as with the spell of magic, such as Milton
describes
in Comus, it dissipates with a glance the
wild rout of low desires and insane follies, which
so much blur and blot up the otherwise fair face
of human society. It permits of no meanness in
its trainit expels vulgarity, and with a high
stretch towards perfected humanity, it unearths the
grovelling nature, and gives it aspirations of soul
and sunshine. Its effect upon Forrester had been
of this description. It had been his only tutor,
and had taught him nobly in numberless respects.
In every association with the maiden of his
affections
,
Vol. I.A a
his tone, his language, his temper, and his
thoughts seemed to have undergone improvement
and purification. He seemed quite another man
whenever he came into her presence, and whenever
the thought of her was in his heart. Indeed, such
was the effect of this passion upon both of them;
though this may have been partially the result of other
circumstances arising from their particular situation.
For a long time they had known few enjoyments that
were not intimately connected with the image of one
or the other of them; and thus, from having no other
objects of contemplation or concern, they refined
upon one another. As the minute survey in the
forest of the single leaf, which, for years may not
have attracted the eye, unfolds the fine veins, the
fanciful outline, the clear, green, and transparent
texture, and the delicate shadowings of
innumerable
hues won from the skies and the sunshine; so,
day by day, surveying the single object, they had
become familiar with attractions in one another,
which the passing world would never have
supposed
either of them to possess. In such a
region
,
where there are few competitors for human
love and regard, the heart clings with hungering
tenacity to the few stray affections that spring up,
here and there, like flowers dropped in the desert
by some kindly, careless hand, making a bloom
and a blessing for the untrodden wilderness.
Nor do they blossom there in vain, since, as the
sage has told us, there is no breeze that wafts not
life, no sun that brings not smiles, no water that
bears not refreshment, no flower that has not
charms and a solace, for some heart that could not
well hope to be happy without them.
They separated on the verge of the copse to
which he had attended her, their hands having all
the way been passionately linked, and a seal having
been set upon their mutual vows by the long, loving
embrace which concluded their interview. The
cottage was in sight, and from the umbrageous
shade which surrounded him, he beheld her enter
its precincts in safety; then, returning to their place
of tryst, he led forth his steed, and with a single bound,
was once more in his saddle and once more a
wanderer
.
The cheerlessness of such a fate as that
before
him, even under the changed aspect of his affairs,
to those unaccustomed to the rather too migratory
habits of our southern and western people, would
seem somewhat severe; but the only hardship in
his present fortune, to the mind of Forrester, was
the privation and protraction of his love
arrangements
.
The wild woodland adventure common to
the habits of the people of this class, had a stimulating
effect upon his spirit at all other times; and, even
nowthough perfectly legitimate for a lover to
move slowly from his mistressthe moon just rising
above the trees, and his horse in full gallop through
their winding intricacies, a warm and bracing
energy came to his aid, and his heart grew cheery
under its inspiriting influences. He was full of the
future, rich in anticipation, and happy in the
contemplation
of a thousand projects. With a free
rein he plunged forward into the recesses of the
forest, dreaming of a cottage in the Mississippi, a
heart at ease, and Katharine Walton, with all
her beauties, for ever at hand to keep it so.
END OF VOL. I.To the Lawyer Pippin, Esquire
.
Dear Lawyer
,
I guess I am pretty safe now from the
regulators
,
and saving my trouble of mind, well enough,
and nothing to complain about. Your animal goes
as slick as grease, and carried me in no time out
of reach of rifle shotso you see it's only right
to thank God, and you, lawyer; for if God hadn't
touched you, and you hadn't lent me the nag, I
guess it would have been a sore chance for my
bones, in the hands of them savages and beasts of
prey.
I've been thinking, lawyer, as I driv along,
about what you said to me, and I guess it's no
more than right and reasonable I should take the
law on 'em; and so I put the case in your hands,
lawyer, to make the most on it; and seeing that
the damages, as you say, may be over five hundred
dollars, why, I don't see but the money is just as
good in my hands as theirs, for so it ought to be.
The bill of particulars, for the notions and other
stuffs, I will send you in the bill. In the
meanwhile
you may say, having something to go upon,
that the whole comes to five hundred and fifty
dollars or thereabouts, for with a little calculation
and figering, I guess it won't be hard to bring it up
to that. This don't count the vally of the cart,
for as I made it myself it didn't cost me much; but,
if you put it in the bill, which I guess you ought to,
put it down for twenty dollars moreseeing that
if I can't trade for one somehow, I shall have to give
something like that for another.
And now, lawyer, there's one thingI don't
like to be in the reach of them 'ere regulators for
some time to come yet, and guess 'twouldn't be
altogether
the wisest to stop short of a ride of fifteen
miles to-nightso, therefore, you see it won't be in
my way, no how, to let you have your nag, which
is a main fine one, and goes slick as a whistle
pretty much as if he and the wagon was made for
one another; but this I guess will be no difference
to you, seeing that you can pay yourself his vally
out of the damages. I'm willing to allow you one
hundred dollars for him, though he an't worth so
much, no how, and the balance of the money you
can send to me, or my brother, in the town of
Meriden, in the state of Conneticut. So no more,
dear lawyer, at this writing, from
Your very humble sarvant to
command, &c. &c.
(Signed) JARED BUNCE.